THE
AUTHOR'S ACCOUNT
OF
HIMSELF.
I am of this mind with Homer, that as the snaile that crept out of her
shel was turned eftsoones into a toad, and thereby was forced to make a
stoole to sit on; so the traveller that stragleth from his owne country is in a
short time transformed into so moustrous a shape, that he is faine to alter
his mansion with his manners, and to live where he can, not where he
would.
Lyly's Euphues
.
I was always fond of visiting new scenes,
and observing strange characters and manners.
Even when a mere child I began my travels,
and made many tours of discovery into foreign
parts and unknown regions of my native city,
to the frequent alarm of my parents, and the
emolument of the town-crier. As I grew into
boyhood, I extended the range of my
observations
.
My holiday afternoons were spent in
rambles about the surrounding country. I
made myself familiar with all its places
famous
in history or fable. I knew every spot
where a murder or robbery had been
committed
,
or a ghost been seen. I visited the
neighbouring
villages, and added greatly to my stock
of knowledge, by noting their habits and
customs
,
and conversing with their sages and great
men. I even journeyed one long summer's
day to the summit of the most distant hill,
from whence I stretched my eye over many a
mile of terra incognita, and was astonished to
find how vast a globe I inhabited.
This rambling propensity strengthened with
my years. Books of voyages and travels
became
my passion, and in devouring their
contents
,
I neglected the regular exercises of the
school. How wistfully would I wander about
the pier heads in fine weather, and watch the
parting ships, bound to distant climeswith
what longing eyes would I gaze after their
lessening sails, and waft myself in imagination
to the ends of the earth.
Farther reading and thinking, though they
brought this vague inclination into more
reasonable
bounds, only served to make it more decided.
I visited various parts of my own country; and
had I been merely a lover of fine scenery, I
should have felt little desire to seek elsewhere
for its gratification: for on no country have
the charms of nature been more prodigally
lavished. Her mighty lakes, like oceans of
liquid silver; her mountains, with their bright
aerial tints; her valleys, teeming with wild
fertility
;
her tremendous cataracts, thundering in
their solitudes; her boundless plains, waving
with spontaneous verdure; her broad deep rivers,
rolling in solemn silence to the ocean; her
trackless
forests, where vegetation puts forth all its
magnificence; her skies, kindling with the magic
of summer clouds and glorious sunshine:no,
never need an American look beyond his own
country for the sublime and beautiful of natural
scenery.
But Europe held forth all the charms of
storied
and poetical association. There were to be
seen the masterpieces of art, the refinements of
highly cultivated society, the quaint peculiarities
of ancient and local custom. My native
country
was full of youthful promise; Europe was
rich in the accumulated treasures of age. Her
very ruins told the history of times gone by,
and every mouldering stone was a chronicle.
I longed to wander over the scenes of renowned
achievementto tread, as it were, in the
footsteps
of antiquityto loiter about the ruined
castleto meditate on the falling towerto
escape
,
in short, from the commonplace realities
of the present, and lose myself among the
shadowy
grandeurs of the past.
I had, beside all this, an earnest desire to see
the great men of the earth. We have, it is true,
our great men in America: not a city but has an
ample share of them. I have mingled among
them in my time, and been almost withered by
the shade into which they cast me; for there is
nothing so baleful to a small man as the shade
of a great one, particularly the great man of a
city. But I was anxious to see the great men of
2
Europe; for I had read in the works of various
philosophers, that all animals degenerated in
America, and man among the number. A great
man of Europe, therefore, thought I, must be as
superior to a great man of America, as a peak
of the Alps to a highland of the Hudson; and
in this idea I was confirmed, by observing the
comparative importance and swelling
magnitude
of many English travellers among us;
who, I was assured, were very little people in
their own country. I will visit this land of
wonders, therefore, thought I, and see the
gigantic
race from which I am degenerated.
It has been either my good or evil lot to
have my roving passion gratified. I have
wandered
through different countries, and
witnessed
many of the shifting scenes of life. I
cannot
say that I have studied them with the eye
of a philosopher, but rather with the sauntering
gaze with which humble lovers of the
picturesque
stroll from the window of one print shop
to another; caught sometimes by the
delineations
of beauty, sometimes by the distortions of
caricature, and sometimes by the loveliness of
landscape. As it is the fashion for modern
tourists to travel pencil in hand, and bring home
their port folios filled with sketches, I am
disposed
to get up a few for the entertainment of my
friends. When I look over, however, the hints
and memorandums I have taken down for the
purpose, my heart almost fails me to find how
my idle humour has led me aside from the great
objects studied by every regular traveller who
would make a book. I fear I shall give equal
disappointment with an unlucky landscape
painter
,
who had travelled on the continent, but
following
the bent of his vagrant inclination, had
sketched in nooks, and corners, and by-places.
His sketch book was accordingly crowded with
cottages, and landscapes, and obscure ruins;
but he had neglected to paint St. Peter's, or the
Coliseum; the cascade of Terni, or the bay of
Naples; and had not a single glacier or volcano
in his whole collection.
THE VOYAGE.
Ships, ships, I will descrie you
Amidst the main,
I will come and try you
What you are protecting
And projecting,
What's your end and aim.
One goes abroad for merchandize and trading,
Another stays to keep his country from invading,
A third is coming home with rich and wealthy lading.
Hallo! my fancie, whither wilt thou go?
Old Poem
.
To an American visiting Europe, the long
voyage he has to make is an excellent
preparative
.
The temporary absence of wordly
scenes and employments produces a state of
mind peculiarly fitted to receive new and vivid
impressions. The vast space of waters that
separates the hemispheres is like a blank page
in existence. There is no gradual transition
by which, in Europe, the features and
population
of one country blend almost imperceptibly
with those of another. From the moment you
lose sight of the land you have left, all is
vacancy
,
until you step on the opposite shore, and
are launched at once into the bustle and
novelties
of another world.
In travelling by land there is a continuity of
scene, and a connected succession of persons
and incidents, that carry on the story of life,
and lessen the effect of absence and separation.
We drag, it is true, a lengthening chain at
each remove of our pilgrimage: but the chain
is unbroken; we can trace it back link by
link; and we feel that the last of them still
grapples us to home. But a wide sea voyage
severs us at once. It makes us conscious of
being cast loose from the secure anchorage of
settled life, and sent adrift upon a doubtful
world. It interposes a gulf, not merely
imaginary
,
but real, between us and our homes
a gulf subject to tempest, and fear, and
uncertainty
,
that makes distance palpable, and
return
precarious.
Such, at least, was the case with myself. As
I saw the last blue line of my native land fade
away like a cloud in the horizon, it seemed as if
I had closed one volume of the world and its
concerns, and had time for meditation, before I
opened another. That land, too, now vanishing
from my view, which contained all that was
most dear to me in life; what vicissitudes might
occur in itwhat changes might take place in
me, before I should visit it again. Who can
tell when he sets forth to wander, whither he
may be driven by the uncertain currents of
existence
;
or when he may return; or whether it
may ever be his lot to revisit the scenes of his
childhood?
I said that at sea all is vacancy: I should
correct the expression. To one given to day
dreaming, and fond of losing himself in
reveries
,
a sea voyage is full of subjects for
meditation
;
but then they are the wonders of the
deep, and of the air, and rather tend to abstract
the mind from worldly themes. I delighted to
loll over the quarter railing, or climb to the main
top, of a calm day, and muse for hours together
on the tranquil bosom of a summer's sea. To
gaze upon the piles of golden clouds just
peering
above the horizon; fancy them some fairy
realms, and people them with a creation of my
own. To watch the gently undulating billows,
rolling their silver volumes, as if to die away on
those happy shores.
There was a delicious sensation of mingled
security and awe with which I looked down,
from my giddy height, on the monsters of the
deep at their uncouth gambols. Shoals of
porpoises
tumbling about the bow of the ship; the
grampus, slowly heaving his huge form above
the surface; or the ravenous shark, darting, like
a spectre, through the blue waters. My
imagination
would conjure up all that I had heard or
read of the watery world beneath me: of the
finny herds that roam its fathomless valleys; of
the shapeless monsters that lurk among the very
foundations of the earth, and those wild
phantasms
that swell the tales of fishermen and
sailors.
Sometimes a distant sail, gliding along the
edge of the ocean, would be another theme of
idle speculation. How interesting this
fragment
of a world, hastening to rejoin the great
mass of existence. What a glorious monument
of human invention, that has thus triumphed
over wind and wave; has brought the ends of
the earth into communion; has established an
interchange of blessings; pouring into the
sterile
regions of the north all the luxuries of the
south; has diffused the light of knowledge, and
the charities of cultivated life; and has thus
bound together those scattered portions of the
human race, between which nature seemed to
have thrown an insurmountable barrier.
We one day described some shapeless object
drifting as a distance. At sea, every thing that
breaks the monotony of the surrounding
expanse
,
attracts attention. It proved to be the
mast of a ship that must have been completely
wrecked; for there were the remains of
handkerchiefs
,
by which some of the crew had
fastened
themselves to this spar, to prevent their
being washed off by the waves. There was no
trace by which the name of the ship could be
ascertained. The wreck had evidently drifted
about for many months; clusters of shell fish
had fastened about it, and long sea-weeds
flaunted
at its sides. But where, thought I, is the
crew? Their struggle has long been over
they have gone down amidst the roar of the
tempesttheir bones lie whitening among the
caverns of the deep. Silenceoblivion, like
the waves, have closed over them, and no one
can tell the story of their end. What sighs
have been wafted after that ship; what prayers
offered up at the deserted fireside of home.
How often has the mistress, the wife, the
mother
,
pored over the daily news, to catch some
casual intelligence of this rover of the deep.
How has expectation darkened into anxiety
anxiety into dreadand dread into despair.
Alas! not one memento shall ever return for
love to cherish. All that shall ever be known,
is, that she sailed from her port, and was
never
heard of more!
3
The sight of this wreck, as usual, gave rise to
many dismal anecdotes. This was particularly
the case in the evening, when the weather,
which had hitherto been fair, began to look
wild and threatening, and gave indications of
one of those sudden storms that will sometimes
break in upon the screnity of a summer voyage.
As we sat round the dull light of a lamp, in the
cabin, that made the gloom more ghastly, every
one had his tale of shipwreck and disaster. I
was peculiarly struck with a short one related
by the captain.
As I was once sailing, said he, in a fine
stout ship, across the banks of Newfoundland,
one of those heavy fogs that prevail in those
parts rendered it impossible for us to see far
ahead, even in the day time; but at night the
weather was so thick that we could not
distinguish
any object at twice the length of the ship.
I kept lights at the mast head, and a constant
watch forward to look out for fishing smacks,
which are accustomed to lie at anchor on the
banks. The wind was blowing a smacking
breeze, and we were going at a great rate
through the water. Suddenly the watch gave
the alarm of a sail ahead!it was
scarcely
uttered, before we were upon her. She was
a small schooner, at anchor, with the broadside
toward us. The crew were all asleep, and had
neglected to hoist a light. We struck her just
a-mid-ships. The force, the size, and weight,
of our vessel bore her down below the waves;
we passed over her, and were hurried on our
course. As the crashing wreck was sinking
beneath
us, I had a glimpse of two or three
half-naked
wretches, rushing from her cabin; they
just started from their beds to be swallowed
shrieking by the waves. I heard their
drowning
cry mingling with the wind. The blast
that bore it to our ears, swept us out of all
farther
hearing. I shall never forget that cry! It
was some time before we could put the ship
about, she was under such headway. We
returned
,
as nearly as we could guess, to the place
where the smack had anchored. We cruised
about for several hours in the dense fog. We
fired signal guns, and listened if we might hear
the halloo of any survivors; but all was silent
we never saw or heard any thing of them
more!
I confess these stories, for a time, put an end
to all my fine fancies. The storm increased
with the night. The sea was lashed into
tremendous
confusion. There was a fearful,
sullen
sound of rushing waves, and broken surges.
Deep called unto deep. At times the black
volume of clouds over head seemed rent
asunder
by flashes of lightning that quivered along
the foaming billows, and made the succeeding
darkness doubly terrible. The thunders
bellowed
over the wild waste of waters, and
seemed echoed and prolonged by the
mountain
waves. As I saw the ship staggering and
plunging among these roaring caverns, it
seemed
miraculous that she regained her balance, or
preserved her buoyancy. Her yards would dip
into the water; her bow was almost buried
beneath
the waves. Sometimes an impending
surge seemed ready to overwhelm her, and
nothing
but a dexterous movement of the helm
preserved her from the shock.
When I retired to my cabin the awful scene
still followed me. The whistling of the wind
through the rigging sounded like funereal
wailings
.
The creaking of the masts; the straining
and groaning of bulk heads, as the ship
laboured
in the weltering sea, were frightful. As I
heard the waves rushing along the side of the
ship, and roaring in my very ear, it seemed as
if death were raging round this floating prison,
seeking for his prey: the mere starting of a nail
the yawning of a seam, might give him
entrance
.
A fine day, however, with a tranquil sea and
favouring breeze, soon put all these dismal
reflections
to flight. It is impossible to resist the
gladdening influence of fine weather and fair
wind at sea. When the ship is decked out in
all her canvas, every sail swelled, and careering
gayly over the curling waves, how lofty, how
gallant, she appearshow she seems to lord it
over the deep! I might fill a volume with the
reveries of a sea voyage, for with me it is
almost
a continual reveriebut it is time to get
to shore.
It was a fine sunny morning when the
thrilling
cry of land! was given from the mast head.
I question whether Columbus, when he
discovered
the new world, felt a more delicious
throng of sensations, than rush into an
American's
bosom, when he first comes in sight of
Europe. There is a volume of associations
with the very name. It is the land of promise,
teeming with every thing of which his
childhood
has heard, or on which his studious years
have pondered.
From that time until the moment of arrival,
it was all feverish excitement. The ships of
war, that prowled like guardian giants along the
coast; the headlands of Ireland, stretching out
into the channel; the Welsh mountains,
towering
into the clouds; all were objects of intense
interest. As we sailed up the Mersey, I
reconnoitred
the shores with a telescope. My eye
dwelt with delight on neat cottages, with their
trim shrubberies and green grass plots. I saw
the mouldering ruin of an abbey overrun with
ivy, and the taper spire of a village church
rising
from the brow of a neighbouring hillall
were characteristic of England.
The tide and wind were so favourable, that
the ship was enabled to come at once to the pier.
It was thronged with people; some idle
lookers-on
,
others eager expectants of friends or
relatives
.
I could distinguish the merchant to
whom the ship was consigned. I knew him by
his calculating brow and restless air. His
hands were thrust into his pockets; he was
whistling thoughtfully, and walking to and fro,
a small space having been accorded to him by
the crowd, in deference to his temporary
importance
.
There were repeated cheerings and
salutations
interchanged between the shore and
the ship, as friends happened to recognize each
other. But I particularly noticed one young
woman of humble dress, but interesting
demeanour
.
She was leaning forward from among the
crowd; her eye hurried over the ship as it
neared
the shore, to catch some wished-for
countenance
.
She seemed disappointed and agitated;
when I heard a faint voice call her name.
It was from a poor sailor, who had been ill all
the voyage, and had excited the sympathy of
every one on board. When the weather was
fine, his messmates had spread a mattress for
him on deck in the shade, but of late his illness
had so increased, that he had taken to his
hammock
,
and only breathed a wish that he might see
his wife before he died. He had been helped
on deck as we came up the river, and was now
leaning against the shrouds, with a countenance
so wasted, so pale, so ghastly, that it is no
wonder
even the eye of affection did not recognize
him. But at the sound of his voice, her eye
darted on his features; it read, at once, a whole
volume of sorrow; she clasped her hands,
uttered
a faint shriek, and stood wringing them in
silent agony.
All now was hurry and bustle. The
meetings
of acquaintancesthe greetings of friends
the consultations of men of business. I
alone was solitary and idle. I had no friend
to meet, no cheering to receive. I stepped
upon the land of my forefathersbut felt that
I was a stranger in the land.
4
ROSCOE.
In the service of mankind to be
A guardian god below; still to employ
The mind's brave ardour in heroic aims,
Such as may raise us o'er the groveling herd,
And make us shine foreverthat is life.
Thomson
.
One
of the first places to which a stranger
is taken in Liverpool, is the Athenum. It is
established on a liberal and judicious plan;
contains a good library, and spacious reading
room, and is the great literary resort of the
place. Go there at what hour you may, you
are sure to find it filled with grave looking
personages
,
deeply absorbed in the study of
newspapers
.
As I was once visiting this haunt of the
learned, my attention was attracted to a person
just entering the room. He was advanced in
life, tall, and of a form that might once have
been commanding, but it was a little bowed
by timeperhaps by care. He had a noble
Roman style of countenance; a head that
would have pleased a painter; and though
some slight furrows on his brow showed that
wasting thought had been busy there, yet his
eye still beamed with the fire of a poetic soul.
There was something in his whole appearance
that indicated a being of a different order from
the bustling race around him.
I inquired his name, and was informed that
it was
Roscoe
. I drew back with an
involuntary
feeling of veneration. This, then, was an
author of celebrity; this was one of those
men, whose voices have gone forth to the ends
of the earth; with whose minds I have
communed
even in the solitudes of America.
Accustomed
,
as we are in our country, to know
European writers only by their works, we
cannot
conceive of them, as of other men,
engrossed
by trivial or sordid pursuits, and jostling
with the crowd of common minds in the dusty
paths of life. They pass before our
imaginations
like superior beings, radiant with the
emanations
of their own genius, and surrounded by
a halo of literary glory.
To find the elegant historian of the Medici,
therefore, mingling among the busy sons of
traffick, at first shocked my poetical ideas; but
it is from the very circumstances and situation
in which he has been placed, that Mr. Roscoe
derives his highest claims to admiration. It is
interesting to notice how some minds seem
almost
to create themselves; springing up under
every disadvantage, and working their solitary,
but irresistible, way through a thousand
obstacles
.
Nature seems to delight in disappointing
the cherishing assiduities of art, with which it
would rear legitimate dulness to maturity; and
to glory in the vigour and luxuriance of her
chance productions. She scatters the seeds of
genius to the winds, and though some may
perish
among the stony places of the world, and
some be choked by the thorns and brambles of
early adversity, yet others will now and then
strike root even in the clefts of the rock,
struggle
bravely up into sunshine, and spread over
their steril birth-place all the beauties of
vegetation
.
Such has been the case with Mr. Roscoe.
Born in a place apparently ungenial to the
growth of literary talent; in the very market
place of trade; without fortune, family
connections
,
or patronage; self prompted, self
sustained
,
and almost self taught, he has
conquered
every obstacle, achieved his way to
eminence
,
and, having become one of the
ornaments
of the nation, has turned the whole
force of his talents and influence to advance
and embellish his native town.
Indeed, it is this last trait in his character
which has given him the greatest interest in my
eyes, and induced me particularly to point him
out to my countrymen. Eminent as are his
literary merits, he is but one among the many
distinguished authors of this intellectual nation.
They, however, live but in general for their
own fame, or their own pleasures. Their
private
history presents no lesson to the world, or,
perhaps, a humiliating one of human frailty
and inconsistency. At best, they are prone to
steal away from the bustle and commonplace
of busy existence; to indulge in the selfishness
of lettered ease; and revel in scenes of mental,
but exclusive, enjoyment.
Mr. Roscoe, on the contrary, has claimed
none of the accorded privileges of talent. He
has shut himself up in no garden of thought,
or elysium of fancy; but has gone forth into
the highways and thoroughfares of life; he has
planted bowers by the way side, for the
refreshment
of the pilgrim and the sojourner, and has
established pure fountains where the labouring
man may turn aside from the dust and heat of
the day, and drink of the living streams of
knowledge. There is a daily beauty in his
life, on which mankind may meditate and
grow better. It exhibits no lofty and almost
useless, because inimitable, example of
excellence
;
but presents a picture of active, yet
simple
and imitable virtues, which are within every
man's reach, but which few men exercise, or
this world would be a paradise.
But his private life is peculiarly worthy the
attention of the citizens of our young and busy
country, where literature and the elegant arts
must grow up side by side with the coarser
plants of daily necessity; and must depend for
their culture, not on the exclusive devotion of
time and wealth, or the quickening rays of
titled patronage, but on hours and seasons
snatched from the pursuit of worldly interests,
by intelligent and public spirited individuals.
He has shown how much may be done, in
hours of leisure, by one master spirit, for a
place, and how completely it can give its own
impress to surrounding objects. Like his own
Lorenzo De Medici, on whom he seems to have
fixed his eye, as on a pure model of antiquity,
he has woven the history of his life with the
history of his native town, and made the
foundations
of its fame the monuments of his
virtues
.
Wherever you go, in Liverpool, you per
ceive traces of his footsteps in all that is
elegant
and liberal. He found the tide of wealth
flowing merely in the channels of traffick; he
has diverted from it invigorating rills to refresh
the gardens of literature. By his own example
and constant exertions, he has brought into
effect
that union of commerce and the intellectual
pursuits, so eloquently recommended in one of
his latest writings;
*
*
Address on the opening of the Liverpool Institution.
and has practically proved
how beautifully they may be brought to
harmonize
,
and to benefit each other. The noble
institutions
for literary and scientific purposes,
which reflect such credit on Liverpool, and are
giving such an impulse to the public mind, have
mostly been originated, and all effectively
promoted
,
by Mr. Roscoe: and when we consider
the rapidly increasing opulence and magnitude
of that town, which promises to vie in
commercial
importance with the metropolis; it will be
perceived that in awakening an ambition of
mental improvement among its inhabitants, he
has effected a great benefit to the cause of
British
literature.
In America we only know Mr. Roscoe as
the authorin Liverpool he is spoken of as the
banker; and I was told of his having been
unfortunate
in business. I could not pity him, as
I heard some rich men do. I considered him
far above the reach of my pity. Those who
live only for the world, and in the world, may
be cast down by the frowns of adversity; but a
man like Roscoe is not to be overcome by the
mutations of fortune. They do but drive him
in upon the resources of his own mind, to the
superior society of his own thoughts, which the
best of men are apt sometimes to neglect, and
to roam abroad in search of less worthy
associates
.
He is independent of the world around
him. He lives with antiquity and with
posterity
:
with antiquity, in the sweet communion of
studious retirement; and with posterity, in the
generous aspirings after future renown. The
solitude of such a mind, is its state of highest
enjoyment. It is then visited by those elevated
5
meditations which are the proper aliment of
noble
souls, and are like manna, sent from heaven,
in the wilderness of this world.
While my feelings were yet alive on the
subject
,
it was my fortune to light on farther traces
of Mr. Roscoe. I was riding out with a
gentleman
,
to view the environs of Liverpool, when
he turned off, through a gate, into some
ornamented
grounds. After riding a short distance,
we came to a spacious mansion of freestone,
built in the Grecian style. It was not in the
purest taste, yet it had an air of elegance, and
the situation was delightful. A fine lawn
sloped
away from it, studded with clumps of trees,
so disposed as to break a soft fertile country
into a variety of landscapes. The Mersey was
seen winding a broad quiet sheet of water
through an expanse of green meadow land,
while the Welsh mountains, blending with
clouds, and melting into distance, bordered the
horizon.
This was Roscoe's favourite residence during
the days of his prosperity. It had been the seat
of elegant hospitality and literary retirement.
The house was now silent and deserted. I saw
the windows of the study, which looked out
upon the soft scenery I have mentioned. The
windows were closedthe library was gone.
Two or three ill-favoured beings were loitering
about the place, whom my fancy pictured into
retainers of the law. It was like visiting some
classic fountain, that had once welled its pure
waters in a sacred shade, but now dry and
dusty, with the lizard and the toad brooding
over the shattered marbles.
I inquired after the fate of Mr. Roscoe's
library
,
which had consisted of scarce and
foreign
books, from many of which he had
drawn the materials for his Italian histories.
It had passed under the hammer of the
auctioneer
,
and was dispersed about the country.
The good people of the vicinity thronged like
wreckers to get some part of the noble wreck
that had been driven on shore. Did such
a scene admit of ludicrous associations, we
might imagine something whimsical in this
strange irruption into the regions of learning.
Pigmies rummaging the armoury of a
giant
,
and contending for the possession of
weapons
which they could not wield. To notice
some knot of speculators, debating with
calculating
brow over the quaint binding and
illuminated
margin of an obsolete author; or the air
of intense, but baffled, sagacity with which
some successful purchaser attempted to dive
into the black-letter bargain he had secured.
It is a beautiful incident in the story of Mr.
Roscoe's misfortunes, and one that will be
appreciated
by the studious mind, that the parting
with his books seems to have touched upon his
tenderest feelings, and to have been the only
circumstance that could provoke the notice of
his muse. The scholar only knows how dear
these silent, yet eloquent, companions of pure
thoughts and innocent hours, become in the
time of adversity. When all that is worldly,
turns to dross around us, these only retain their
steady value. When friends grow cold, and the
converse of intimates languishes into vapid
civility
and common-place, these only continue
the unaltered countenance of happier days, and
cheer us with that true friendship that never
deceived
hope, nor deserted sorrow.
I do not wish to censure; but, surely, if the
people of Liverpool had been properly sensible
of what was due to Mr. Roscoe and to
themselves
,
his library would never have been sold.
Good worldly reasons may, doubtless, be given
for the circumstance, which it would be difficult
to combat with others that might seem merely
fanciful; but it certainly appears to me such an
opportunity as seldom occurs, of cheering a
noble
mind struggling under misfortunes, by one
of the most delicate, but expressive, tokens of
public sympathy. It is difficult, however, to
estimate
a man of genius properly, who is daily
before our eyes. He becomes mingled and
confounded with other men. His great
qualities
lose their novelty, and we become too
familiar
with the common materials that form
the basis even of the loftiest character. Some
of Mr. Roscoe's townsmen may regard him
merely as a man of business; others, as a
politician
;
all find him engaged, like themselves,
in ordinary occupations, and surpassed, perhaps,
by themselves, on some points of worldly
wisdom
.
Even the amiable and unostentatious
simplicity of his character, which gives the
nameless grace to real excellence, may cause
him to be undervalued by some coarse minds,
who do not know that true worth is always
void of glare and pretension. But the man of
letters who speaks of Liverpool, speaks of it as
the residence of Roscoe.The intelligent
traveller
who visits it, inquires where Roscoe is to
be seen.He is the literary land-mark of the
place, indicating its existence to the distant
scholar.He is like Pompey's column at
Alexandria
,
towering alone in classic dignity.
The following sonnet, addressed by Mr.
Roscoe
to his books, on parting with them, is
alluded
to in the preceding article. If any thing
can add effect to the pure feeling and elevated
thought here displayed, it is the conviction, that
the whole is no effusion of fancy, but a faithful
transcript from the writer's heart:
TO MY BOOKS.
As one, who, destined from his friends to part,
Regrets his loss, but hopes again erewhile
To share their converse, and enjoy their smile,
And tempers as he may, affliction's dart;
Thus, loved associates, chiefs of elder art,
Teachers of wisdom, who could once beguile
My tedious hours, and lighten every toil
I now resign you; nor with fainting heart;
For pass a few short years, or days, or hours,
And happier seasons may their dawn unfold,
And all your sacred fellowship restore;
When, freed from earth, unlimited its powers,
Mind shall with mind direct communion hold,
And kindred spirits meet to part no more.
THE WIFE.
The treasures of the deep are not so precious
As are the concealed comforts of a man
Lock'd up in woman's love. I scent the air
Of blessings, when I come but near the house.
What a delicious breath marriage sends forth
The violet bed's not sweeter!
Middleton
.
I HAVE often had occasion to remark the
fortitude
with which women sustain the most
overwhelming
reverses of fortune. Those disasters
which break down the spirit of a man, and
prostrate him in the dust, seem to call forth all
the energies of the softer sex, and give such
intrepidity
and elevation to their character, that
at times it approaches to sublimity. Nothing
can be more touching than to behold a soft and
tender female, who had been all weakness and
dependence, and alive to every trivial
roughness
while treading the prosperous paths of
life, suddenly rising in mental force, to be the
comforter and supporter of her husband, under
misfortune, and abiding, with unshrinking
firmness
,
the bitterest blasts of adversity.
As the vine which has long twined its
graceful
foliage around the oak, and been lifted by it
into sunshine, will, when the hardy plant is
rifted
by the thunderbolt, cling round it with its
caressing tendrils, and bind up its shattered
boughs; so is it beautifully ordered by
Providence
,
that woman, who is the mere
dependant
and ornament of man in his happier hours,
should be his stay and solace when smitten with
sudden calamity, winding herself into the
rugged
recesses of his nature, tenderly supporting
the drooping head, and binding up the broken
heart.
I was once congratulating a friend, who had
around him a blooming family, knit together in
the strongest affection. I can wish you no
better lot, said he, with enthusiasm, than to
6
have a wife and childrenif you are
prosperous
,
there they are to share your prosperity;
if otherwise, there they are to comfort you.
And, indeed, I have observed that married men
falling into misfortune, are more apt to retrieve
their situation in the world than single men;
partly because they are more stimulated to
exertion
by the necessities of the helpless and
beloved
beings who depend upon them for
subsistence
;
but chiefly because their spirits are
soothed and relieved by domestic endearments,
and their self respect kept alive by finding, that
though all abroad is darkness and humiliation,
yet there is still a little world of love, of which
they are monarchs. Whereas a single man is
apt to run to waste and self neglect; to fancy
himself lonely and abandoned, and his heart to
fall to ruin like some deserted mansion, for want
of an inhabitant.
These observations call to mind a little
domestic story, of which I was once a
witness
.
My intimate friend, Leslie, had married
a beautiful and accomplished girl, who had
been brought up in the midst of fashionable
life. She had, it is true, no fortune, but that
of my friend was ample; and he delighted in
the anticipation of indulging her in every
elegant
pursuit, and administering to those
delicate
tastes and fancies, that spread a kind of
witchery about the sex.Her life, said he,
shall be like a fairy tale.
The very difference in their characters
produced
an harmonious combination: he was of a
romantic, and somewhat serious, cast; she was
all life and gladness. I have often noticed the
mute rapture with which he would gaze upon
her in company, of which her sprightly powers
made her the delight; and how, in the midst of
applause, her eye would still turn to him, as if
there alone she sought favour and acceptance.
When leaning on his arm, her slender form
contrasted finely with his tall, manly person.
The fond confiding air with which she looked
up to him, seemed to call forth a flush of
triumphant
pride and cherishing tenderness, as
if he doated on his lovely burthen for its very
helplessness. Never did a couple set forward
on the flowery path of early and well-suited
marriage with a fairer prospect of felicity.
It was the mishap of my friend, however,
to have embarked his fortune in large
speculations
;
and he had not been married many
months, when, by a succession of sudden
disasters
,
it was swept from him, and he found
himself reduced almost to penury. For a time
he kept his situation to himself, and went about
with a haggard countenance, and a breaking
heart. His life was but a protracted agony;
and what rendered it more insupportable, was
the necessity of keeping up a smile in the
presence
of his wife; for he could not bring
himself
to overwhelm her with the news. She
saw, however, with the quick eyes of affection,
that all was not well with him. She marked
his altered looks and stifled sighs, and was not
to be deceived by his sickly and vapid attempts
at cheerfulness. She tasked all her sprightly
powers and tender blandishments to win him
back to happiness; but she only drove the
arrow
deeper into his soul. The more he saw
cause to love her, the more torturing was the
thought that he was soon to make her
wretched
.
A little while, thought he, and the smile
will vanish from that cheekthe song will die
away from those lipsthe lustre of those eyes
will be quenched with sorrow; and the happy
heart which now beats lightly in that bosom,
will be weighed down, like mine, by the cares
and miseries of the world.
At length he came to me one day, and
related
his whole situation in a tone of the deepest
despair. When I had heard him through, I
inquired, does your wife know all this?At
the question he burst into an agony of tears.
For God's sake! cried he, if you have any
pity on me, don't mention my wife; it is the
thought of her that drives me almost to
madness
!
And why not? said I. She must know it
sooner or later: you cannot keep it long from
her, and the intelligence may break upon her in
a more startling manner, than if imparted by
yourself; for the accents of those we love soften
the harshest tidings. Besides, you are depriving
yourself of the comforts of her sympathy; and
not merely that, but also endangering the only
bond that can keep hearts togetheran
unreserved
community of thought and feeling. She
will soon perceive that something is secretly
preying upon your mind; and true love will not
brook reserve, but feels undervalued and
outraged
,
when even the sorrows of those it loves
are concealed from it.
Oh, but, my friend! to think what a blow I
am to give to all her future prospectshow I
am to strike her very soul to the earth, by
telling
her that her husband is a beggar!that
she is to forego all the elegancies of lifeall
the pleasures of societyto shrink with me
into indigence and obscurity! To tell her that
I have dragged her down from the sphere in
which she might have continued to move in
constant brightnessthe light of every eye
the admiration of every heart!How can
she bear poverty? she has been brought up in
all the refinements of opulence. How can she
bear neglect? she has been the idol of society.
Oh, it will break her heart, it will break her
heart!
I saw his grief was eloquent, and I let it have
its flow; for sorrow relieves itself by words.
When his paroxysm had subsided, and he had
relapsed into moody silence, I resumed the
subject
gently, and urged him to break his situation
at once to his wife. He shook his head
mournfully
,
but positively.
But how are you to keep it from her? It
is necessary she should know it, that you may
take the steps proper to the alteration of your
circumstances. You must change your style of
livingnay, observing a pang to pass across
his countenance, don't let that afflict you. I
am sure you have never placed your happiness
in outward showyou have yet friends, warm
friends, who will not think the worse of you
for being less splendidly lodged: and surely it
does not require a palace to be happy with
Mary
I could be happy with her, cried he
convulsively
,
in a hovel!I could go down with
her into poverty and the dust!I couldI
couldGod bless her!God bless her!
cried he, bursting into a transport of grief and
tenderness.
And believe me, my friend, said I,
stepping
up, and grasping him warmly by the
hand, believe me, she can be the same with
you. Aye, more: it will be a source of pride
and triumph to herit will call forth all the
latent
energies and fervent sympathies of her
nature
;
for she will rejoice to prove that she
loves you for yourself. There is in every true
woman's heart a spark of heavenly fire, which
lies dormant in the broad daylight of
prosperity
;
but which kindles up, and beams and blazes
in the dark hour of adversity. No man knows
what the wife of his bosom isno man knows
what a ministering angel she isuntil he has
gone with her through the fiery trials of this
world.
There was something in the earnestness of
my manner, and the figurative style of my
language
,
that caught the excited imagination of
Leslie. I knew the auditor I had to deal with;
and following up the impression I had made, I
finished by persuading him to go home and
unburden
his sad heart to his wife.
I must confess, notwithstanding all I had
said, I felt some little solicitude for the result.
Who can calculate on the fortitude of one
whose whole life has been a round of
pleasures
?
Her gay spirits might revolt at the
dark, downward path of low humility,
suddenly
pointed out before her, and might cling to
the sunny regions in which they had hitherto
revelled. Besides, ruin in fashionable life is
accompanied by so many galling mortifications,
to which, in other ranks, it is a stranger.In
short, I could not meet Leslie, the next
morning
,
without trepidation. He had made the
disclosure.
And how did she bear it?
Like an angel! It seemed rather to be
a relief to her mind, for she threw her arms
7
around my neck, and asked if this was all that
had lately made me unhappybut, poor girl,
added he, she cannot realize the change we
must undergo. She has no idea of poverty but
in the abstract: she has only read of it in
poetry
,
where it is allied to love. She feels as
yet no privation: she experiences no want of
accustomed conveniences or elegancies. When
we come practically to experience its sordid
cares, its paltry wants, its petty humiliations
then will be the real trial.
But, said I, now that you have got over
the severest task, that of breaking it to her, the
sooner you let the world into the secret the
better. The disclosure may be mortifying; but
then it is a single misery, and soon over;
whereas
you otherwise suffer it, in anticipation, every
hour in the day. It is not poverty, so much
as pretence, that harasses a ruined manthe
struggle between a proud mind and an empty
pursethe keeping up a hollow show that must
soon come to an end. Have the courage to
appear
poor, and you disarm poverty of its
sharpest
sting. On this point I found Leslie
perfectly
prepared. He had no false pride himself,
and as to his wife, she was only anxious to
conform to their altered fortunes.
Some days afterwards he called upon me in
the evening. He had disposed of his dwelling
house, and taken a small cottage in the
country
,
a few miles from town. He had been
busied
all day in sending out furniture. The new
establishment required few articles, and those of
the simplest kind. All the splendid furniture of
his late residence had been sold, excepting his
wife's harp. That, he said, was too closely
associated
with the idea of herself; it belonged to
the little story of their loves; for some of the
sweetest moments of their courtship were those
when he had leaned over that instrument, and
listened to the melting tones of her voice. I
could not but smile at this instance of
romantic
gallantry in a doating husband.
He was now going out to the cottage, where
his wife had been all day, superintending its
arrangement
.
My feelings had become strongly
interested in the progress of this family story,
and as it was a fine evening, I offered to
accompany
him.
He was wearied with the fatigues of the day,
and as we walked out, fell into a fit of gloomy
musing.
Poor Mary! at length broke, with a heavy
sigh, from his lips.
And what of her, asked I, has any thing
happened to her?
What, said he, darting an impatient
glance, is it nothing to be reduced to this
paltry situationto be caged in a miserable
cottageto be obliged to toil almost in the
menial
concerns of her wretched habitation?
Has she then repined at the change?
Repined! she has been nothing but
sweetness
and good humour. Indeed, she seems in
better spirits than I have ever known her; she
has been to me all love, and tenderness, and
comfort!
Admirable girl! exclaimed I. You call
yourself poor, my friend; you never were so
richyou never knew the boundless treasures
of excellence you possessed in that woman.
Oh, but my friend, if this first meeting at
the cottage were over, I think I could then be
comfortable. But this is her first day of real
experience: She has been introduced into a
humble dwellingshe has been employed all
day in arranging its miserable equipments
she has for the first time known the fatigues of
domestic employmentshe has for the first
time looked around her on a home destitute of
every thing elegant, and almost convenient; and
may now be sitting down, exhausted and
spiritless
,
brooding over a prospect of future
poverty
.
There was a degree of probability in this
picture that I could not gainsay, so we walked
on in silence.
After turning from the main road, up a
narrow
lane, so thickly shaded by forest trees, as
to give it a complete air of seclusion, we came
in sight of the cottage. It was humble enough
in its appearance for the most pastoral poet;
and yet it had a pleasing rural look. A wild
vine had overrun one end with a profusion of
foliage; a few trees threw their branches
gracefully over it; and I observed several pots of
flowers tastefully disposed about the door, and
on the grass plot in front. A small wicket gate
opened upon a footpath that wound through
some shrubbery to the door. Just as we
approached
,
we heard the sound of music
Leslie
grasped my arm; we paused and listened.
It was Mary's voice, in a style of the most
touching simplicity, singing a little air of which
her husband was peculiarly fond.
I felt Leslie's hand tremble on my arm. He
stepped forward, to hear more distinctly. His
step made a noise on the gravel walk. A bright
beautiful face glanced out at the window, and
vanisheda light footstep was heardand
Mary
came tripping forth to meet us. She was in
a pretty rural dress of white; a few wild
flowers
were twisted in her fine hair; a fresh bloom
was on her cheek; her whole countenance
beamed with smilesI had never seen her
look so lovely.
My dear George, cried she, I am so glad
you are come; I've been watching and
watching
for you; and running down the lane, and
looking out for you. I've set out a table under
a beautiful tree behind the cottage; and I've
been gathering some of the most delicious
strawberries, for I know you are fond of them
and we have such excellent creamand
every thing is so sweet and still hereOh!
said she, putting her arm within his, and
looking
up brightly in his face, Oh, we shall be so
snug!
Poor Leslie was overcome.He caught her
to his bosomhe folded his arms around her
he kissed her again and againhe could not
speak, but the tears gushed into his eyes. And
he has often assured me, that though the world
has since gone prosperously with him, and his
life has been a happy one, yet never has he
experienced
a moment of such unutterable felicity.
RIP VAN WINKLE.
8
[
The
following Tale was found among the papers of
the late Diedrich Knickerbocker, an old gentleman of
New-York, who was very curious in the Dutch history
of the province, and the manners of the descendants
from its primitive settlers. His historical researches,
however, did not lay so much among books, as among
men; for the former are lamentably scanty on his
favourite
topics; whereas he found the old burghers, and
still more, their wives, rich in that legendary lore, so
invaluable to true history. Whenever, therefore, he
happened upon a genuine Dutch family, snugly shut
up in its low-roofed farm house, under a spreading
sycamore, he looked upon it as a little clasped volume of
black-letter, and studied it with the zeal of a bookworm.
The result of all these researches was a history of
the province, during the reign of the Dutch governors,
which he published some years since. There have been
various opinions as to the literary character of his work,
and, to tell the truth, it is not a whit better than it
should be. Its chief merit is its scrupulous accuracy,
which, indeed, was a little questioned, on its first
appearance
,
but has since been completely established;
and it is now admitted into all historical collections, as
a book of unquestionable authority.
The old gentleman died shortly after the publication
of his work, and now, that he is dead and gone, it
cannot
do much harm to his memory, to say, that his time
might have been much better employed in weightier
labours
.
He, however, was apt to ride his hobby his
own way; and though it did now and then kick up the
dust a little in the eyes of his neighbours, and grieve
the spirit of some friends, for whom he felt the truest
deference and affection; yet his errors and follies are
remembered more in sorrow than in anger,
*
*
Vide the excellent discourse of G. C. Verplanck, Esq. before the
New-York Historical Society.
and it
begins to be suspected, that he never intended to injure
or offend. But however his memory may be
appreciated
by critics, it is still held dear among many folk,
whose good opinion is well worth having; particularly
certain biscuit bakers, who have gone so far as to
imprint
his likeness on their new year cakes, and have
thus given him a chance for immortality, almost equal
to being stamped on a Waterloo medal, or a Queen
Anne's farthing.]
A POSTHUMOUS WRITING OF DIEDRICH KNICKERBOCKER.
By Woden, God of Saxons,
From whence comes Wensday, that is Wodensday,
Truth is a thing that ever I will keep
Unto thylke day in which I creep into
My sepulchre
Cartwright
.
Whoever
has made a voyage up the
Hudson
,
must remember the Kaatskill mountains.
They are a dismembered branch of the great
Appalachian family, and are seen away to the
west of the river, swelling up to a noble height,
and lording it over the surrounding country.
Every change of season, every change of
weather
,
indeed, every hour of the day, produces
some change in the magical hues and shapes of
these mountains, and they are regarded by all
the good wives, far and near, as perfect
barometers
.
When the weather is fair and settled,
they are clothed in blue and purple, and print
their bold outlines on the clear evening sky;
but some times, when the rest of the landscape
is cloudless, they will gather a hood of gray
vapours
about their summits, which, in the last
rays of the setting sun, will glow and light up
like a crown of glory.
At the foot of these fairy mountains, the
voyager may have descried the light smoke
curling up from a village, whose shingle roofs
gleam among the trees, just where the blue tints
of the upland melt away into the fresh green of
the nearer landscape. It is a little village of
great antiquity, having been founded by some
of the Dutch colonists, in the early times of
the province, just about the beginning of the
government of the good Peter Stuyvesant,
(may he rest in peace!) and there were some
of the houses of the original settlers standing
within a few years, with lattice windows,
gable
fronts surmounted with weathercocks, and
built of small yellow bricks brought from
Holland
.
In that same village, and in one of these very
houses, (which, to tell the precise truth, was
sadly time worn and weather beaten,) there
lived many years since, while the country was
yet a province of Great Britain, a simple good
natured fellow, of the name of Rip Van
Winkle
.
He was a descendant of the Van Winkles
who figured so gallantly in the chivalrous days
of Peter Stuyvesant, and accompanied him to
the siege of Fort Christina. He inherited,
however, but little of the martial character of
his ancestors. I have observed that he was a
simple good natured man; he was moreover
a kind neighbour, and an obedient, henpecked
husband. Indeed, to the latter circumstance
might be owing that meekness of spirit which
gained him such universal popularity; for those
men are most apt to be obsequious and
conciliating
abroad, who are under the discipline of
shrews at home. Their tempers, doubtless, are
rendered pliant and malleable in the fiery
furnace
of domestic tribulation, and a curtain
lecture
is worth all the sermons in the world for
teaching the virtues of patience and long
suffering
.
A termagant wife may, therefore, in
some respects, be considered a tolerable
blessing
;
and if so, Rip Van Winkle was thrice
blessed.
Certain it is, that he was a great favourite
among all the good wives of the village, who,
as usual with the amiable sex, took his part in
all family squabbles, and never failed,
whenever
they talked those matters over in their
evening gossippings, to lay all the blame on
Dame Van Winkle. The children of the
village
,
too, would shout with joy whenever he
approached. He assisted at their sports, made
their playthings, taught them to fly kites and
shoot marbles, and told them long stories of
ghosts, witches, and Indians. Whenever he
went dodging about the village, he was
surrounded
by a troop of them, hanging on his
skirts, clambering on his back, and playing a
thousand tricks on him with impunity; and not
a dog would bark at him throughout the
neighbourhood
.
The great error in Rip's composition was an
insuperable aversion to all kinds of profitable
labour. It could not be for the want of
assiduity
or perseverance; for he would sit on a
wet rock, with a rod as long and heavy as a
Tartar's lance, and fish all day without a
murmur
,
even though he should not be encouraged
by a single nibble. He would carry a
fowling
piece on his shoulder, for hours together,
trudging through woods and swamps, and up
hill and down dale, to shoot a few squirrles or
wild pigeons. He would never even refuse to
assist a neighbour in the roughest toil, and was
a foremost man at all country frolicks for
husking
Indian corn, or building stone fences; the
women of the village, too, used to employ him
to run their errands, and to do such little odd
jobs as their less obliging husbands would not
do for them;in a word, Rip was ready to
attend
to any body's business but his own; but
as to doing family duty, and keeping his farm
in order, it was impossible.
In fact, he declared it was no use to work on
his farm; it was the most pestilent little piece
of ground in the whole country; every thing
about it went wrong, and would go wrong, in
spite of him. His fences were continually
falling
to pieces; his cow would either go astray,
or get among the cabbages; weeds were sure
to grow quicker in his fields than any where
else; the rain always made a point of setting in
just as he had some out-door work to do. So
that though his patrimonial estate had dwindled
away under his management, acre by acre, until
there was little more left than a mere patch of
Indian corn and potatoes, yet it was the worst
conditioned farm in the neighbourhood.
His children, too, were as ragged and wild
as if they belonged to nobody. His son Rip,
an urchin begotten in his own likeness,
promised
to inherit the habits, with the old clothes
of his father. He was generally seen trooping
like a colt at his mother's heels, equipped in a
9
pair of his father's cast-off galligaskins, which
he had much ado to hold up with one hand, as
a fine lady does her train in bad weather.
Rip Van Winkle, however, was one of those
happy mortals, of foolish, well-oiled
dispositions
,
who take the world easy, eat white bread
or brown, which ever can be got with least
thought or trouble, and would rather starve on
a penny than work for a pound. If left to
himself, he would have whistled life away, in
perfect contentment; but his wife kept
continually
dinning in his ears about his idleness,
his carelesness, and the ruin he was bringing
on his family. Morning, noon, and night, her
tougue was incessantly going, and every thing
he said or did was sure to produce a torrent of
household eloquence. Rip had but one way of
replying to all lectures of the kind, and that,
by frequent use, had grown into a habit. He
shrugged his shoulders, shook his head, cast up
his eyes, but said nothing. This, however,
always
provoked a fresh volley from his wife,
so that he was fain to draw off his forces, and
take to the outside of the housethe only
side which, in truth, belongs to a henpecked
husband.
Rip's sole domestic adherent was his dog
Wolf, who was as much henpecked as his master;
for Dame Van Winkle regarded them as
companions
in idleness, and even looked upon Wolf
with an evil eye, as the cause of his master's
so often going astray. True it is, in all points
of spirit befitting an honourable dog, he was
as courageous an animal as ever scoured the
woodsbut what courage can withstand the
ever-during and all-besetting terrors of a
woman's
tongue? The moment Wolf entered the
house, his crest fell, his tail drooped to the
ground, or curled between his legs, he sneaked
about with a gallows air, casting many a
sidelong
glance at Dame Van Winkle, and at the
least flourish of a broomstick or ladle, would fly
to the door with yelping precipitation.
Times grew worse and worse with Rip Van
Winkle as years of matrimony rolled on; a
tart temper never mellows with age, and a sharp
tongue is the only edge tool that grows keener
by constant use. For a long while he used to
console himself, when driven from home, by
frequenting a kind of perpetual club of the
sages, philosophers, and other idle personages
of the village, that held its sessions on a bench
before a small inn, designated by a rubicund
portrait of his majesty George the Third. Here
they used to sit in the shade, of a long lazy
summer's day, talk listlessly over village
gossip
,
or tell endless sleepy stories about nothing.
But it would have been worth any statesman's
money to have heard the profound discussions
that sometimes took place, when by chance an
old newspaper fell into their hands, from some
passing traveller. How solemnly they would
listen to the contents, as drawled out by
Derrick
Van Bummel, the schoolmaster, a dapper
learned little man, who was not to be daunted
by the most gigantic word in the dictionary;
and how sagely they would deliberate upon
public events some months after they had taken
place.
The opinions of this junto were completely
controlled by Nicholas Vedder, a patriarch of
the village, and landlord of the inn, at the door
of which he took his seat from morning till
night, just moving sufficiently to avoid the sun,
and keep in the shade of a large tree; so that
the neighbours could tell the hour by his
movements
as accurately as by a sun dial. It is
true, he was rarely heard to speak, but smoked
his pipe incessantly. His adherents, however,
(for every great man has his adherents,)
perfectly
understood him, and knew how to gather
his opinions. When any thing that was read
or related displeased him, he was observed to
smoke his pipe vehemently, and send forth
short, frequent, and angry puffs; but when
pleased, he would inhale the smoke slowly and
tranquilly, and emit it in light and placid
clouds, and sometimes taking the pipe from his
mouth, and letting the fragrant vapour curl
about his nose, would gravely nod his head in
token of perfect approbation.
From even this strong hold the unlucky Rip
was at length routed by his termagant wife,
who would suddenly break in upon the
tranquillity
of the assemblage, call the members all
to nought, nor was that august personage,
Nicholas
Vedder himself, sacred from the daring
tongue of this terrible virago, who charged him
outright with encouraging her husband in
habits
of idleness.
Poor Rip was at last reduced almost to
despair
;
and his only alternative to escape from
the labour of the farm and the clamour of his
wife, was to take gun in hand, and stroll away
into the woods. Here he would sometimes
seat himself at the foot of a tree, and share the
contents of his wallet with Wolf, with whom
he sympathised as a fellow sufferer in
persecution
.
Poor Wolf, he would say, thy
mistress
leads thee a digs' life of it; but never mind,
my lad, while I live thou shalt never want a
friend to stand by thee! Wolf would wag his
tail, look wistfully in his master's face, and if
dogs can feel pity, I verily believe he
reciprocated
the sentiment with all his heart.
In a long ramble of the kind on a fine
autumnal
day, Rip had unconsciously scrambled
to one of the highest parts of the Kaatskill
mountains. He was after his favourite sport
of squirrel shooting, and the still solitudes had
echoed and re-echoed with the reports of his
gun. Panting and fatigued, he threw himself,
late in the afternoon, on a green knoll, covered
with mountain herbage, that crowned the brow
of a precipice. From an opening between the
trees, he could overlook all the lower country
for many a mile of rich woodland. He saw at
a distance the lordly Hudson, far, far below
him, moving on its silent but majestic course,
the reflection of a purple cloud, or the sail of a
lagging bark, here and there sleeping on its
glassy bosom, and at last losing itself in the blue
highlands.
On the other side he looked down into a deep
mountain glen, wild, lonely, and shagged, the
bottom filled with fragments from the
impending
cliffs, and scarcely lighted by the reflected
rays of the setting sun. For some time Rip lay
musing on this scene, evening was gradually
advancing, the mountains began to throw their
long blue shadows over the valleys, he saw that
it would be dark long before he could reach the
village, and he heaved a heavy sigh when he
thought of encountering the terrors of Dame
Van Winkle.
As he was about to descend, he heard a voice
from a distance, hallooing, Rip Van Winkle!
Rip Van Winkle! He looked around, but
could see nothing but a crow winging its
solitary
flight across the mountain. He thought
his fancy must have deceived him, and turned
again to descend, when he heard the same cry
ring through the still evening air; Rip Van
Winkle! Rip Van Winkle!at the same time
Wolf bristled up his back, and giving a low
growl, skulked to his master's side, looking
fearfully down into the glen. Rip now felt a
vague apprehension stealing over him; he
looked
anxiously in the same direction, and perceived
a strange figure slowly toiling up the rocks, and
bending under the weight of something he
carried
on his back. He was surprised to see any
human being in this lonely and unfrequented
place, but supposing it to be some one of the
neighbourhood in need of his assistance, he
hastened
down to yield it.
On nearer approach, he was still more
surprised
at the singularity of the stranger's
appearance
.
He was a short square built old fellow,
with thick bushy hair, and a grizzled beard.
His dress was of the antique Dutch fashiona
cloth jerkin strapped round the waistseveral
pair of breeches, the outer one of ample volume,
decorated with rows of buttons down the sides,
and bunches at the knees. He bore on his
shoulder a stout keg, that seemed full of liquor,
and made signs for Rip to approach and assist
him with the load. Though rather shy and
distrustful
of this new acquaintance, Rip complied
with his usual alacrity, and mutually relieving
each other, they clambered up a narrow gully,
apparently the dry bed of a mountain torrent.
As they ascended, Rip every now and then
heard long rolling peals, like distant thunder,
10
that seemed to issue out of a deep ravine, or
rather cleft between lofty rocks, toward which
their rugged path conducted. He paused for
an instant, but supposing it to be the muttering
of one of those transient thunder showers which
often take place in mountain heights, he
proceeded
.
Passing through the ravine, they came
to a hollow, like a small amphitheatre,
surrounded
by perpendicular precipices, over the brinks
of which impending trees shot their branches,
so that you only caught glimpses of the azure
sky, and the bright evening cloud. During the
whole time, Rip and his companion had
laboured
on in silence; for though the former
marvelled
greatly what could be the object of carrying
a keg of liquor up this wild mountain, yet there
was something strange and incomprehensible
about the unknown, that inspired awe, and
checked familiarity.
On entering the amphitheatre, new objects of
wonder presented themselves. On a level spot
in the centre was a company of odd-looking
personages playing at nine-pins. They were
dressed in a quaint, outlandish fashion: some
wore short doublets, others jerkins, with long
knives in their belts, and most had enormous
breeches, of similar style with that of the guide's.
Their visages, too, were peculiar: one had a
large head, broad face, and small piggish eyes;
the face of another seemed to consist entirely of
nose, and was surmounted by a white sugarloaf
hat, set off with a little red cockstail. They all
had beards, of various shapes and colours.
There was one who seemed to be the
commander
.
He was a stout old gentleman, with
a weather-beaten countenance; he wore a laced
doublet, broad belt and hanger, high crowned
hat and feather, red stockings, and high heeled
shoes, with roses in them. The whole group
reminded Rip of the figures in an old Flemish
painting, in the parlour of Dominie Van Schaick,
the village person, and which had been brought
over from Holland at the time of the
settlement
.
What seemed particularly odd to Rip, was,
that though these folks were evidently amusing
themselves, yet they maintained the gravest
faces, the most mysterious silence, and were,
withal, the most melancholy party of pleasure
he had ever witnessed. Nothing interrupted the
stillness of the scene, but the noise of the balls,
which, whenever they were rolled, echoed along
the mountains like rumbling peals of thunder.
As Rip and his companion approached them,
they suddenly desisted from their play, and
stared at him with such fixed statue-like gaze,
and such strange, uncouth, lack lustre
countenances
,
that his heart turned within him, and
his knees smote together. His companion now
emptied the contents of the keg into large flagons,
and made signs to him to wait upon the
company
.
He obeyed with fear and trembling; they
quaffed the liquor in profound silence, and then
returned to their game.
By degrees, Rip's awe and apprehension
subsided
.
He even ventured, when no eye was
fixed upon him, to taste the beverage, which he
found had much of the flavour of excellent
Hollands. He was naturally a thirsty soul, and
was soon tempted to repeat the draught. One
taste provoked another, and he reiterated his
visits to the flagon so often, that at length his
senses were overpowered, his eyes swam in his
head, his head gradually declined, and he fell
into a deep sleep.
On awaking, he found himself on the green
knoll from whence he had first seen the old man
of the glen. He rubbed his eyesit was a
bright sunny morning. The birds were
hopping
and twittering among the bushes, and the
eagle was wheeling aloft, and breasting the pure
mountain breeze. Surely, thought Rip, I
have not slept here all night. He recalled the
occurrences before he fell asleep. The strange
man with the keg of liquorthe mountain
ravine
the
wild retreat among the rocksthe
wo-begone party at nine-pinsthe flagon
Oh! that flagon! that wicked flagon!
thought Ripwhat excuse shall I make to
Dame Van Winkle?
He looked round for his gun, but in place of
the clean well-oiled fowling-piece, he found an
old firelock lying by him, the barrel encrusted
with rust, the lock falling off, and the stock
worm-eaten. He now suspected that the grave
roysters of the mountain had put a trick upon
him, and having dosed him with liquor, had
robbed
him of his gun. Wolf, too, had
disappeared
,
but he might have strayed away after a
squirrel or partridge. He whistled after him,
shouted his name, but all in vain; the echoes
repeated his whistle and shout, but no dog was
to be seen.
He determined to revisit the scene of the
last evening's gambol, and if he met with any
of the party, to demand his dog and gun. As
he arose to walk he found himself stiff in
the joints, and wanting in his usual activity.
These mountain beds do not agree with me,
thought Rip, and if this frolick should lay
me up with a fit of the rheumatism, I shall
have a blessed time with Dame Van Winkle.
With some difficulty he got down into the glen:
he found the gully up which he and his
companion
had ascended the preceding evening,
but to his astonishment a mountain stream was
now foaming down it, leaping from rock to
rock, and filling the glen with babbling
murmurs
.
He, however, made shift to scramble up
its sides, working his toilsome way through
thickets of birch, sassafras, and witch hazle,
and sometimes tripped up or entangled by the
wild grape vines that twisted their coils and
tendrils from tree to tree, and spread a kind of
network in his path.
At length he reached to where the ravine had
opened through the cliffs, to the amphitheatre;
but no traces of such opening remained. The
rocks presented a high impenetrable wall, over
which the torrent came tumbling in a sheet of
feathery foam, and fell into a broad deep basin,
black from the shadows of the surrounding
forest
.
Here, then, poor Rip was brought to a
stand. He again called and whistled after his
dog; he was only answered by the cawing of
a flock of idle crows, sporting high in air about
a dry tree that overhung a sunny precipice; and
who, secure in their elevation, seemed to look
down and scoff at the poor man's perplexities.
What was to be done? the morning was
passing away, and Rip felt famished for his
breakfast. He grieved to give up his dog and
gun; he dreaded to meet his wife; but it would
not do to starve among the mountains. He
shook his head, shouldered the rusty firelock,
and, with a heart full of trouble and anxiety,
turned his steps homeward.
As he approached the village, he met a
number
of people, but none that he knew, which
somewhat surprised him, for he had thought
himself acquainted with every one in the
country
round. Their dress, too, was of a different
fashion from that to which he was accustomed.
They all stared at him with equal marks of
surprise
,
and whenever they cast eyes upon him,
invariably stroked their chins. The constant
recurrence of this gesture, induced Rip,
involuntarily
,
to do the same, when, to his
astonishment
,
he found his beard had grown a
foot long!
He had now entered the skirts of the village.
A troop of strange children ran at his heels,
hooting after him, and pointing at his gray
beard. The dogs, too, not one of which he
recognized for his old acquaintances, barked at
him as he passed. The very village seemed
altered
:
it was larger and more populous. There
were rows of houses which he had never seen
before, and those which had been his familiar
haunts had disappeared. Strange names were
over the doorsstrange faces at the windows
every thing was strange. His mind now began to
misgive him, that both he and the world around
him were bewitched. Surely this was his
native
village, which he had left but the day before.
There stood the Kaatskill mountainsthere ran
the silver Hudson at a distancethere was every
hill and dale precisely as it had always been
Rip was sorely perplexedThat flagon last
night, thought he, has addled my poor head
sadly!
It was with some difficulty he found the way
to his own house, which he approached with
silent awe, expecting every moment to hear the
11
shrill voice of Dame Van Winkle. He found
the house gone to decaythe roof fallen in, the
windows shattered, and the doors off the hinges.
A half starved dog, that looked like Wolf, was
skulking about it. Rip called him by name, but
the cur snarled, showed his teeth, and passed on.
This was an unkind cut indeedMy very
dog, sighed poor Rip, has forgotten me!
He entered the house, which, to tell the truth,
Dame Van Winkle had always kept in neat
order. It was empty, forlorn, and apparently
abandoned. This desolateness overcame all his
connubial fearshe called loudly for his wife
and childrenthe lonely chambers rung for a
moment with his voice, and then all again was
silence.
He now hurried forth, and hastened to his old
resort, the little village innbut it too was gone.
A large ricketty wooden building stood in its
place, with great gaping windows, some of them
broken, and mended with old hats and petticoats,
and over the door was painted, The Union
Hotel, by Jonathan Doolittle. Instead of the
great tree that used to shelter the quiet little
Dutch inn of yore, there now was reared a tall
naked pole, with something on top that looked
like a red night cap, and from it was fluttering
a flag, on which was a singular assemblage of
stars and stripesall this was strange and
incomprehensible
.
He recognised on the sign,
however, the ruby face of King George, under
which he had smoked so many a peaceful pipe,
but even this was singularly metamorphosed.
The red coat was changed for one of blue and
buff, a sword was stuck in the hand instead of a
sceptre, the head was decorated with a cocked
hat, and underneath was painted in large
characters
,
General Washington
.
There was, as usual, a crowd of folk about
the door, but none that Rip recollected. The
very character of the people seemed changed.
There was a busy, bustling, disputatious tone
about it, instead of the accustomed phlegm and
drowsy tranquillity. He looked in vain for the
sage Nicholas Vedder, with his broad face,
double chin, and fair long pipe, uttering clouds
of tobacco smoke instead of idle speeches; or
Van Bummel, the schoolmaster, doling forth the
contents of an ancient newspaper. In place of
these, a lean bilious looking fellow, with his
pockets full of handbills, was haranguing
vehemently
about rights of citizenselection
members of congresslibertyBunker's hill
heroes of seventy-sixand other words, that
were a perfect Babylonish jargon to the
bewildered
Van Winkle.
The appearance of Rip, with his long
grizzled
beard, his rusty fowling piece, his uncouth
dress, and the army of women and children that
had gathered at his heels, soon attracted the
attention
of the tavern politicians. They crowded
around him, eyeing him from head to foot, with
great curiosity. The orator bustled up to him,
and drawing him partly aside, inquired which
side he voted? Rip stared in vacant stupidity.
Another short but busy little fellow pulled him
by the arm, and raising on tiptoe, inquired in
his ear, whether he was Federal or
Democrat
.
Rip was equally at a loss to comprehend
the question; when a knowing, self-important
old gentleman, in a sharp cocked hat, made his
way through the crowd, putting them to the
right and left with his elbows as he passed, and
planting himself before Van Winkle, with one
arm akimbo, the other resting on his cane, his
keen eyes and sharp hat penetrating, as it were,
into his very soul, demanded, in an austere tone,
what brought him to the election with a gun
on his shoulder, and a mob at his heels, and
whether he meant to breed a riot in the village?
Alas! gentlemen, cried Rip, somewhat
dismayed
,
I am a poor quiet man, a native of the
place, and a loyal subject of the King, God bless
him!
Here a general shout burst from the
by-standers
A
tory! a tory! a spy! a refugee!
hustle him! away with him! It was with
great difficulty that the self-important man in
the cocked hat restored order; and having
assumed
a tenfold austerity of brow, demanded
again of the unknown culprit, what he came
there for, and whom he was seeking. The
poor man humbly assured them that he meant
no harm; but merely came there in search of
some of his neighbours, who used to keep about
the tavern.
Wellwho are they?name them.
Rip bethought himself a moment, and
inquired
,
where's Nicholas Vedder?
There was a silence for a little while, when
an old man replied, in a thin piping voice,
Nicholas
Vedder? why he is dead and gone these
eighteen years! There was a wooden
tombstone
in the church yard that used to tell all
about him, but that's rotted and gone too.
Where's Brom Dutcher?
Oh he went off to the army in the
beginning
of the war; some say he was killed at the
battle of Stoney-Pointothers say he was
drowned in a squall, at the foot of Antony's
Nose. I don't knowhe never came back
again.
Where's Van Bummel, the schoolmaster?
He went off to the wars too, was a great
militia general, and is now in Congress.
Rip's heart died away, at hearing of these
sad changes in his home and friends, and
finding
himself thus alone in the world. Every
answer
puzzled him, too, by treating of such
enormous lapses of time, and of matters which
he could not understand: warcongress
Stoney-Point
;he
had no courage to ask after any
more friends, but cried out in despair, does
nobody here know Rip Van Winkle?
Oh, Rip Van Winkle! exclaimed two or
three, Oh, to be sure! that's Rip Van Winkle
yonder, leaning against the tree.
Rip looked, and beheld a precise counterpart
of himself, as he went up the mountain:
apparently
as lazy, and certainly as ragged. The
poor fellow was now completely confounded.
He doubted his own identity, and whether he
was himself or another man. In the midst of
his bewilderment, the man in the cocked hat
demanded who he was, and what was his
name?
God knows, exclaimed he, at his wit's
end; I'm not myselfI'm somebody else
that's me yondernothat's somebody else,
got into my shoesI was myself last night,
but I fell asleep on the mountain, and they've
changed my gun, and every thing's changed,
and I'm changed, and I can't tell what's my
name, or who I am!
The bystanders began now to look at each
other, nod, wink significantly, and tap their
fingers against their foreheads. There was a
whisper, also, about securing the gun, and
keeping the old fellow from doing mischief.
At the very suggestion of which, the
self-important
man in the cocked hat retired with
some precipitation. At this critical moment a
fresh likely woman pressed through the throng
to get a peep at the graybearded man. She
had a chubby child in her arms, which,
frightened
at his looks, began to cry. Hush, Rip,
cried she, hush, you little fool, the old man
wont hurt you. The name of the child, the
air of the mother, the tone of her voice, all
awakened a train of recollections in his mind.
What is your name, my good woman?
asked
he.
Judith Gardenier.
And your father's name?
Ah, poor man, his name was Rip Van
Winkle; it's twenty years since he went away
from home with his gun, and never has been
heard of sincehis dog came home without
him; but whether he shot himself, or was
carried
away by the Indians, nobody can tell. I
was then but a little girl.
Rip had but one question more to ask; but
he put it with a faltering voice:
Where's your mother?
Oh, she too had died but a short time since;
she broke a blood vessel in a fit of passion at a
New-England pedlar.
There was a drop of comfort, at least, in this
intelligence. The honest man could contain
himself no longer.He caught his daughter and
her child in his arms.I am your father!
cried heYoung Rip Van Winkle onceold
12
Rip Van Winkle now!Does nobody know
poor Rip Van Winkle!
All stood amazed, until an old woman,
tottering
out from among the crowd, put her hand
to her brow, and peering under it in his face for
a moment, exclaimed, Sure enough! it is Rip
Van Winkleit is himself. Welcome home
again, old neighbourWhy, where have you
been these twenty long years?
Rip's story was soon told, for the whole
twenty years had been to him but as one night.
The neighbours stared when they heard it;
some were seen to wink at each other, and put
their tongues in their cheeks; and the
self-important
man in the cocked hat, who, when the
alarm was over, had returned to the field,
screwed
down the corners of his mouth, and shook
his headupon which there was a general
shaking of the head throughout the assemblage.
It was determined, however, to take the
opinion
of old Peter Vanderdonk, who was seen
slowly advancing up the road. He was a
descendant
of the historian of that name, who wrote one
of the earliest accounts of the province. Peter
was the most ancient inhabitant of the village,
and well versed in all the wonderful events and
traditions of the neighbourhood. He recollected
Rip at once, and corroborated his story in the
most satisfactory manner. He assured the
company
that it was a fact, handed down from his
ancestor the historian, that the Kaatskill
mountains
had always been haunted by strange beings.
That it was affirmed that the great Hendrick
Hudson, the first discoverer of the river and
country, kept a kind of vigil there every twenty
years, with his crew of the Half-moon, being
permitted in this way to revisit the scenes of his
enterprize, and keep a guardian eye upon the
river, and the great city called by his name.
That his father had once seen them in their old
Dutch dresses playing at nine pins in a hollow
of the mountain; and that he himself had heard,
one summer afternoon, the sound of their balls,
like long peals of thunder.
To make a long story short, the company
broke up, and returned to the more important
concerns of the election. Rip's daughter took
him home to live with her; she had a snug,
well-furnished house, and a stout cheery farmer
for a husband, whom Rip recollected for one of
the urchins that used to climb upon his back.
As to Rip's son and heir, who was the ditto of
himself, seen leaning against the tree, he was
employed to work on the farm; but evinced an
hereditary disposition to attend to any thing
else but his business.
Rip now resumed his old walks and habits;
he soon found many of his former cronies,
though all rather the worse for the wear and
tear of time; and preferred making friends
among the rising generation, with whom he
soon grew into great favour.
Having nothing to do at home, and being
arrived
at that happy age when a man can do
nothing
with impunity, he took his place once
more on the bench, at the inn door, and was
reverenced as one of the patriarchs of the
village
,
and a chronicle of the old times before
the war. It was some time before he could
get into the regular track of gossip, or could be
made to comprehend the strange events that
had taken place during his torpor. How that
there had been a revolutionary warthat the
country had thrown off the yoke of old
England
and
that, instead of being a subject of his
Majesty George the Third, he was now a free
citizen of the United States. Rip, in fact, was
no politician; the changes of states and empires
made but little impression on him. But there was
one species of despotism under which he had
long groaned, and that waspetticoat
government
.
Happily, that was at an end; he had got
his neck out of the yoke of matrimony, and
could go in and out whenever he pleased,
without
dreading the tyranny of Dame Van Winkle.
Whenever her name was mentioned, however,
he shook his head, shrugged his shoulders, and
cast up his eyes; which might pass either for
an expression of resignation to his fate, or joy
at his deliverance.
He used to tell his story to every stranger that
arrived at Mr. Doolittle's hotel. He was
observed
,
at first, to vary on some points every time
he told it, which was, doubtless, owing to his
having so recently awaked. It at last settled
down precisely to the tale I have related, and
not a man, woman, or child in the
neighbourhood
,
but knew it by heart. Some always
pretended
to doubt the reality of it, and insisted
that Rip had been out of his head, and that this
was one point on which he always remained
flighty. The old Dutch inhabitants, however,
almost universally gave it full credit. Even to
this day they never hear a thunder storm of a
summer afternoon, about the Kaatskill, but they
say Hendrick Hudson and his crew are at their
game of nine pins; and it is a common wish of
all henpecked husbands in the neighbourhood,
when life hangs heavy on their hands, that they
might have a quieting draught out of Rip Van
Winkle's flagon.ENGLISH WRITERS
ON
AMERICA.
Methinks I see in my mind a noble and puissant nation, rousing
herself, like a strong man after sleep, and shaking her invincible
locks: methinks I see her as an eagle, mewing her mighty youth,
and kindling her endazzled eyes at the full mid-day beam.
Milton on the Liberty of the Press
.
It
is with feelings of deep regret that I have
noticed the literary animosity daily growing up
between England and America. Great
curiosity
has been awakened of late with respect to
the United States, and the London press has
teemed with volumes of travels through the
republic
;
but they seem intended to diffuse error
rather than knowledge; and so successful have
they been, that, notwithstanding the constant
intercourse between the nations, there is none
concerning which the great mass of the British
people have less pure information, or more
prejudices
.
English travellers are the best and the worst
in the world. Where no motives of pride or
interest intervene, none can equal them for
profound
and philosophical views of society, or
faithful and graphical descriptions of external
objects; but when the interests or reputation
of their own nation come in collision with
those of another, they go to the opposite
extreme
,
and forget their usual probity and
candour
,
in the indulgence of spleen, and an
illiberal
spirit of ridicule.
Hence, their travels are more honest and
accurate
,
the more remote the country described.
I would place implicit confidence in an
Englishman's
description of the regions beyond the
cataracts
of the Nile; of unknown islands in the
Yellow Sea; of the interior of Africa; or of
any other tract which other travellers might be
apt to picture out with the illusions of their
fancies; but I would cautiously receive his
account
of his immediate neighbours, and of
those nations with which he is in habits of
most frequent intercourse. However I might
be disposed to trust his probity, I dare not
trust his prejudices.
But it has been the peculiar lot of our
country
,
to be visited by the worst kind of English
travellers. While men of philosophical spirit
and cultivated minds have been envoys from
England to ransack the poles, to penetrate the
deserts, and to study the manners and customs
of barbarous nations, with which she can have
no permanent intercourse of profit or
pleasure
;
it is left to the broken down tradesman,
the scheming adventurer, the wandering
mechanic
,
the Manchester and Birmingham agent,
to be her oracles respecting Americato treat
of a country in a singular state of moral and
physical development; where one of the
greatest
political experiments in the history of the
world is now performing, and which presents
the most profound and momentous studies for
the statesman and the philosopher.
That such men should give prejudiced
accounts
of America is not a matter of surprise.
The themes it offers for contemplation are too
vast and elevated for their capacities. The
national
character is yet in a state of
fermentation
:
it may have its frothiness and sediment,
but its ingredients are sound and wholesome;
it has already given proofs of powerful and
generous
qualities, and the whole promises to
settle
down into something substantially excellent.
But the causes that are operating to strengthen
and ennoble it, and its daily indications of
admirable
properties, are all lost upon these
purblind
observers, who are only affected by the
little asperities incident to its present situation.
They are capable of judging only of the surface
of things; of those matters which come in
contact
with their private interests and
gratifications
.
They miss some of the snug
conveniences
and petty comforts which belong to an
old, highly finished, and over-populous state of
society, where the ranks of useful labour are
crowded, and many make a painful and servile
14
subsistence, by studying the very caprices of
appetite and self indulgence. These minor
comforts
,
however, are all-important in the
estimation
of narrow minds; and they either do not
perceive, or will not acknowledge, that they are
more than counterbalanced among us, by great
and generally diffused blessings.
Or, perhaps, they have been disappointed in
some unreasonable expectation of sudden gain.
They may have pictured America to themselves
an El Dorado, where gold and silver
abounded
,
and the natives were lacking in sagacity.
Where they were to become strangely and
suddenly
rich, in some unforeseen, but easy
manner
.
The same weakness of mind that indulges
absurd expectations, produces petulance in
disappointment
.
They become embittered against
the country on finding that there, as every where
else, a man must sow before he can reap; that
he must win wealth by industry and talent;
and must compete with the common difficulties
of nature, and the shrewdness of an intelligent
and enterprising people.
Or, perhaps, through mistake, or ill-directed
hospitality, or the prompt disposition to cheer
and countenance the stranger, prevalent among
my countrymen, they may have been treated
with unwonted respect in America; and,
accustomed
all their lives to consider themselves
many strata below the surface of society, and
brought up in a servile feeling of inferiority,
they become arrogant on the common boon of
civility; they attribute to the lowliness of others
their own elevation; and underrate a society
where there are no artificial distinctions, and
where, by any chance, such individuals as
themselves can rise to consequence.
One would suppose, however, that
information
coming from such sources, on a subject
where the truth is so desirable, would be
received
with caution by the censors of the press.
That the motives of these men, their veracity,
their opportunities of inquiry and observation,
and their capacities for judging correctly, would
be rigorously scrutinized, before their evidence
was admitted, in such sweeping extent, against
a kindred nation. The very reverse, however,
is the case, and it furnishes a striking instance
of human inconsistency. Nothing can surpass
the vigilance with which English critics will
test the credibility of the traveller who
publishes
an account of some distant, and
comparatively
unimportant, country. How warily
will they compare the measurements of a
pyramid
,
or the descriptions of a ruin, and how
sternly will they censure any discrepancy in
these contributions of merely curious
knowledge
;
while they will receive, with eagerness
and unhesitating faith, the gross
misrepresentations
of coarse and obscure writers,
concerning
a country with which their own is placed
in the most important and delicate relations.
Nay, what is worse, they will make these
apocryphal
volumes text books, on which to enlarge,
with a zeal and an ability worthy of a more
generous cause.
I shall not, however, dwell on this irksome
and hackneyed topic; nor should I have
adverted
to it, but for the undue interest
apparently
taken in it by my countrymen, and certain
injurious effects which I apprehended it might
produce upon the national feeling. We attach
too much consequence to these-attacks. They
cannot do us any essential injury. The tissue
of misrepresentations attempted to be woven
round us, are like cobwebs wove round the
limbs of an infant giant. Our country
continually
outgrows them. One falsehood after
another falls off of itself. We have but to live
on, and every day we live a whole volume of
refutation. All the writers of England, united,
cannot conceal our rapidly-growing importance
and matchless prosperity. They cannot
conceal
that these are owing, not merely to
physical
and local, but to moral causes. To the
political liberty, the general diffusion of
knowledge
,
the prevalence of sound moral and
religious
principles, that give force and sustained
energy to the character of a people; and
which, in fact, have been the acknowledged
and wonderful supporters of their own national
power and glory.
But why are we so exquisitely alive to the
aspersions of England? Why do we suffer
ourselves to be so affected by the contumely she
has endeavoured to cast upon us? It is not in
the opinion of England alone that honour lives,
and reputation has its being. The world at
large is the arbiter of a nation's fame: with its
thousand eyes it witnesses a nation's deeds, and
from their collective testimony is national glory
or disgrace established.
For ourselves, therefore, it is comparatively
of but little importance whether England do us
justice or not: it is, perhaps, of far more
importance
to herself. She is instilling anger and
resentment into the bosom of a youthful
nation
,
to grow with its growth, and strengthen
with its strength. If in America, as some of
her writers are labouring to convince her, she is
hereafter to find an invidious rival, and a
gigantic
foe, she may thank those very writers
for having provoked that rivalship, and
irritated
that hostility. Every one knows the
all-pervading
influence of literature at the present
day, and how completely the opinions and
passions
of mankind are under its control. The
mere contests of the sword are temporary; their
wounds are but in the flesh, and it is the pride
of the generous to forgive and forget them;
but the slanders of the pen pierce to the heart;
they rankle most sorely and permanently in the
noblest spirits; they dwell ever present in the
mind, and make it morbidly sensitive to the
most trifling collision. It is not so much any
one overt act that produces hostilities between
two nations; there exists, most commonly, a
previous jealousy and ill will, a predisposition
to take offence. Trace these to their cause,
and how often will they be found to originate
in the mischievous effusions of writers, who,
secure in their closets, and for ignominious
bread, concoct and circulate the venom that is
to inflame the generous and the brave.
I am not laying too much stress upon this
point; for it applies most emphatically to our
particular case. Over no nation does the press
hold a more absolute control than over the
people
of America; for the universal education of
the poorest classes makes every individual a
reader. There is nothing published in England
on the subject of our country, that does not
circulate
through every part of it. There is not a
calumny dropt from an English pen, nor an
unworthy
sarcasm uttered by an English
statesman
,
that does not go to blight good will, and
add to the mass of latent resentment.
Possessing
,
then, as England does, the fountain head
from whence the literature of the language flows,
how completely is it in her power, and how
truly is it her duty, to make it the medium of
amiable and magnanimous feelinga stream
where the two nations might meet together, and
drink in peace and kindness. Should she,
however
,
persist in turning it to waters of bitterness,
the time may come when she may repent her
folly. The present friendship of America may
be of but little moment to her; but the future
destinies of that country do not admit of a doubt:
over those of England there lower some shadows
of uncertainty. Should, then, a day of gloom
arrive; should those reverses overtake her, from
which the proudest empires have not been
exempt
,
she may look back with regret at her
infatuation, in repulsing from her side a nation
she might have grappled to her bosom, and thus
destroying her only chance for real friendship
beyond the boundaries of her own dominions.
There is a general impression in England,
that the people of the United States are inimical
to the parent country. It is one of the errors
that has been diligently propagated by designing
writers. There is, doubtless, considerable
political
hostility, and a general soreness at the
illiberality
of the English press; but, collectively
speaking, the prepossessions of the people are
strongly in favour of England. Indeed, at one
time they amounted, in many parts of the union,
to a degree of bigotry that was absurd. The
bare name of Englishman was a passport to
the confidence and hospitality of every family,
and too often gave a transient currency to the
worthless and the ungrateful. Throughout the
country there was something of enthusiasm
connected
15
with the idea of England. We looked
to it with a hallowed feeling of tenderness and
veneration, as the land of our forefathersthe
august repository of the monuments and
antiquities
of our racethe birth-place and
mausoleum
of the sages and heroes of our paternal
history. After our own country, there was none
in whose glory we more delightednone whose
good opinion we were more anxious of
possessing
none
toward whom our hearts
yearned
with such throbbings of warm
consanguinity
.
Even during the late war, whenever there
was the least opportunity for kind feelings to
spring forth, it was the delight of the generous
spirits of the country to show that, in the midst
of hostilities, they still kept alive the sparks of
future friendship.
Is all this to be at an end? Is this golden
band of kindred sympathies, so rare between
nations, to be broken forever?Perhaps it is
for the bestit may dispel an illusion which
might have kept us in mental vassalage,
interfered
occasionally with our true interests, and
prevented the growth of proper national pride.
But it is hard to give up the kindred tie! and
there are feelings dearer than interestcloser
to the heart than pridethat will still make us
cast back a look of regret, as we wander
farther
and farther from the paternal roof, and
lament the waywardness of the parent, that
would not permit the affections of the child.
But however short-sighted and injudicious
may be the conduct of England in this system
of aspersion, recrimination on our part would
be equally ill-judged. I speak not of a prompt
and spirited vindication of our country, or the
keenest castigation of her slanderersbut I
allude
to a disposition to retaliate in kind, to
retort
sarcasm and inspire prejudice, which seems
to be spreading widely among our writers. Let
us guard particularly against such a temper, for
it would double the injury, instead of redressing
it. Nothing is so easy and inviting as the retort
of abuse and sarcasm; but it is a paltry and
unprofitable contest. It is the alternative of a
morbid mind, fretted into petulance, rather than
warmed into indignation. If England is
willing
to permit the mean jealousies of trade, or
the rancorous animosities of politics, to deprave
the integrity of her press, and poison the
fountain
of public opinion, let us not follow her
example
.
She may deem it her interest to diffuse
error, and engender antipathy, for the purpose
of checking emigration; we have no purpose
of the kind to serve. Neither can we have any
spirit of national jealousy to gratify, for as yet,
in all our rivalships with England, we are the
rising and the gaining party. There can be no
end to answer, therefore, but the gratification of
resentmenta mere spirit of retaliation. But
even that is impotent. Our retorts are never
republished in England; and fall short,
therefore
,
of their aim; but they foster a querulous
and peevish temper among our writers; they
sour the sweet flow of our early literature, and
sow thorns and brambles among its blossoms;
but what is still worse, they circulate over our
own country, and, as far as they have effect,
produce virulent national prejudices. This last
is the evil most especially to be deprecated.
Governed, as we are, entirely by public
opinion
,
the utmost care should be taken to
preserve
the purity of the public mind.
Knowledge
is power, and truth is knowledge;
whoever
,
therefore, knowingly propagates a
prejudice
,
wilfully saps the foundation of his
country's
strength.
Republicans, above all other men, should be
characterized by candour and clearness of
thinking
.
They are, individually, portions of the
sovereign
mind and sovereign will, and should be
enabled to come to all questions of national
concern with calm unbiassed judgments. From
the peculiar nature of our relations with
England
,
also, we must have more frequent
questions
of a difficult and delicate character arising
between us than with any other nation;
questions
that affect the most acute and excitable
feelings: and as these must ultimately be
determined
by popular sentiment, we cannot be
too anxiously attentive to purify it from all
latent
passion or prepossession.
Opening too, as we do, an asylum for all
nations
of the earth, we should receive them
all-with
impartiality. It should be our pride to
exhibit an example of one nation at least,
destitute
of national antipathies, and exercising, not
merely the overt acts of hospitality, but those
more rare and noble courtesies which spring
from liberality of opinion.
Indeed, what have we to do with national
prejudices? They are the inveterate diseases of
old countries, that have crept into their habits
of thinking in rude and ignorant ages, when
nations
knew but little of each other, and looked
beyond their own boundaries with distrust and
hostility. But we have sprung into national
existence in an enlightened and philosophic
age, when the different parts of the habitable
world, and the various branches of the human
family, have been indefatigably studied and
made known to each other; and we discredit
the advantages of our birth, if we do not shake
off the national prejudices, as we would the local
superstitions, of the old world.
But above all, let us not be influenced by any
angry feelings, so far as to shut our eyes to the
perception of what is really excellent and
amiable
in the English character. We are a young
people, and an imitative one, and will form
ourselves
upon the older nations of Europe. There
is no country so worthy of our study as
England
.
The spirit of her constitution is most
analogous to ours. The manners of her
people
their
intellectual activitytheir freedom
of opiniontheir habits of thinking on all
subjects
that concern the dearest interests and most
sacred charities of private life, are all most
congenial
to the American character; and, in fact,
are most worthy in themselves: for it is in the
moral feeling of the people that the deep
foundations
of British prosperity are laid; and
however
the superstructure may be time-worn, or
overrun by abuses, there must be something solid
in its basis, and admirable in its materials, to
uphold
it so long unshaken by the tempests of the
world.
It should be the endeavour of our writers,
therefore, discarding all feelings of irritation,
and disdaining to be affected by the illiberality
of British authors, to speak of the nation
dispassionately
,
and with determined candour.
While they rebuke the indiscriminating bigotry
with which some of their countrymen admire
and imitate every thing English, merely because
it is English, they should point out what is really
worthy of approbation. We may thus place
England before us as a perpetual volume of
reference
,
wherein the sound deductions of ages
of experience are recorded; and while we avoid
the errors and absurdities which may have
crept into the page, we may draw from thence
golden maxims of practical wisdom, wherewith
to strengthen and embellish our national
character
.
RURAL LIFE
IN
ENGLAND.
Oh! friendly to the best pursuits of man,
Friendly to thought, to virtue, and to peace,
Domestic life in rural pleasure pass'd!
Cowper
.
The
stranger who would form a correct
opinion
of the English character, must not confine
his observations to the metropolis. He must
go forth into the country; he must sojourn in
villages and hamlets; he must visit castles,
villas, farm houses, cottages; he must
wander
through parks and gardens; along hedges
and green lanes; he must loiter about country
churches; attend wakes and fairs, and other
rural festivals; and cope with the people in all
their conditions, and all their habits and
humours
.
In some countries, the large cities absorb the
wealth and fashion of the nation; they are the
only fixed abodes of elegant and intelligent
society
,
and the country is inhabited almost
entirely
by boorish peasantry. In England, on
the contrary, the metropolis is a mere gathering
place, or general rendezvous, of the polite
circles
,
where they devote a small portion of the
year to a hurry of gayety and dissipation, and
having passed this kind of carnival, return
again to the apparently more congenial habits
of rural life. The various strata of society,
therefore, are diffused over the whole surface of
the kingdom, and the most retired
neighbourhoods
afford specimens of the different ranks.
The English, in fact, are strongly gifted with
the rural feeling. They possess a keen
sensibility
to the beauties of nature, and a relish for
the pleasures and employments of the country.
This passion seems inherent with them. Even
the inhabitants of cities, born and brought up
among brick walls and bustling streets, enter
with facility into rural habits, and evince a tact
for rural occupation. The merchant has his
snug retreat in the vicinity of the metropolis,
where he often displays as much pride and zeal
in the cultivation of his flower garden, and the
maturing of his fruits, as he does in the conduct
of his business, and the success of a
commercial
operation. Even those less fortunate
individuals
,
who are doomed to pass their lives in
the midst of din and traffick, contrive to have
something that shall remind them of the green
aspect of nature. In the dark and dingy lanes
of the metropolis, every drawing room window
is like a bank of flowers; wherever, also, there
is a spot capable of vegetation, the grass plot
and flower bed are cultivated, and every square
has its mimic park, laid out with picturesque
taste, and gleaming with refreshing verdure.
Those who see the Englishman only in
town, are apt to form an unfavourable opinion
of his social character. He is either absorbed
in business, or distracted by the thousand
engagements
that dissipate time, thought, and
feeling, in this huge metropolis. He has,
therefore, too commonly, a look of hurry and
abstraction. Wherever he happens to be, he is
on the point of going somewhere else; at the
moment he is talking on one subject, his mind
is wandering to another; and while paying a
friendly visit, is calculating how he shall
economize
time so as to pay the other visits allotted
to the morning. A vast place, like London, is
calculated to make men selfish and
uninteresting
.
In their casual and transient meetings,
they can but deal briefly in commonplaces.
They present but the cold superficies of
character
its
rich and genial qualities have no
time to be warmed into a flow.
But it is in the country that the Englishman
gives scope to his natural feelings. He breaks
loose gladly from the cold formalities and
negative
civilities of town; throws off his habits
of shy reserve, and becomes joyous and
free-hearted
.
He contrives to assemble around him
all the conveniences and elegancies of polite
life, and to banish its restraints. His country
seat abounds with every requisite, either for
studious retirement, tasteful gratification, or
rural
exercise. Books, paintings, music, horses,
dogs, and sporting implements of all kinds, are
at hand. He puts no constraint, either upon
his guests or himself, but in the true spirit of
hospitality, provides the means of enjoyment,
and leaves every one to partake according to
his inclination.
The taste of the English in the cultivation
of land, and in what is termed landscape
gardening
,
is unrivalled. They have studied
nature
intently, and discover an exquisite sense of
her beautiful forms and harmonious
combinations
.
Those charms, which, in other
countries
,
she lavishes in wild solitudes, are here
assembled round the haunts of domestic life.
They seem to have caught her coy and furtive
graces, and spread them, like witchery, about
their rural abodes.
Nothing can be more imposing than the
magnificence
of English park scenery. Vast lawns
that extend like sheets of vivid green, with here
and there clumps of gigantic trees, heaping up
rich piles of foliage. The solemn pomp of
groves, and woodland glades, with the deer
trooping in silent herds across them; the hare,
bounding away to the covert; or the pheasant,
suddenly bursting upon the wing. The brook,
taught to wind in the most natural meanderings,
or expand into a glassy lakethe
sequestered
pool, reflecting the quivering trees, with the
yellow leaf sleeping on its bosom, the trout
roaming fearlessly about its limpid waters;
while some rustic temple, or statue of nymph,
grown green and dank with age, gives an air
of classic sanctity to the seclusion.
These are but few of the features of park
scenery, which, indeed, is too well known to
need description. But what most delights me,
is the creative talent with which the English
decorate
the unostentatious abodes of middle life.
The rudest habitation, the most unpromising
and scanty portion of land, in the hands of an
Englishman of taste, becomes a little paradise.
With a nicely discriminating eye, he seizes at
once upon its capabilities, and pictures in his
17
mind the future landscape. The steril spot
grows into loveliness under his hand; and yet
the operations of art which produce the effect
are scarcely to be perceived. The cherishing
and training of some trees; the cautious
pruning
of others; the delicate distribution of
flowers and plants of tender and graceful
foliage
;
the introduction of a green slope of
velvet
turf; the partial opening to a peep of blue
distance, or silver gleam of waterall these
are managed with a nice tact, a pervading, yet
quiet assiduity, like the magic touchings with
which a painter finishes up a favourite picture.
The residence of people of fortune and
refinement
in the country has diffused a degree
of taste and elegance in rural economy, that
descends to the lowest class. The very
labourer
,
with his thatched cottage and narrow
slip of ground, attends to their embellishment.
The trim hedge, the grass plot before the door,
the little flower bed bordered with snug box,
the woodbine trained up against the wall, and
hanging its blossoms about the lattice; the pot
of flowers in the window; the holly
providentially
planted about the house, to cheat winter
of its dreariness, and throw in a gleam of green
summer to cheer the fireside:all these
bespeak
the influence of taste, flowing down
from high sources, and pervading the lowest
levels of the public mind. If ever love, as
poets sing, delights to visit a cottage, it must
be the cottage of an English peasant.
The proneness to rural life among the higher
classes of the English, has had a great and
salutary
effect upon the national character, I do
not know a finer race of men than the English
gentlemen. Instead of the softness and
effeminacy
which characterize the men of rank in
some countries, they exhibit a union of
elegance
and strength, a robustness of frame and
freshness of complexion, which I am inclined to
attribute to their living so much in the open air,
and pursuing so eagerly the invigorating
recreations
of the country. These hardy exercises
also produce a healthful tone of mind and
spirits
,
and a manliness and simplicity of
manners
,
which not even the follies and
dissipations
of the town can easily pervert. In the
country, too, the different orders of society
seem to approach more freely, to be more
disposed
to blend and operate favourably upon
each other. The distinctions between them do
not appear to be so strong and impassable as
in the cities. The manner in which property
has been distributed into small estates and
farms, has established a regular gradation from
the nobleman, through the classes of gentry,
small landed proprietors, substantial farmers,
down to the labouring peasantry; and while it
has thus banded the extremes of society
together
,
has implanted in each intermediate link
a spirit of independence. This, it must be
confessed, is not so universally the case at
present as it was formerly; the larger estates
having, in late years of distress, absorbed the
smaller, and, in some parts of the country,
almost annihilated the sturdy race of small
farmers. These, however, I believe, are but
casual breaks in the general system I have
mentioned.
In rural occupation there is nothing mean
and debasing. It leads a man forth among
scenes of natural grandeur and beauty; it
leaves him to the workings of his own mind,
operated upon by the purest and most elevating
of external influences. Such a man may be
simple and rough, but he cannot be vulgar.
The man of refinement, therefore, finds nothing
revolting in an intercourse with the lower
orders
in rural life, as he does in the lower orders
of cities. He lays aside his distance and
reserve
,
and is glad to doff the attributes of rank,
and enter into the honest heartfelt enjoyments
of common life. Indeed, the very amusements
of the country bring men more and more
together
;
and the sound of hound and horn blend
all feelings into harmony. I believe this is one
great reason why the nobility and gentry are
more popular among the inferior orders in
England
than in any other country; and why the
latter have endured so many excessive pressures
and extremities, without repining more
generally
at the unequal distribution of fortune and
privilege.
To this mingling of cultivated and rustic
society, also, may be attributed the rural feeling
that runs through British literature; the
frequent
use of illustrations from rural life; those
incomparable descriptions of nature, that abound
in the British poetsthat have continued down
from the flower and the leaf of Chaucer,
and have brought into our closets all the
freshness
and fragrance of the dewy landscape.
The pastoral writers of other countries
appear
as if they had paid nature an occasional
visit, and become acquainted with her general
charms; but the British poets have lived and
revelled with herthey have wooed her in her
most secret hauntsthey have watched her
minutest characteristics. A spray could not
tremble in the breezea leaf could not rustle to
the grounda diamond drop could not patter in
the streama fragrance could not exhale from
the humble violet, nor a daisy unfold its
crimson
tints to the morning, but it has been noticed
by these impassioned and delicate observers, and
wrought up into some beautiful morality.
The effect of this devotion of elegant minds
to rural occupations has been wonderful on the
face of the country. A great part of the island
is level, and would be monotonous, were it not
for the charms of culture; but it is studded and
gemmed, as it were, with castles and palaces,
and embroidered with parks and gardens. It
does not abound in grand and sublime prospects,
but rather in little home scenes of rural repose
and sheltered quiet. Every antique farm house
and moss-grown cottage is a picture; and as
the roads are continually winding, and the view
shut in by groves and hedges, the eye is
delighted
by a continual succession of small landscapes
of captivating loveliness.
The great charm, however, of English
scenery
is the moral feeling that seems to pervade it.
It is associated in the mind with ideas of order,
of quiet, of calm and settled principles, of hoary
usage and reverend custom. Every thing seems
to be the growth of ages of regular and
peaceful
existence. The old church of remote
architecture
,
with its low massive portal; its gothic
tower; its windows rich with tracery and
painted glass in scrupulous preservation; its
stately monuments of warriors and worthies of
the olden time, ancestors of the present lords
of the soil; its tombstones, recording
successive
generations of sturdy yeomanry, whose
progeny still plough the same fields, and kneel
at the same altar. The parsonage, a quaint
irregular pile, partly antiquated, but repaired
and altered in the tastes of various ages and
occupants. The stile and footpath leading
from the churchyard, across pleasant fields,
and along shady hedge-rows, according to an
immemorial right of way. The neighbouring
village, with its venerable cottages, its public
green, sheltered by trees, under which the
forefathers
of the present race have sported. The
antique family mansion, standing apart in some
little rural domain, but looking down with a
protecting
air on the surrounding scene.All these
common features of English landscape, evince
a calm and settled security, an hereditary
transmission
of home-bred virtues, and local
attachments
,
that speak deeply and touchingly for the
moral character of the nation.
It is a pleasing sight of a Sunday morning,
when the bell is sending its sober melody across
the quiet fields, to behold the peasantry in their
best finery, with ruddy faces, and modest
cheerfulness
,
thronging tranquilly along the green
lanes to church; but it is still more pleasing to
see them in the evenings, gathering about their
cottage doors, and appearing to exult in the
humble comforts and embellishments which
their own hands have spread around them.
It is this sweet home feeling, this settled
repose
of affection in the domestic scene, that is,
after all, the parent of the steadiest virtues and
purest enjoyments; and I cannot close these
desultory
remarks better, than by quoting the
words of a modern English poet, who has
depicted
it with remarkable felicity:
Through each gradation, from the castled hall,
The city dome, the villa crown'd with shade,
18
But chief from modest mansions numberless,
In town or hamlet, shelt'ring middle life,
Down to the cottag'd vale, and straw-roof'd shed,
This western isle hath long been famed for scenes
Where bliss domestic finds a dwelling place:
Domestic bliss, that, like a harmless dove,
(Honour and sweet endearment keeping guard,)
Can centre in a little quiet nest
All that desire would fly for through the earth;
That can, the world eluding, be itself
A world enjoy'd; that wants no witnesses
But its own sharers, and approving heaven.
That, like a flower deep hid in rocky cleft,
Smiles, though 'tis looking only at the sky.
*
*
From a Poem on the death of the Princess Charlotte, by the Reverend
Rann Kennedy, A. M.
THE
BROKEN HEART.
I never heard
Of any true affection but 'twas nipt
With care, that, like the caterpillar, eats
The leaves of the spring's sweetest book, the rose.
Middleton
.
It
is a common thing to laugh at all love
stories, and to treat the tales of romantic
passion
as mere fictions of poets and novelists,
that never existed in real life. My
observations
on human nature have convinced me of
the contrary, and have satisfied me, that
however
the surface of the character may be
chilled
and frozen by the cares of the world, and
the pleasures of society, still there is a warm
current of affection running through the depths
of the coldest heart, that prevents its being
utterly
congealed. Indeed, I am a true believer
in the blind deity, and go to the full extent of
his doctrines. Shall I confess it?I believe
in broken hearts, and the possibility of dying
of disappointed love! I do not, however,
consider
it a malady often fatal to my own sex;
but I firmly believe that it withers down many
a lovely woman into an early grave.
Man is the creature of interest and ambition.
His nature leads him forth into the struggle and
bustle of the world. Love is but the
embellishment
of his early life, or a song piped in the
intervals of the acts. He seeks for fame, for
fortune, for space in the world's thought, and
dominion over his fellow men. But a woman's
whole life is a history of the affections. The
heart is her world; it is there her ambition
strives for empire; it is there her avarice seeks
for hidden treasures. She sends forth her
sympathies
on adventure; she embarks her whole
soul in the traffick of affection; and if
shipwrecked
,
her case is hopelessfor it is a
bank-ruptcy
of the heart.
To a man the disappointment of love may
occasion some bitter pangs: it wounds some
feelings of tendernessit blasts some prospects
of felicity; but he is an active beinghe can
dissipate his thoughts in the whirl of varied
occupation
,
or plunge into the tide of pleasure;
or, if the scene of disappointment be too full of
painful associations, he can shift his abode at
will, and taking, as it were, the wings of the
morning, can fly to the uttermost parts of the
earth, and be at rest.
But woman's is comparatively a fixed, a
secluded
,
and a meditative life. She is more the
companion of her own thoughts and feelings;
and if they are turned to ministers of sorrow,
where shall she look for consolation! Her lot
is to be wooed and won; and if unhappy in her
love, her heart is like some fortress that has
been captured, and sacked, and abandoned, and
left desolate.
How many bright eyes grow dimhow many
soft cheeks grow palehow many lovely forms
fade away into the tomb, and none can tell the
cause that blighted their loveliness. As the
dove will clasp its wings to its side, and cover
and conceal the arrow that is preying on its
vitals
,
so it is the nature of woman, to hide from
the world the pangs of wounded affection.
The love of a delicate female is always shy and
silent. Even when fortunate, she scarcely
breathes it to herself; but when otherwise, she
buries it in the recesses of her bosom, and there
lets it cower and brood among the ruins of her
peace. With her the desire of the heart has
failed. The great charm of existence is at an
end. She neglects all the cheerful exercises that
gladden the spirits, quicken the pulses, and send
the tide of life in healthful currents through the
veins. Her rest is brokenthe sweet
refreshment
of sleep is poisoned by melancholy dreams
dry sorrow drinks her blood, until her
enfeebled
frame sinks under the least external
assailment. Look for her, after a little while,
and you find friendship weeping over her
untimely
19
grave, and wondering that one, who but
lately glowed with all the radiance of health
and beauty, should now be brought down to
darkness and the worm. You will be told
of some wintry chill, some slight indisposition,
that laid her lowbut no one knows the
mental
malady that previously sapped her strength,
and made her so easy a prey to the spoiler.
She is like some tender tree, the pride and
beauty of the grove: graceful in its form,
bright in its foliage, but with the worm preying
at its core. We find it suddenly withering,
when it should be most fresh and luxuriant.
We see it drooping its branches to the earth,
and shedding leaf by leaf; until, wasted and
perished away, it falls even in the stillness of
the forest; and as we muse over the beautiful
ruin, we strive in vain to recollect the blast or
thunderbolt that could have smitten it with
decay.
I have seen many instance of women
running
to waste and self neglect, and
disappearing
gradually from the earth, almost as if they
had been exhaled to heaven; and have
repeatedly
fancied, that I could trace their deaths
through the various declensions of
consumption
,
cold, debility, languor, melancholy, until
I reached the first symptom of disappointed
love. But an instance of the kind was lately
told to me; the circumstances are well known
in the country where they happened, and I
shall but give them in the manner they were
related.
Every one must recollect the tragical story
of young E, the Irish patriot, for it was
too touching to be soon forgotten. During the
troubles in Ireland he was tried, condemned,
and executed, on a charge of treason. His
fate made a deep impression on public
sympathy
.
He was so youngso intelligentso
generousso braveso every thing that we
are apt to like in a young man. His conduct
under trial, too, was so lofty and intrepid.
The noble indignation with which he repelled
the charge of treason against his countrythe
eloquent vindication of his nameand his
pathetic
appeal to posterity, in the hopeless hour
of condemnationall these entered deeply into
every generous bosom, and even his enemies
lamented the stern policy that dictated his
execution
.
But there was one heart, whose anguish it
would be in vain to describe. In happier days
and fairer fortunes, he had won the affections
of a beautiful and interesting girl, the daughter
of a late celebrated Irish barrister. She loved
him with the disinterested fervour of a
woman's
first and early love. When every
worldly
maxim arrayed itself against him; when
blasted in fortune, and disgrace and danger
darkened around his name, she loved him the
more ardently for his very sufferings. If, then,
his fate could awaken the sympathy, even of
his foes, what must have been the agony of her
whose whole soul was occupied by his image!
Let those tell who have had the portals of the
tomb suddenly closed between them and the
being they most loved on earthwho have sat
at its threshold, as one shut out in a cold and
lonely world, from whence all that was most
lovely and loving had departed.
But then the horrors of such a grave! so
frightful, so dishonoured! There was nothing
for memory to dwell on that could sooth the
pang of separationnone of those tender,
though melancholy circumstances, that endear
the parting scenenothing to melt sorrow into
those blessed tears, sent, like the dews of
heaven
,
to revive the heart in the parching hour of
anguish.
To render her widowed situation more
desolate
,
she had incurred her father's displeasure
by her unfortunate attachment, and was an
exile from the paternal roof. But could the
sympathy and kind offices of friends have
reached a spirit so shocked and driven in by
horror, she would have experienced no want of
consolation, for the Irish are a people of quick
and generous sensibilities. The most delicate
and cherishing attentions were paid her by
families
of wealth and distinction. She was led
into society, and they tried by all kinds of
occupation
and amusement to dissipate her grief,
and wean her from the tragical story of her
loves. But it was all in vain. There are some
strokes of calamity that scathe and scorch the
soulthat penetrate to the vital seat of
hapiness
and
blast it, never again to put forth
bud or blossom. She never objected to
frequent
the haunts of pleasure, but she was as
much alone there, as in the depths of solitude.
She walked about in a sad reverie, apparently
unconscious of the world around her. She
carried with her an inward wo that mocked
at all the blandishments of friendship, and
heeded not the song of the charmer, charm
he never so wisely.
The person who told me her story, had seen
her at a masquerade. There can be no
exhibition
of far-gone wretchedness more striking
and painful than to meet it in such a scene.
To find it wandering like a spectre, lonely and
joyless, where all around is gayto see it
dressed
out in the trappings of mirth, and looking
so wan and wo-begone, as if it had tried in
vain to cheat the poor heart into a
momentary
forgetfulness of sorrow. After strolling
through the splendid rooms and giddy crowd
with an air of utter abstraction, she sat herself
down on the steps of an orchestra, and
looking
about for some time with a vacant air, that
showed her insensibility to the garish scene,
she began, with the capriciousness of a sickly
heart, to warble a little plaintive air. She had
an exquisite voice; but on this occasion it was
so simple, so touching, it breathed forth such a
soul of wretchedness, that she drew a crowd,
mute and silent, around her, and melted every
one into tears.
The story of one so true and tender, could
not but excite great interest in a country
remarkable
for enthusiasm. It completely won
the heart of a brave officer, who paid his
addresses
to her, and thought that one so true to
the dead, could not but prove affectionate to the
living. She declined his attentions, for her
thoughts were irrevocably engrossed by the
memory of her former lover. He, however,
persisted in his suit. He solicited not her
tenderness
,
but her esteem. He was assisted by
her conviction of his worth, and her sense of
her own desitute and dependent situation, for
she was existing on the kindness of friends.
In a word, he at length succeeded in gaining
her hand, though with the solemn assurance,
that her heart was unalterably another's.
He took her with him to Sicily, hoping that
a change of scene might wear out the
remembrance
of early woes. She was an amiable
and exemplary wife, and made an effort to be
a happy one; but nothing could cure the silent
and devouring melancholy that had entered
into her very soul. She wasted away in a
slow, but hopeless decline, and at length sunk
into the grave, the vicitm of a broken heart.
It was on her that Moore, the Irish poet,
composed the following lines:
She is far from the land where her young hero sleeps,
And lovers around her are sighing;
But coldly she turns from their gaze, and weeps,
For her heart in his grave is lying.
She sings the wild song of her dear native plains,
Every note which she lov'd awaking
Ah! little they think, who delight in her strains,
How the heart of the minstrel is breaking!
He had liv'd for his lovefor his conntry he died,
They were all that to life had entwin'd him
Nor soon shall the tears of his country be dried,
Nor long will his love stay behind him!
Oh! make her a grave where the sunbeams rest,
When they promise a glorious morrow;
They'll shine o'er her sleep, like a smile from the west,
From her own lov'd island of sorrow!
THE
ART OF BOOK MAKING.
If that severe doom of Synesius be true`It is a greater offence
to steal dead men's labours, than their clothes,' what shall become of
most writers?
Burton's Anat. Melancholy
.
I have
often wondered at the extreme
fecundity
of the press, and how it came to pass that
so many heads, on which nature seemed to have
inflicted the curse of barrenness, yet teemed
with voluminous productions. As a man,
however
,
jogs on in life, his objects of wonder daily
diminish, and he is continually finding out some
very simple cause for some great matter of
marvel
.
Thus it has been my hap, in my
peregrinations
about this great metropolis, to blunder
upon a scene which unfolded to me some of the
mysteries of the book making craft, and at once
put my astonishment on this head at an end.
I was one summer's day loitering through the
great saloons of the British Museum, with that
listlessness with which one is apt to saunter
about a museum in warm weather; sometimes
lolling over the glass cases of minerals,
sometimes
studying the hieroglyphics on an
Egyptian
mummy, and sometimes trying, with about
equal success, to comprehend the allegorical
paintings on the lofty ceilings. While I was
gazing about in this idle way, my attention was
attracted to a distant door, at the end of a suite
of apartments. It was closed, but every now
and then it would open, and some
strange-favoured
being, generally clothed in black, would
steal forth, and glide through the rooms,
without
noticing any of the surrounding objects.
There was an air of mystery about this that
piqued my languid curiosity, and I determined
to attempt the passage of that straight, and to
explore the unknown regions that lay beyond.
The door yielded to my hand, with all that
facility
with which the portals of enchanted
castles
yield to the adventurous knight errant. I
found myself in a spacious chamber, surrounded
with great cases of venerable books. Above
the cases, and just under the cornice, were
arranged
a great number of quaint black looking
portraits of ancient authors. Long tables, with
stands for reading and writing, were placed
about, at which sat many pale, cadaverous
personages
,
poring intently over dusty volumes,
rummaging among mouldy manuscripts, and
taking copious notes of their contents. The
most hushed stillness reigned through this
mysterious
apartment, excepting that you might
hear the racing of pens over sheets of paper,
or, occasionally, the deep sigh of one of these
sages, as he shifted his position to turn over the
page of an old folio; doubtless arising from that
hollowness and flatulency incident to learned
research.
Now and then one of these personages would
write something on a small slip of paper, and
ring a bell, whereupon a familiar would appear,
take the paper in profound silence, glide out of
the room, and return shortly loaded with
ponderous
tomes, upon which the other would fall,
tooth and nail, with famished voracity. I had
no longer a doubt that I had happened upon a
body of magi, deeply engaged in the study of
occult sciences. The scene called to mind an
eastern tale I had read, of a philosopher who
was shut up in an enchanted library, in the
bosom
of a mountain, that only opened once a
year; where he made the spirits of the place
obedient to his commands, to bring him books
of all kinds of dark knowledge, so that at the
end of the year, when the magic portal once
more swung open on its hinges, he issued forth
so versed in forbidden lore, as to be able to soar
above the heads of the multitude, and control
the powers of nature.
My curiosity being now fully aroused, I
whispered to one of the familiars, as he was
about to leave the room, and begged an
interpretation
of the strange scene before me. A
few words were sufficient for the purpose. I
found that these mysterious personages, whom
I had mistaken for magi, were principally
authors
,
and were in the very act of
manufacturing
books. I was, in fact, in the reading room
of the great British Library, an immense
collection
of volumes of all ages and languages,
many of which are now forgotten, and most of
which are seldom read. To these sequestered
pools of obsolete literature, therefore, do many
modern authors repair, and draw buckets full
of classic lore, or pure English, undefiled,
wherewith to swell their own scanty rills of
thought.
Being now in possession of the secret, I sat
down in a corner, and watched the process of
this book manufactory. I noticed one lean,
bilious looking wight, who sought none but
the most worm-eaten volumes, printed in black
letter. He was evidently constructing some
work of profound erudition, that would be
purchased
by every man who wished to be thought
learned, placed upon a conspicuous shelf of his
library, or laid open upon his table; but never
read. I observed him, now and then, draw a
large fragment of biscuit out of his pocket, and
gnaw; whether it was his dinner, or whether
he was endeavouring to keep off that exhaustion
of the stomach, produced by much pondering
over dry works, I leave to harder students than
myself to determine.
There was one old gentleman in bright
coloured
clothes, with a chirping, gossipping,
expression
of countenance, who had all the
appearance
of an author on good terms with his
bookseller. After considering him attentively,
I recognised in him a diligent getter up of
miscellaneous
works, that bustled off well with the
trade. I was curious to see how he
manufactured
his wares. He made more stir and show
of business than any of the others; dipping into
various books, fluttering over the leaves of
manuscripts
,
taking a morsel out of one, a morsel
out of another, line upon line, precept upon
precept, here a little and there a little. The
contents of his book seemed to be as
heterogeneous
as those of the witches' cauldron in
21
Macbeth. It was here a finger and there a
thumb, toe of frog and blind worm's sting,
with his own gossip poured in like baboon's
blood, to make the medley slab and good.
After all, thought I, may not this pilfering
disposition be implanted in authors for wise
purposes; may it not be the way in which
providence
has taken care that the seeds of
knowledge
and wisdom shall be preserved from age
to age, in spite of the inevitable decay of the
works in which they were first produced. We
see that nature has wisely, though
whimsically
,
provided for the conveyance of seeds
from clime to clime, in the maws of certain
birds; so that animals, which, in themselves,
are little better than carrion, and apparently the
lawless plunderers of the orchard and the corn
field, are, in fact, nature's carriers to disperse
and perpetuate her blessings. In like manner,
the beauties and fine thoughts of ancient and
obsolete writers, are caught up by these flights
of predatory authors, and cast forth, again to
flourish and bear fruit in a remote and distant
tract of time. Many of their works, also,
undergo
a kind of metempsychosis, and spring up
under new forms. What was formerly a
ponderous
history, revives in the shape of a
romance
an
old legend changes into a modern
playand a sober philosophical treatise
furnishes
the body for a whole series of bouncing
and sparkling essays. Thus it is in the
clearing
of our American woodlands; where we
burn down a forest of stately pines, a progeny
of dwarf oaks start up in their place; and we
never see the prostrate trunk of a tree,
mouldering
into soil, but it gives birth to a whole
tribe of fungi.
Let us not, then, lament over the decay and
oblivion into which ancient writers descend;
they do but submit to the great law of nature,
which declares that all sublunary shapes of
matter shall be limited in their duration, but
which decrees also, that their elements shall
never perish. Generation after generation,
both in animal and vegetable life, passes away,
but the vital principle is transmitted to their
posterity, and the species continues to flourish.
Thus, also, do authors beget authors, and
having
produced a numerous progeny, in a good
old age they sleep with their fathers, that is to
say, with the authors who preceded themand
from whom they had stolen.
While I was indulging in these rambling
fancies
,
I had leaned my head against a pile of
reverend folios. Whether it was owing to the
soporific emanations from these works; or to
the profound quiet of the room; or to the
lassitude
arising from much wandering; or to an
unlucky habit of napping at improper times
and places, with which I am grievously
afflicted
,
so it was, that I fell into a doze. Still,
however, my imagination continued busy, and
indeed the same scene remained before my
mind's eye, only a little changed in some of
the details. I dreamt that the chamber was
still decorated with the portraits of ancient
authors
,
but that the number was increased. The
long tables had disappeared, and in place of
the sage magi, I beheld a ragged, thread-bare
throng, such as may be seen plying about that
great repository of cast-off clothes, Monmouth
Street. Whenever they seized upon a book, by
one of those incongruities common to dreams,
methought it turned into a garment of foreign
or antique fashion, with which they proceeded
to equip themselves. I noticed, however, that
no one pretended to clothe himself from any
particular suit, but took a sleeve from one, a
cape from another, a skirt from a third, thus
decking himself out piece-meal, while some of
his original rags would peep out from among
his borrowed finery.
There was a dapper, rosy, well-fed parson,
who I observed ogling several mouldy
polemical
writers through an eyeglass. He soon
contrived
to slip on the voluminous mantle of one
of the old fathers, and having purloined the
gray beard of another, endeavoured to look
exceeding
wise. But the smirking commonplace
of his countenance set at nought all the
trappings
of wisdom. One sickly looking
gentleman
was busied embroidering a very flimsy
garment with gold thread drawn out of several
old court dresses of the reign of Queen
Elizabeth
.
Another had trimmed himself
magnificently
from an illuminated manuscript, had
stuck a nosegay in his bosom, culled from
The Paradise of dainty Devices, and having
put Sir Philip Sidney's hat on one side of his
head, strutted off with an exquisite air of
vulgar
elegance. A third, who was but of puny
dimensions, had bolstered himself out bravely
with the spoils from several obscure tracts of
philosophy, so that he had a very imposing
front, but he was lamentably tattered in rear,
and I perceived that he had patched his small
clothes with leaves from a Latin author.
There were some well-dressed gentlemen,
it is true, who only helped themselves to a gem
or so, which sparkled among their own
ornaments
,
without eclipsing them. Some, too,
only seemed to contemplate the costumes of
the old writers, to imbibe their principles of
taste, and catch their air and spirit; but I
grieve to say, that too many were apt to array
themselves, from top to toe, in the patchwork
manner I have mentioned. I should not omit
to speak of one genius, of an arrant cockney
demeanour, who had a violent propensity to
the pastoral, but whose rural wanderings had
been confined to the classic haunts of Primrose
Hill, and the solitudes of the Regent's Park.
He had decked himself in wreaths and
ribbands
from all the old pastoral poets, and
hanging
his head on one side, went about with a
fantastical, lack-a-daisical air, babbling about
green fields. But the personage that most
struck my attention, was a pragmatical old
gentleman
,
in clerical robes, with a remarkably
large and square, but bald head. He entered
the room wheezing and puffing, elbowed his
way through the throng, with a look of sturdy
self-confidence, and having laid hands upon
a thick Greek quarto, clapped it upon his
head, and swept stately away in a formidable
frizzled wig.
In the height of this literary masquerade, a
cry suddenly resounded from every side, of
thieves! thieves! I looked, and lo! the
portraits about the walls became animated!
The old authors thrust out first a head, then
a shoulder, from the canvass, looked down
curiously
,
for an instant, upon the motley throng,
and then descended, with fury in their eyes, to
claim their rifled property. The scene of
scampering
and hubbub that ensued, baffles all
description
.
The unhappy culprits endeavoured in vain
to escape with their plunder. On one side might
be seen half a dozen old monks, stripping a
modern professor; on another, there was sad
devastation
carried into the ranks of modern
dramatic
writers. Beaumont and Fletcher, side
by side, raged round the field like Castor and
Pollux, and sturdy Ben Jonson enacted more
wonders than when a volunteer with the army
in Flanders. As to the gossipping compiler of
farragos, mentioned some time since, he had
arrayed himself in as many patches and colours
as Harlequin, and there was as fierce a
contention
of claimants about him, as about the dead
body of Patroclus. I was grieved to see many
men, to whom I had been accustomed to look
up with awe and reverence, fain to steal off
with scarce a rage to cover their nakedness.
Just then my eye was caught by the
pragmatical
old gentleman in the Greek grizzled wig,
who was scrambling away in sore affright with
half a score of authors in full cry after him.
They were close upon his haunches; in a
twinkling off went his wig; at every turn some
strip of raiment was peeled off of him, until
in a few moments, from his domineering pomp,
he shrunk into a little, pursy, chopp'd bald
shot, and made his exit with only a few tags
and rags fluttering at his back.
There was something so ludicrous in the
catastrophe
of this learned Theban, that I burst
into an immoderate fit of laughter, which broke
the whole illusion. The tumult and the scuffle
were at an end. The chamber resumed its
usual appearance. The old authors shrunk
back into their picture frames, and hung in
shadowy solemnity along the walls. In short,
I found myself wide awake in my corner, with
the whole assemblage of bookworms gazing
at me with astonishment. Nothing of my
dream had been real but my burst of laughter,
a sound never before heard in that grave
sanctuary
,
and so abhorrent to the ears of wisdom,
as to electrify the fraternity.
The librarian now stepped up to me, and
demanded
whether I had a card of admission.
At first I did not comprehend him, but I soon
found that the library was a kind of literary
preserve, subject to game laws, and that no
one must presume to hunt there without special
license and permission. In a word, I stood
convicted of being an arrant poacher, and was
glad to make a precipitate retreat, lest I should
have a whole pack of authors let loose upon
me.A ROYAL POET.
Though your body be confin'd,
And soft love a prisoner bound,
Yet the beauty of your mind
Neither check nor chain hath found.
Look out nobly, then, and dare
Even the fetters that you wear.
Fletcher
.
On
a soft sunny morning, in the month of
May, I made an excursion to Windsor, to visit
the castle. It is a proud old pile, stretching its
irregular walls and massive towers along the
brow of a lofty ridge, waving its royal banner
in the clouds, and looking down with a lordly
air upon the surrounding world. It is a place
that I love to visit, for it is full of storied and
poetical associations. On this morning, the
weather was of that soft vernal kind that calls
forth the latent romance of a man's
temperament
,
and makes him quote poetry, and dream
of beauty. In wandering through the
magnificent
saloons and long echoing galleries of the
old castle, I felt myself most disposed to linger
in the chamber where hang the portraits of the
beauties that once flourished in the gay court of
Charles the Second. As I traversed the large
green courts, with sunshine beaming on the
gray walls, and glancing along the velvet turf,
I called to mind the tender, the gallant, but
hapless Surrey's account of his loiterings about
them in his stripling days, when enamoured of
the Lady Geraldine
With eyes cast up unto the maiden's tower,
With easie sighs, such as men draw in love.
But the most interesting object of my visit
was the ancient keep of the castle, where
James the First of Scotland, the pride and
theme of Scottish poets and historians, was
for many years of his youth detained a prisoner
of state. It is a huge gray tower, that has
stood the brunt of ages, and is still in good
preservation. A great flight of steps leads to
the interior. In the armoury, a Gothic hall
filled with weapons of various kinds, is still
shown hanging against the wall, a suit of
armour that once belonged to James. From
hence a staircase conducts to a suite of
apartments
of faded magnificence, hung with
gobelin
tapestry, which formed James's prison.
The whole history of this amiable but
unfortunate
prince is highly romantic, and too
well known to need particular relation. At
the tender age of eleven he was sent from
home by his father, Robert III., and destined
for the French court, to be reared under the
eye of the French monarch, secure from the
treachery and danger that surrounded the royal
house of Scotland. It was his mishap in the
course of his voyage, to fall into the hands of
the English, and he was detained prisoner by
Henry IV., notwithstanding that a truce existed
between the two countries.
The intelligence of his capture, coming in
the train of many sorrows and disasters, proved
fatal to his unhappy father. The news, we
are told, was brought to him while at supper,
and did so overwhelm him with grief, that he
was almost ready to give up the ghost into the
hands of the servants that attended him. But
being carried to his bed chamber, he abstained
from all food, and in three days died of hunger
and grief, at Rothesay.
*
*
Buchanan.
James was detained in captivity for
eighteen
years; but, though deprived of personal
liberty, he was treated with the respect due to
his rank. Care was taken to instruct him in
all the branches of useful knowledge
cultivated
at that period, and to give him those
mental
and personal accomplishments deemed
proper
for a prince. Perhaps, in this respect, his
imprisonment was an advantage, as it enabled
him to apply himself the more exclusively to
his improvement, and quietly to imbibe that
rich fund of knowledge, and to cherish those
elegant tastes, which have given such a lustre
24
to his memory. The picture drawn of him in
early life, by the Scottish historians, is highly
captivating, and seems rather the description of
a hero of romance, than a character in real
history. He was well learnt, we are told, to
fight with the sword, to joust, to tournay, to
wrestle, to sing and dance; he was an expert
mediciner, right crafty in playing both of lute
and harp and sundry other instruments of
musick
,
and was expert in grammar, oratory, and
poetry.
*
*
Hector Boyce.
With this combination of manly and
delicate
accomplishments, fitting him to shine both
in active and elegant life, and calculated to
give him an intense relish for joyous existence,
it must have been a severe trial, in an age of
bustle and chivalry, to pass the spring time of
his years in monotonous captivity. It was the
good fortune of James, however, to be gifted
with a powerfully poetic fancy, and to be
visited in his prison by the choicest inspira
tions of the muse. Some minds corrode, and
grow inactive, under the loss of personal
liberty
;
others, morbid and irritable; but it is
the nature of the poet to become tender and
imaginative in the loneliness of confinement.
He banquets upon the honey of his own
thoughts, and, like the captive bird, pours
forth his soul in melody.
Have you not seen the nightingale
A pilgrim coop'd into a cage,
How doth she chant her wonted tale,
In that her lonely hermitage!
Even there her charming melody doth prove
That all her boughs are trees, her cage a grove.
*
*
Roger L'Estrange.
Indeed, it is the divine attribute of the
imagination
,
that it is irrepressible, unconfinable
That when the real world is shut out, it can
create a world for itself, and, with a
necromantic
power, can conjure up glorious shapes
and forms, and brilliant visions, to make
solitude
populous, and irradiate the gloom of the
dungeon. Such was the world of pomp and
pageant that lived around Tasso in his dismal
cell at Ferrara, when he conceived the
splendid
scenes of his Jerusalem; and we may
consider
the King's Quair,
*
*
Quair. The old Scottish term for Book.
composed by James
during his captivity at Windsor, as another of
those beautiful breakings forth of the soul
from the restraint and gloom of the prison
house.
The subject of the poem is his love for the
Lady Jane Beaufort, daughter of the Earl of
Somerset. He saw her, accidentally, from the
window of his prison, and fell in love with
her, in the true spirit of poetry and romance.
The poem is a rich effusion of feeling and
fancy; full of the descriptive vein which
characterizes
the poetry of that day, and sobered
and sweetened by the most simple and natural
reflections.
James flourished nearly about the time of
Chaucer and Gower, and was evidently a
studier
and admirer of their writings. Indeed, in
one of his stanzas he acknowledges them as
his masters; and, in some parts of his poem, he
seems almost to have borrowed from his
prototypes
.
There are always, however, general
features of resemblance in the works of
contemporary
authors, that are not so much borrowed
from each other as from the times. Writers,
like bees, toll their sweets in the wide world;
they incorporate with their own conceptions the
anecdotes and thoughts which are current in
society
,
and thus each generation has some
features
in common, characteristic of the age in
which it lived. What gives peculiar value to
the poem of James is, that it may be considered
a transcript of the royal bard's true feelings, and
the story of his real loves and fortunes. It is
not often that sovereigns write poetry, or that
poets deal in fact. It is gratifying to the pride
of a common man, to find a monarch thus suing,
as it were, for admission into his closet, and
seeking to win his favour by administering to
his pleasures. It is a proof of the honest
equality
of intellectual competition, which strips off
all the trappings of factitious dignity, brings the
candidate down to a level with his fellow men,
and obliges him to depend on his own native
powers for distinction. It is curious, too, to get
at the history of a monarch's heart, and find the
simple affections of human nature throbbing
under the ermine. But James had learnt to be
a poet before he was a king: he was schooled
in adversity, and reared in the company of his
own thoughts. Monarchs have seldom time to
parley with their hearts, or meditate their minds
into poetry; and had James been brought up
amidst the adulation and gayety of a court, we
should never have had such a poem as the
Quair.
In his first canto he makes several allusions
to his misfortunes, and his wearisome
imprisonment
.
They are extremely natural and
touching
;
and, perhaps, are rendered more touching
by their simple brevity. They contrast finely
with those elaborate and iterated complaints
which we sometimes meet in poetry, the
effusions
of morbid minds sickening under miseries
of their own creating, and venting their
bitterness
on an unoffending world. James speaks
of his privations with acute sensibility; but,
having mentioned them, passes on, as if his
manly mind disdained to brood over
unavoidable
calamities. When such a spirit breaks forth
into complaint, we are aware how great must
be the suffering that extorts the murmur. We
sympathize with James, a romantic, active, and
accomplished prince, cut off in the lustihood of
youth from all the enterprise and noble uses of
life, as we do with Milton, alive to all the
beauties
of nature and glories of art, when he
breathes forth brief, but deep-toned
lamentations
,
over his perpetual blindness.
From a passage in the first canto, we find,
that the favourite book of James, while in
prison
,
was Boetius' Consolations of Philosophy,
a work popular among the writers of that day,
and which had been translated by his great
predecessor, Chaucer. And, indeed, it would
be difficult to find, out of the sacred writings, a
more admirable text book for meditation under
misfortune. It is the legacy of a noble and
enduring
spirit, purified by sorrow and suffering,
bequeathing to all its successors in calamity the
stores of eloquent but simple reasoning, by
which it was enabled to bear up against the
various
ills of life. It is a talisman which the
unfortunate may treasure up in his bosom, or,
like the good King James, lay it on his nightly
pillow.
At what period of his durance he fell in love
with the Lady Jane is uncertain, but from that
moment it is probable he hung up philosophy,
and became poetical. The description of his
first seeing her is picturesque, and given with
great beauty of detail. He was in the midst
of one of his fits of lonely weariness,
despairing
,
as he says, of all joy and remedy. For
tired of thought, and wo-begone, he
wandered
to the window to watch the passers by,
and gaze out upon the worldthe poor solace
of the captive. The window looked forth upon
a small garden which lay at the foot of the
tower. It was a quiet sheltered spot, adorned
with arbours and green alleys, and protected
from the passing gaze by trees and hawthorn
hedges.
Now was there made fast by the towers wall
A garden faire, and in the corners set
An arbour green, with wandis long and small
Railed about, and so with trees beset
Was all the place, and hawthorn hedges knet,
That lyf
*
*
Person.
was none walkyng there forbye,
That might within scarce any wight espye.
So thick the beuis
Boughs.
and the leves grene
Beshaded all the alleys that there were,
And midst of every arbour might be seen
The sharp, grene, sweet juniper
Growing so fair with branches here and there,
That as it seemed to a lyf without
The boughs did spread the arbour all about.
And on the small grene twistis
Twigs.
sat
The lytil suete nyghtingales and sung
So loud and clere, the hymnis consecrate
Of luvis use, now soft, now loud among,
That all the garden and the wallis rong
Ryght of their song
Note
.Many of the words in the quotations are modernized, to
render them more intelligible.
It was in the month of May, when every
thing was in its bloom. As he gazes on the
25
scene, and listens to the notes of the birds, he
gradually lapses into one of those tender and
undefinable reveries, that fill the youthful
bosom
in this delicious season. He wonders
what this love may be, of which he has so
often read, and which thus seems breathed
forth in the quickening breath of May, and
melting all nature into ecstacy and song. If
it really be so great a felicity, and if it be a
boon thus generally dispensed to the most
insignificant
of beings, why is he alone cut off
from its enjoyments?
Oft would I think, O Lord, what may this be?
That love is of so noble myght and kynde,
Loving his folk, and such prosperitee
Is it of him, as we in bukis find,
May he oure hertes setten and unbynd:
Hath he upon our hertes such maistrye?
Or is all this but feyuit fantasye?
For giff he be of so grete excellence,
That he of every wight hath cure and charge,
What have I gilt to him, or done offense?
That I am thral'd, and birdis go at large.
In the midst of his musing, as he cast his eyes
downward, he beheld, he says, the fairest
and the freschest young floure that ever he
had seen. It was the beautiful Lady Jane,
walking in the garden. She at once
captivated
the fancy of the romantic princebecame
the object of his wishesthe sovereign of his
ideal world.
There is in all this charming scene a
similarity
to the early part of Chaucer's Knight's
tale, where Palamon and Arcite fall in love
with Emilia, whom they see walking in the
garden of their prison. But perhaps the very
similarity of the actual fact to the poetical
incident
which he had read, may have induced
James to have dwelt upon it in his poem.
His description of the Lady Jane is more
elaborate
than Chaucer's of Emilia. He dwells,
with the fondness of a lover, on every article
of her apparel, even to the goodly chain of
small orfeverye
*
*
Wrought gold.
about her neck, whereby
there hung a ruby in shape of a heart, that
seemed, he says, like a spark of fire burning
upon her white bosom.
In her was youth, beautee, with humble port,
Bountee, richesse, and womanly feature,
(God better wote than my pen can reporte)
Wisdome, largesse estate, and cunning sure,
In every point, so guided her mesure,
In word, in deed, in shape, in countenance,
That nature might no more her child advance.
Whether this was really the manner in
which James first saw the lady of his heart,
or whether it is a mere poetical fiction, it is
fruitless to conjecture. Do not let us always
distrust what is picturesque and romantic, as
incompatible with real life; but sometimes take
a poet at his word.
I find I am insensibly swelling this story
beyond my original intention, and must bring
it to a close. James, though unfortunate in
the general tenor of his life, was more happy
in his love than is generally the lot of poets.
When at length he was released from his
tedious captivity, and restored to his crown,
he espoused the Lady Jane, who made him
a most tender and devoted wife. She was the
faithful sharer of his joys and his troubles;
and when, after a brief, but memorable, reign
of thirteen years, he was barbarously
murdered
by his own relatives at Perth, she
interposed
her body to shield him from harm, and
was repeatedly wounded by the sword of the
assassin.
It was the recollection of this romantic tale
of former times, and of the golden little poem
that had its birthplace in this tower, that made
me visit the old pile with such lively interest.
The suit of armour, richly gilt and
embellished
,
as if to figure in the tournay, brought the
image of the romantic prince vividly before
my imagination. I paced the deserted
chambers
where he had composed his poem.I
looked out upon the spot where he had first
seen the Lady Jane. It was in the same
genial
monthevery thing was bursting into
vegetation
,
and budding forth the tender promise
of the year. Time seems to have passed
lightly over this little scene of poetry and
love, and to have withheld his desolating hand.
Several centuries have gone by, yet the
garden
still flourishes at the foot of the tower.
The arbours, it is true, have disappeared, yet
the place is still sheltered, blooming, and
retired
.
There is a charm about a spot that has
once been printed by the footsteps of departed
beauty, and hallowed by the inspirations of the
poet, that is heightened, rather than impaired,
by the lapse of ages. It is, indeed, the gift of
poetry to consecrate every place in which it
moves; to breathe around nature an odour more
exquisite than the perfume of the rose, and to
shed over it a tint more magical than the blush
of morning.
Others may speak of the illustrious deeds of
James, as a warrior and a legislator; but I have
delighted to view him as the benefactor of the
human heart, stooping from his high estate to
sow the sweet flowers of poetry and song in the
paths of common life. He did all in his power
to soften and refine the spirit of his
countrymen
.
He wrote many poems which are now
lost to the world. He improved the national
music; and traces of his tender and elegant taste
may be found in those witching airs still piped
among the wild mountains and lonely glens of
Scotland. He has thus embalmed his memory
in song, and floated it down to after ages, in
the rich stream of Scottish melody. All these
things were kindling at my heart as I paced the
silent scene of his imprisonment. I have visited
Vaucluse with as much enthusiasm as a
pilgrim
would visit the shrine at Loretto; but I
never felt more poetical devotion, than when
contemplating the old tower and the little
garden
at Windsor.
THE
COUNTRY CHURCH.
26
A gentleman?
What, o' the woolpack? or the sugar chest?
Or lists of velvet? which is't, pound, or yard,
You vend your gentry by?
Beggar's Bush
.
There
are few places more favourable to the
study of character than an English country
Church. I was once passing a few weeks at
the seat of a friend, who resided in the vicinity
of one, the appearance of which particularly
struck my fancy. It was one of those rich
morsels of quaint antiquity which give such a
peculiar charm to English landscape. It stood
in the midst of a county filled with ancient
families, and contained, within its cold and
silent aisles, the congregated dust of many
noble generations. The interior walls were
encrusted with monuments of every age and
style. The light streamed through windows
dimmed with armorial bearings, richly
emblazoned
in stained glass. In various parts of the
church were tombs of knights, and high-born
dames, of gorgeous workmanship, with their
effigies in coloured marble. On every side, the
eye was struck with some instance of aspiring
mortality; some haughty memorial which
human pride had erected over its kindred dust,
in this temple of the most humble of all
religions
.
The congregation was composed of the
neighbouring
people of rank, who sat in pews
sumptuously
lined and cushioned, furnished with
richly-gilded prayer books, and decorated with
their arms upon the pew doorsthe villagers
and peasantry, who filled the back seats, and a
small gallery beside the organand the poor of
the parish, who were ranged on benches in the
aisles.
The service was performed by a snuffling,
well fed, vicar, who had a snug dwelling near
the church. He was a privileged guest at
all the tables of the neighbourhood, and had
been the keenest fox-hunter in the county,
until age, and good living, had disabled him
from doing any thing more than ride to see the
hounds throw off, and make one at the hunting
dinner.
Under the ministry of such a pastor, I found
it impossible to get into the train of thought
suitable to the time and place; so, having, like
many other feeble christians, compromised with
my conscience, by laying the sin of my own
delinquency at the threshold of another, I
occupied
myself by making observations on my
neighbours.
I was as yet a stranger in England, and
curious
to notice the manners of its fashionable
classes. I found, as usual, that there was the
least pretension where there was the most
acknowledged
title to respect. I was particularly
struck, for instance, with the family of a
nobleman
of high rank, consisting of several sons
and daughters. Nothing could be more simple
and unassuming than their appearance. They
generally came to church in the plainest
equipage
,
and often on foot. The young ladies
would stop and converse, in the kindest manner,
with the peasantry, caress the children, and
listen
to the stories of the humble cottagers.
Their countenances were open, beautifully fair,
with an expression of high refinement, but, at
the same time, a frank cheerfulness, and
engaging
affability. Their brothers were tall, and
elegantly formed. They were dressed
fashionably
,
but simply; with strict neatness and
propriety
,
but without any mannerism or
foppishness
.
Their whole demeanour was easy and
natural, with that lofty grace, and noble
frankness
,
which bespeak free-born souls that have
never been checked in their growth by feelings
of inferiority. There is a healthful hardiness
about real dignity, that never dreads contact
and communion with others, however humble.
It is only spurious pride that is morbid and
sensitive
,
and shrinks from every touch. I was
pleased to see the manner in which they would
converse with the peasantry about those rural
concerns and field sports, in which the
gentlemen
of this country so much delight. In these
conversations, there was neither haughtiness on
the one part, nor servility on the other; and
you were only reminded of the difference of
rank by the habitual respect of the peasant.
In contrast to these, was the family of a
wealthy citizen, who had amassed a vast
fortune
,
and, having purchased the estate and
mansion
of a ruined nobleman in the
neighbourhood
,
was endeavouring to assume all the style
and dignity of an hereditary lord of the soil.
The family always came to church
en prince
.
They were rolled majestically along in a
carriage
emblazoned with arms. The crest
glittered
in silver radiance from every part of the
harness
where a crest could possibly be placed.
A fat coachman in a three-cornered hat, richly
laced, and a flaxen wig, curling close around
his rosy face, was seated on the box, with a
sleek Danish dog beside him. Two footmen
in gorgeous liveries, with huge bouquets, and
gold-headed canes, lolled behind. The carriage
rose and sunk on its long springs with peculiar
stateliness of motion. The very horses champed
their bits, arched their necks, and glanced their
eyes more proudly than common horses, either
because they had got a little of the family
feeling
,
or were reined up more tightly than
ordinary
.
I could not but admire the style with which
this splendid pageant was brought up to the
gate of the church yard. There was a vast
effect produced at the turning of an angle of the
wall. A great cracking of the whip; straining
and scrambling of the horses; glistening of
harness, and flashing of wheels through
gravel
.
This was the moment of triumph and
vain glory to the coachman. The horses were
urged and checked until they were fretted into
a foam. They threw out their feet in a
prancing
trot, dashing about pebbles at every step.
The crowd of villagers sauntering quietly to
church, opened precipitately to the right and
left, gaping in vacant admiration. On reaching
the gate, the horses were pulled up with a
suddenness
that produced an immediate stop, and
almost threw them on their haunches.
There was an extraordinary hurry of the
footmen
to alight, open the door, pull down the
steps, and prepare every thing for the descent
on earth of this august family. The old citizen
would first emerge his round red face from out
the door, looking about him with the pompus
air of a man accustomed to rule on change, and
shake the stock market with a nod. His
consort
,
a fine, fleshy, comfortable dame, followed
him. There seemed, I must confess, but little
pride in her composition. She was the picture
of broad, honest, vulgar enjoyment. The
world went well with her; and she liked the
world. She had fine clothes, a fine house, a
fine carriage, fine children, every thing was
fine about her: it was nothing but driving about,
and visiting and feasting. Life was to her a
perpetual revel; it was one long lord mayor's
day.
Two daughters succeeded to this goodly
couple. They certainly were handsome, but
there was a supercilious air, that chilled
admiration
,
and disposed the spectator to be critical.
They were ultra-fashionables in dress, and,
though no one could deny the richness of their
decorations, yet their appropriateness might be
questioned amidst the simplicity of a country
church. They descended loftily from the
carriage
,
and moved up the line of peasantry with
a step that seemed dainty of the soil it trod on.
They cast an excursive glance around, that
passed coldly over the burly faces of the
peasantry
,
until they met the eyes of the nobleman's
family, when their countenances immediately
brightened into smiles, and they made the most
profound and elegant courtesies; which were
returned in a manner that showed they were
but slight acquaintances.
27
I must not forget the two sons of this
aspiring
citizen, who came to church in a dashing
curricle, with outriders. They were arrayed in
the extremity of the mode, with all that
pedantry
of dress which marks the man of
questionable
pretensions to style.
They kept entirely by themselves, eyeing
every one askance that came near them, as if
measuring his claims to respectability; yet they
were without conversation, except the exchange
of an occasional cant phrase. They even
moved artificially, for their bodies, in
compliance
with the caprice of the day, had been
disciplined into the absence of all ease and
freedom
.
Art had done every thing to accomplish
them as men of fashion, but nature had denied
them the nameless grace. They were vulgarly
shaped, like men formed for the common
purposes
of life, and had that air of supercilious
assumption which is never seen in the true
gentleman.
I have been rather minute in drawing the
pictures
of these two families, because I considered
them specimens of what is often to be met with
in this countrythe unpretending great, and
the arrogant little. I have no respect for titled
rank, unless it be accompanied by true nobility
of soul; but I have remarked, in all countries
where these artificial distinctions exist, the very
highest classes are always the most courteous
and unassuming. Those who are well assured
of their own standing, are least apt to trespass
on that of others; whereas, nothing is so
offensive
as the aspirings of vulgarity, which thinks
to elevate itself by humiliating its neighbour.
As I have brought these families into contrast,
I must notice their behaviour in church. That
of the nobleman's family was quiet, serious,
and attentive. Not that they appeared to have
any fervour of devotion, but rather a respect for
sacred things, and sacred places, inseparable
from good breeding. The others, on the
contrary
,
were in a perpetual flutter and whisper;
they betrayed a continual consciousness of
finery
,
and a sorry ambition of being the wonders
of a rural congregation.
The old gentleman was the only one really
attentive to the service. He took the whole
burden of family devotion upon himself; stood
bolt upright, and uttered the responses with a
loud voice that might be heard all over the
church. It was evident that he was one of
those thorough church and king men, who
connect
the idea of devotion and loyalty; who
consider
the deity, some how or other, of the
government
party, and religion a very excellent
sort of thing, that ought to be countenanced and
kept up.
When he joined so loudly in the service, it
seemed more by way of example to the lower
orders, to show them, that though so great and
wealthy, he was not above being religious; as I
have seen a turtle-fed alderman publicly swallow
a basin of charity soup, smacking his lips at
every mouthful, and pronouncing it excellent
food for the poor.
When the service was at an end, I was curious
to witness the several exits of my groups. The
young noblemen and their sisters, as the day
was fine, preferred strolling home across the
fields, chatting with the country people as they
went. The others departed as they came, in
grand parade. Again were the equipages
wheeled up to the gate. There was again the
smacking of whips, the clattering of hoofs, and
the glittering of harness. The horses started off
almost at a bound; the villagers again hurried
to right and left; the wheels threw up a cloud of
dust, and the aspiring family was wrapt out of
sight in a whirlwind.
THE
WIDOW AND HER SON.
Pittie olde age, within whose silver haires
Honor and reverence evermore have raign'd.
Marlowe's Tamburlaine
.
During
my residence in the country, I used
frequently to attend at the old village church.
Its shadowy aisles, its mouldering monuments,
its dark oaken pannelling, all reverend with the
gloom of departed years, seemed to fit it for the
haunt of solemn meditation. A Sunday, too, in
the country, is so holy in its repose: such a
pensive quiet reigns over the face of nature, that
every restless passion is charmed down, and
we feel all the natural religion of the soul gently
springing up within us.
Sweet day, so pure, so calm, so bright,
The bridal of the earth and sky!--
I do not pretned to be what is called a devout
man, but ther are feelings that visit me in a
country church, amidst the beautiful serenity
of nature, which I experience no where else; and
if not a more religious, I am certainly a better,
man on Sunday, than on any other day of the
seven.
But in this church I felt myself continually
thrown back upon the world by the frigidity
and pomp of the poor worms around me. The
only being that seemed thoroughly to feel the
humble and prostrate piety of a true christian,
was a poor decrepid old woman, bending under
the weight of years and infirmities. She bore
the traces of something better than abject
poverty
.
The lingerings of decent pride were
visible
in her appearance. Her dress, though
humble in the extreme, was scrupulously clean.
Some trivial respect, too, had been awarded
her, for she did not take her seat among the
village
poor, but sat alone on the steps of the altar.
She seemed to have survived all love, all
friendship
,
all society, and to have nothing left her but
the hopes of heaven. When I saw her feebly
rising and bending her aged form in prayer--
habitually
conning her prayer book, which her
palsied
hand and failing eyes could not permit
her to read, but which she evidently knew by
heart--I felt that the faltering voice of that
poor woman arose to heaven far before the
responses
of the clerk, the swell of the organ, or
the chanting of the choir.
I am fond of loitering about country churches,
and this was so delightfully situated, that it
frequently
attracted me. It stood on a knoll, round
which a small stream made a beautiful bend,
and then wound its way through a long reach
of soft meadow scenery. The church was
surrouned by yew trees, which seemed
almost
coeval with itself. Its tall gothic spire
shot up lightly from among them, with rooks
and crows generally wheeling about it. I was
seated here there one still sunny morning, watching
two labourers who were digging a grave. They
had chosen one of the most remote and
neglected
corners of the church yard, where, by the
number of nameless graes around, it would
appear that the indigent and friendless were
huddled into the earth. I was told that the
new-made
grave was for the only son of a poor
widow
.
While I was meditating on the
distinctions
of worldly rank, which extend thus down
into the very dust, the toll of the bell announced
the approach of the funeral. They were the
obsequies of poverty, with which pride had
nothing
to do. A coffin of the plainest materials,
without pall or other covering, was borne by
some of the villagers. The sexton walked
before
with an air of cold indifference. There
were no mock mourners in the trappings of
affected
wo, but there was one real mourner who
feebly tottered after the corpse. It was the
aged mother of the deceased--the poor old
woman
whom I had seen seated on the steps of the
altar. She was supported by a humble friend,
who was endeavoring to comfort her. A few
of the neighboring poor had joined the train,
and some children of the village were running
hand in hand, now shouting with unthinking
mirth, and sometimes pausing to gaze, with
'
childish curiosity, on the grief of the mourner.
As the funeral train approached the grave,
the parson issued out of the church porch,
arrayed
in the surplice, with prayer book in hand,
and attended by the clerk. The service,
however
,
was a mere act of charity. The deceased
had been destitute, and the survivor was
pennyless
.
It was shuffled through, therfore, in
form, but coldly and unfeelingly. The
well-fed
priest scarcely moved ten steps from the
church door; his voice could scarcely be heard
at the grave; and never did I hear the funeral
service, that sublime and touching ceremony,
turned into such a frigid mummery of words.
I approached the grave. The coffin was
placed on the ground. On it were inscribed
the name and age of the deceased--"George
Somers, aged 26 years." The poor mother
had been assisted to kneel down at the head of
it. Her withered hands were clasped, as if in
prayer, but I could perceive, by a feeble
rocking
of the body, and a convulsive motion of the
lips that she was gazing on the last reliques of
her son with the yearnings of a mother's heart.
The service being ended, preparations were
made to deposit the coffin in the earth. There
was that bustling stir, that breaks so harshly on
the feelings of grief and affection: directions
given in the cold tones of business; the striking
of spades into sand and gravel, which, at the
grave of those we love, is, of all sounds, the
most withering. The bustle around seemed to
awaken the mother from a wretched reverie.
She raised her glazed eyes, and looked about
with a faint wildness. As the men approached
with cords to lower the coffin into the grave,
she wrung her hands and broke into an agony
of grief. The poor woman who attended her
took her by the arm, endeavored to raise her
from the earth, and to whisper something like
consolation--"Nay, now--nay, now--don't
take it so sorely to heart." She could only
shake her head, and wring her hands, as one not
to be comforted.
As they lowere the body into the earth, the
creaking of the cords seemed to agonize her;
but when, on some accidental obstruction, there
was a jolting of the coffin, all the tenderness of
the mother burst forth; as if any harm could
come to him who was far beyoind the reach of
worldly suffering.
I could see no more--my heart swelled into
my throat--my eyes filled with tears--I felt as
if I were acting a barbarous part in standing by
and gazing idly on this scene of maternal
anguish
.
I wandered to another part of the
church yard, where I remained until the funeral
train had dispersed.
When I saw the mother slowly and painfully
quitting the grave, leaving behind her the
remains
of all that was dear to her on earth, and
returning to silence and destitution, my heart
ached for her. What, thought I, are the
distresses
of the rich! they hav friends to soothe--
pleasures to beguile--a world to divert and
dissipate
their griefs. What are the sorrows of the
young! Their growing minds soon close above
the wound--their elastic spirits soon rise
beneath
the pressure--their green and ductile
affections
soon
twine around new objects. But
the sorrows of a widow, aged, solitary,
destitute
,
mourning over an only son, the last solace
of her years; these are the sorrows which make
us feel the impotency of consolation.
It was some time before I left the church
yard. On my way homeward, I met with the
woman who had acted as comforter: she was
just returning from accompanying the mother
to her lonely habitation, and I drew from her
some particulars connected with the affecting
scene I had witnessed.
The pareents of the deceased had resided in
the village from childhood. They had
inhabited
one of the neatest cottages, and by
various
rural occupations, and the assistance of a
small garden, had supported themselves
creditably
and comfortably, and led a happy and a
blameless life. They had one son, who had
grown up to be the staff and pride of their age.
--"Oh sir!" said the good woman, "he was
such a likely lad, so sweet-tempered, so kind
to every one around him, so dutiful to his
parents! It did one's heart good, to see him of
a Sunday, drest out in his best, so tall, so
straight, so cheery, supporting his old mother
to church--for she was always fonder of
leaning
on George's arm, than on her good man's;
and, poor soul, she might well be proud of
him, for a finer lad there was not in the
country
round.
Unfortunately, the son was tempted, during
a year of scarcity and agricultural hardship, to
enter in to the service of one of the small craft
that plied on a neighboring river. He had
not been long in this employ, when he was
entrapped
by a press-gang, and carried off to sea.
His parents received the tidings of his seizure,
but beyond that they could learn nothing. It
was the loss of their main prop. The father,
who was already infirm, grew heartless and
melancholy, and sunk into his grave. The
widow, left lonely in her age and feebleness,
could no longer support herself, and came upon
the parish. Still there was a kind feeling
toward
her throughout the village, and a certain
respect as one of the oldest inhabitants. As
no one applied for the cottage in which she had
passed so many happy days, she was permitted
to remain in it, where she lived solitary and
almost helpless. The few wants of nature
were chiefly supplied from the scanty
productions
of her little garden, which the neighbours
would now and then cultivate for her. It was
but a few days before the time at which these
circumstances were told me, that she was
gathering
some vegetables for her repast, when
she heard the cottage door that faced the
garden
29
suddenly opened. A stranger came out, and
seemed to be looking eagerly and wildly around.
He was dressed in seamen's clothes, was
emaciated
and ghastly pale, and bore the air of one
broken by sickness and hardships. He saw her,
and hastened toward her, but his steps were
faint and faltering; he sank on his knees
before
her, and sobbed like a child. The poor
woman gazed upon him with a vacant and
wandering
eyeOh my dear, dear mother! don't
you know your son! your poor boy George!
It was, indeed, the wreck of her once noble lad;
who, shattered by wounds, by sickness and
foreign
imprisonment, had, at length, dragged his
wasted limbs homeward, to repose among the
scenes of his childhood.
I will not attempt to detail the particulars of
such a meeting, where joy and sorrow were so
completely blended: still he was alive! he was
come home! he might yet live to comfort and
cherish her old age! Nature, however, was
exhausted
in him; and if any thing had been
wanting
to finish the work of fate, the desolation of
his native cottage would have been sufficient.
He stretched himself on the pallet where his
widowed mother had passed many a sleepless
night, and he never rose from it again.
The villagers, when they heard that George
Somers had returned, crowded to see him,
offering
every comfort and assistance that their
humble
means afforded. He, however, was too weak
to talkhe could only look his thanks. His
mother was his constant attendant, and he
seemed
unwilling to be helped by any other hand.
There is something in sickness that breaks
down the pride of manhood; that softens the
heart, and brings it back to the feelings of
infancy
.
Who that has suffered, even in advanced
life, in sickness and despondency; who that has
pined on a weary bed in the neglect and
loneliness
of a foreign land, but has thought on the
mother that looked on his childhood, that
smoothed his pillow, and administered to his
helplessness. Oh! there is an enduring
tenderness
in the love of a mother to a son that
transcends
all other affections of the heart. It is
neither to be chilled by selfishness, nor
daunted
by danger, nor weakened by worthlessness,
nor stifled by ingratitude. She will sacrifice
every comfort to his convenience; she will
surrender
every pleasure to his enjoyment; she
will glory in his fame, and exult in his
prosperity
:
and, if adversity overtakes him, he will be
the dearer to her by misfortune; and if disgrace
settle upon his name, she will still love and
cherish him; and if all the world beside cast
him off, she will be all the world to him.
Poor George Somers had known well what it
was to be in sickness, and none to soothe
lonely
and in prison, and none to visit him. He
could not endure his mother from his sight; if
she moved away, his eye would follow her.
She would sit for hours by his bed, watching
him as he slept. Sometimes he would start
from a feverish dream, look anxiously up until
he saw her venerable form bending over him,
when he would take her hand, lay it on his
bosom
,
and fall asleep with the tranquillity of a
child. In this way he died.
My first impulse on hearing this humble
tale of affliction, was to visit the cottage of the
mourner, and administer pecuniary assistance,
and, if possible, comfort. I found, however, on
inquiry, that the good feelings of the villagers
had prompted them to do every thing that the
case admitted: and as the poor knew best how
to console each other's sorrows, I did not venture
to intrude.
The next Sunday I was at the village church;
when, to my surprise, I saw the poor old
woman
tottering down the aisle to her accustomed
seat on the steps of the altar.
She had made an effort to put on something
like mourning for her son; and nothing could
be more touching than this struggle between
pious affection and utter poverty: a black
riband
or so, a faded black handkerchief, and
one or two more such humble attempts to
express
by outward signs that grief which passes
show. When I looked round upon the storied
monuments; the stately hatchments; the cold
marble pomp, with which grandeur mourned
magnificently over departed pride; and turned
to this poor widow bowed down by age and
sorrow at the altar of her god, and offering up
the prayers and praises of a pious, though a
broken heart, I felt that this living monument
of real grief was worth them all.
I related her story to some of the wealthy
members of the congregation, and they were
moved at it. They exerted themselves to
render
her situation more comfortable, and to
lighten her afflictions. It was, however, but
smoothing a few steps to the grave. In the
course of a Sunday or two after, she was
missed
from her usual seat at church, and before I
left the neighbourhood, I heard, with a feeling of
satisfaction, that she had quietly breathed her
last, and gone to rejoin those she loved, in that
world where sorrow is never known, and friends
are never parted.
THE BOAR'S HEAD TAVERN,
EASTCHEAP.
A SHAKSPEARIAN RESEARCH.
30
A tavern is the rendezvous, the exchange, the staple of good
fellows
.
I have heard my great grandfather tell, how his great great
grandfather should say, that it was an old proverb when his great
grandfather was a child, that `it was a good wind that blew a man to
the wine.'
Mother Bombie
.
It
is a pious custom, in some Catholic
countries
,
to honour the memory of saints by votive
lights burnt before their pictures. The
popularity
of a saint, therefore, may be known by the
number of these offerings. One, perhaps, is
left to moulder in the darkness of his little
chapel
;
another may have a solitary lamp to throw
its blinking rays athwart his effigy; while
the whole blaze of adoration is lavished at the
shrine of some beatified father of renown. The
wealthy devotee brings his huge luminary of
wax; the eager zealot his seven branched
candlestick
,
and even the mendicant pilgrim is, by
no means, satisfied that sufficient light is thrown
upon the deceased, unless he hang up his little
lamp of smoking oil. The consequence is, in
the eagerness to enlighten, they are often apt to
obscure; and I have occasionally seen an
unlucky
saint almost smoked out of countenance
by the officiousness of his followers.
In like manner has it fared with the
immortal
Shakspeare. Every writer considers it his
bounden duty to light up some portion of his
character or works, and rescue some merit from
oblivion. The commentator, opulent in words,
produces vast tomes of dissertations; the
common
herd of editors send up mists of obscurity
from their notes at the bottom of each page, and
every casual scribbler brings his farthing
rush-light
of eulogy or research, to swell the cloud
of incense and of smoke.
As I honour all established usages of my
brethren of the quill, I thought it but proper
to contribute my mite of homage to the
memory
of the illustrious bard. I was for some
time, however, sorely puzzled in what way I
should discharge this duty. I found myself
anticipated in every attempt at a new reading;
every doubtful line had been explained a dozen
different ways, and perplexed beyond the reach
of elucidation; and as to fine passages, they
had all been amply praised by previous
admirers
;
nay, so completely had the bard, of
late, been overlarded with panegyric by a great
German critic, that it was difficult now to find
even a fault that had not been argued into a
beauty.
In this perplexity, I was one morning turning
over his pages, when I happened upon the comic
scenes of Henry IV. and was, in a moment,
completely lost in the mad cap revelry of the
Boar's Head Tavern. So vividly and naturally
are these scenes of humour depicted, and with
such force and consistency are the characters
sustained, that they become mingled up in the
mind with the facts and personages of real
life. To few readers does it occur, that these
are all ideal creations of a poet's brain, and that,
in sober truth, no such knot of merry roysters
ever enlivened the dull neighbourhood of
Eastcheap.
For my part, I love to give myself up to the
illusions of poetry. A hero of fiction who never
existed, is just as valuable to me as a hero of
history who existed a thousand years since:
and, if I may be excused such an insensibility
to the common ties of human nature, I would
not give up fat Jack for half the great men of
ancient chronicle. What have the heroes of
yore done for me, or men like me? They have
conquered countries of which I do not enjoy an
acre; or they have gained laurels of which I do
not inherit a leaf; or they have furnished
examples
of hair brained prowess, which I have
neither the opportunity nor the inclination to
follow. But, old Jack Falstaff!kind Jack
Falstaff!sweet Jack Falstaff! has enlarged
the boundaries of human enjoyment; he has
added vast regions of wit and good humour, in
which the poorest man may revel; and has
bequeathed
a never failing inheritance of jolly
laughter, to make mankind merrier and better to
the latest posterity.
A thought suddenly struck me: I will make
a pilgrimage to Eastcheap, said I, closing the
book, and see if the old Boar's Head Tavern
still exists. Who knows but I may light upon
some legendary traces of Dame Quickly and
her guests; at any rate, there will be a kindred
pleasure in treading the halls once vocal with
their mirth, to that the toper enjoys, in smelling
to the empty cask, once filled with generous
wine.
The resolution was no sooner formed than
put in execution. I forbear to treat of the
various
adventures and wonders I encountered in
my travels; of the haunted regions of
Cocklane
;
of the faded glories of Little Britain, and
the parts adjacent; what perils I ran in
Cateaton
Street and Old Jewry; of the renowned
Guildhall and its two stunted giants, the pride
and wonder of the city, and the terror of all
unlucky
urchins; and how I visited London Stone,
and struck my staff upon it, in imitation of that
arch rebel, Jack Cade.
Let it suffice to say, however, that I at length
arrived in merry Eastcheap, that ancient
region
of wit and wassail, where the very names
of the streets relished of good cheer, as Pudding
lane bears testimony even at the present day.
For Eastcheap, says old Stow, was always
famous for its convivial doings. The cookes
cried hot ribbes of beef rosted, pies well baked,
and other victuals: there was clattering of
pewter
pots, harpe, pipe, and sawtrie. Alas! how
sadly is the scene changed since the roaring
days of Falstaff and old Stow. The mad cap
royster has given place to the plodding
tradesman
;
the clattering of pots and the sound of
harpe and sawtry, to the din of carts and the
accursed dinging of the dustman's bell; and no
song is heard, save, haply, the strain of some
syren from Billingsgate, chaunting the eulogy
of deceased mackerel.
I sought, in vain, for the ancient abode of
Dame Quickly. The only relique of it is a
Boar's head, carved in relief in stone, which
formerly served as the sign, but, at present, is
built into the parting line of two houses which
stand on the scite of the renowned old tavern.
For the history of this little empire of good
fellowship, I was referred to a
tallow-chandler's
widow, opposite, who had been born and
brought up on the spot, and was looked up to
as the indisputable chronicler of the
neighbourhood
.
I found her seated in a little back
parlour, the window of which looked out upon
a yard about eight feet square, laid out as a
flower-garden; while a glass door opposite,
afforded a distant peep of the street, through
a vista of soap and tallow candles; the two
views, which comprised, in all probability, her
prospects of life, and the little world in which
she had lived, and moved, and had her being,
for the better part of a century.
To be versed in the history of Eastcheap,
great and little, from London Stone even unto
the Monument, was, doubtless, in her opinion,
to be acquainted with the history of the
universe
.
Yet, with all this, she possessed the
simplicity of true wisdom, and that liberal,
communicative disposition, which I have
generally
remarked in intelligent old ladies,
knowing
in the concerns of their neighbourhood.
Her information, however, did not extend
far back into antiquity. She could throw no
light upon the history of the Boar's Head,
from the time that Dame Quickly espoused
the valiant Pistol, until the great fire of
London
,
when it was unfortunately burnt down.
It was soon rebuilt, and continued to flourish
under the old name and sign, until a dying
landlord, struck with remorse for double scores,
bad measures, and other inquities which are
incident to the sinful race of Publicans,
endeavoured
to make his peace with heaven, by
bequeathing
31
the tavern to St. Michael's Church,
Crooked Lane, toward the supporting of a
chaplain. For some time the vestry meetings
were regularly held there; but it was observed
that the old Boar never held up his head under
church government. He gradually declined,
and finally gave his last gasp about thirty years
since. The tavern was then turned into shops;
but a picture of it was still preserved in St.
Michael's
Church, which stood just in the rear.
To get a sight of this picture was now my
determination; so, having informed myself of
the abode of the sexton, I took my leave of the
venerable chronicler of Eastcheap, my visit
having doubtless raised greatly her opinion of
her legendary lore, and furnished an important
incident in the history of her life.
It cost me some difficulty, and much curious
inquiry, to ferret out the humble hanger-on to
the church. I had to explore Crooked Lane,
and divers little alleys, and elbows, and dark
passages, with which this old city is perforated,
like an ancient cheese, or a worm-eaten chest
of drawers. At length I traced him to a
corner
of a small court, surrounded by lofty
houses, where the inhabitants enjoy about as
much of the face of heaven, as a community
of frogs at the bottom of a well. The sexton
was a meek, acquiescing little man, of a
bowing
,
lowly habit; yet he had a pleasant
twinkle
in his eye, and if encouraged, would now
and then venture a small pleasantry, such as a
man of his low estate might venture to make
in the company of high church wardens, and
other mighty men of the earth. I found him
in company with the deputy organist, seated
apart, like Milton's angels, discoursing, no doubt,
on high doctrinal points, and settling the affairs
of the church over a friendly pot of alefor
the lower classes of English seldom deliberate
on any weighty matter without the assistance
of a cool tankard to clear their understandings.
I arrived at the moment when they had finished
their ale and their argument, and were about to
repair to the church to put it in order; so,
having
made known my wishes, I received their
gracious permission to accompany them.
The Church of St. Michael's, Crooked Lane,
standing at a short distance from
Billingsgate
,
is enriched with the tombs of many
fishmongers
of renown; and as every profession
has its galaxy of glory, and its constellation of
great men, I presume the monument of a
mighty fishmonger of the olden time is
regarded
with as much reverence by succeeding
generations
of the craft, as poets feel on
contemplating
the tomb of Virgil, or soldiers the
monument of a Marlborough or a Turenne.
I cannot but turn aside, while thus speaking
of illustrious men, to observe, that St. Michael's,
Crooked Lane, contains also the ashes of that
doughty champion, William Walworth, Knight,
who so manfully clove down the sturdy wight,
Wat Tyler, in Smithfield, a hero worthy of
honourable blazon, as almost the only Lord
Mayor on record famous for deeds of arms:
the sovereigns of Cockney being generally
renowned
as the most pacific of all potentates.
*
*
The following was the ancient inscription on the monument of
this worthy, which, unhappily, was destroyed in the great
conflagration
.
Hereunder lyth a man of Fame,
William Walworth callyd by name:
Fishmonger he was in lyfftime here,
And twise Lord Maior, as in Books appere;
Who, with courage stout and manly myght,
Slew Jack Straw in Kyng Richard's syght.
For which act done, and trew entent,
The Kyng made him knyght incontinent;
And gave him armes, as here you see,
To declare his Fact and chivaldrie.
He left this lyff the yere of our God
Thirteen hondred fourscore and three odd.
An error in the foregoing inscription has been corrected by the
venerable
Stow. Whereas, saith he, it hath been far spread abroad
by vulgar opinion, that the rebel smitten down so manfully by Sir
William
Walworth, the then worthy Lord Maior, was named Jack Straw,
and not Wat Tyler, I thought good to reconcile this rash conceived
doubt by such testimony as I find in ancient and good records. The
principal leaders, or captains, of the commons, were Wat Tyler, as the
first man; the second was John, or Jack, Straw, &c. &c.
Stow's London.
Adjoining the church, in a small cemetery,
immediately under the back windows of what
was once the Boar's Head, stands the tomb
stone of Robert Preston, whilome drawer at
the tavern. It is now nearly a century since
this trusty drawer of good liquor closed his
bustling career, and was thus quietly deposited
within call of his customers. As I was
clearing
away the weeds from his epitaph, the little
sexton drew me on one side with a mysterious
air, and informed me in a low voice, that once
upon a time, on a dark wintry night, when the
wind was unruly, howling and whistling,
banging
about doors and windows, and twirling
weathercocks, so that the living were
frightened
out of their beds, and even the dead
could not sleep quietly in their graves, the
ghost of honest Preston, which happened to
be airing itself in the churchyard, was attracted
by the well-known call of waiter from the
Boar's Head, and made its sudden appearance
in the midst of a roaring club, just as the parish
clerk was singing a stave from the mirrie
garland
of Captain Death, to the discomfiture of
sundry train-band captains, and the conversion
of an infidel attorney, who became a zealous
christian on the spot, and was never known to
twist the truth afterwards, except in the way of
business.
I beg it may be remembered, that I do not
pledge myself for the authenticity of this
anecdote
,
though it is well known that the
churchyards
and by-corners of this old metropolis are
very much infested with perturbed spirits, and
every one must have heard of the Cock Lane
ghost, and the apparition that guards the
regalia
in the Tower, which has frightened so many
bold sentinels almost out of their wits.
Be all this as it may, this Robert Preston seems
to have been a worthy successor to the
nimble-tongued
Francis, who attended upon the revels
of Prince Hal, to have been equally prompt
with his anon, anon, sir, and to have
transcended
his predecessor in honesty, for Falstaff,
the veracity of whose taste no man will venture
to impeach, flatly accuses Francis of putting
lime in his sack; whereas honest Preston's
epitaph lauds him for the sobriety of his
conduct
,
the soundness of his wine, and the fairness
of his measure.
*
*
As this inscription is rife with excellent morality, I transcribe it for
the admonition of delinquent Tapsters. It is, no doubt, the production
of some choice spirit, who once frequented the Boar's Head.
Bacchus, to give the toping world surprise,
Produced one sober son, and here he lies.
Though rear'd among full hogsheads, he defy'd
The charms of wine, and every one beside.
O reader, if to justice thou'rt inclin'd,
Keep honest Preston daily in thy mind.
He drew good wine, took care to fill his pots,
Had sundry virtues that excus'd his faults.
You that on Bacchus have the like dependance,
Pray copy Bob, in measure and attendance.
The worthy dignitaries of
the church, however, did not appear much
captivated
by the sober virtues of the tapster; the
deputy organist, who had a moist look out of
the eye, made some shrewd remark on the
abstemiousness
of a man brought up among full
hogsheads, and the little sexton corroborated
his opinion by a significant wink, and a dubious
shake of the head.
Thus far my researches, though they threw
much light on the history of tapsters,
fishmongers
,
and Lord Mayors, yet disappointed me
in the great object of my quest, the picture of
the Boar's Head Tavern. No such painting
was to be found in the church of St. Michael's.
Marry and amen! said I, here endeth my
research! So I was giving the matter up,
with the air of a baffled antiquary, when my
friend the sexton, perceiving me to be curious
in every thing relative to the old tavern, offered
to show me the choice vessels of the vestry,
which had been handed down from remote
times, when the parish meetings were held at
the Boar's Head. These were deposited in
the parish club room, which had been
transferred
,
on the decline of the ancient
establishment
,
to a tavern in the neighbourhood.
A few steps brought us to the house, which
stands No. 12 Mile Lane, bearing the title of
The Masons' Arms, and is kept by Master
Edward
Honeyball, the bully-rock of the
establishment
.
It is one of those little taverns
which abound in the heart of the city, and
form the centre of gossip and intelligence of
the neighbourhood. We entered the bar-room,
which was narrow and darkling; for in these
close lanes but few rays of reflected light are
32
enabled to struggle down to the inhabitants,
whose broad day is at best but a tolerable
twilight
.
The room was partitioned into boxes,
each containing a table spread with a clean
white cloth, ready for dinner. This showed
that the guests were of the good old stamp,
and divided their day equally, for it was but
just one o'clock. At the lower end of the
room was a clear coal fire, before which a
breast of lamb was roasting. A row of bright
brass candlesticks and pewter mugs glistened
along the mantle piece, and an old fashioned
clock ticked in one corner. There was
something
primitive in this medley of kitchen,
parlour
,
and hall, that carried me back to earlier
times, and pleased me. The place, indeed, was
humble, but every thing had that look of order
and neatness, that bespeaks the superintendence
of a notable English housewife. A group of
amphibious looking beings, who might be either
fishermen or sailors, were regaling themselves
in one of the boxes. As I was a visiter of
rather higher pretensions, I was ushered into
a little mis-shapen back room, having at least
nine corners. It was lighted by a sky-light,
furnished with antiquated leathern chairs, and
ornamented with the portrait of a fat pig. It
was evidently appropriated to particular
customers
,
and I found a shabby gentleman, in a
red nose, and oil-cloth hat, seated in one corner,
meditating on a half-empty pot of porter.
The old sexton had taken the landlady aside,
and with an air of profound importance
imparted
to her my errand. Dame Honeyball
was a likely, plump, bustling, little woman,
and no bad substitute for that paragon of
hostesses
,
Dame Quickly. She seemed delighted
with an opportunity to oblige, hurried up stairs
to the archives of her house, where the precious
vessels of the parish club were deposited, and
returned, smiling and courtesying, with them
in her hands.
The first she presented me was a
japanned
iron tobacco box, of gigantic size, out
of which, I was told, the vestry had smoked at
their stated meetings, since time immemorial;
and which was never suffered to be profaned
by vulgar hands, or used on common
occasions
.
I received it with becoming reverence;
but what was my delight, at beholding on its
cover the identical painting of which I was in
quest. There was displayed the outside of the
Boar's Head Tavern, and before the door the
whole convivial group, at table, in full revel,
pictured with that wonderful fidelity and force,
with which the portraits of renowned generals
and commodores are illustrated on tobacco
boxes, for the benefit of posterity. Lest,
however
,
there should be any mistake, the
cunning
limner had warily inscribed the names of
Prince Hal and Falstaff on the bottoms of their
chairs.
On the inside of the cover was an
inscription
,
nearly obliterated, recording that this box
was the gift of Sir Richard Gore, for the use
of the vestry meetings at the Boar's Head
Tavern, and that it was repaired and
beautified
by his successor, Mr. John Packard,
1767. Such is a faithful description of this
august and venerable relique, and I question
whether the learned Scriblerius contemplated
his Roman shield, or the Knights of the round
table the long-sought san-greal, with more
exultation.
While I was meditating on it with
enraptured
gaze, Dame Honeyball, who was highly
gratified by the interest it excited, put in my
hands a drinking cup or goblet, which also
belonged
to the vestry, and was descended from
the old Boar's Head. It bore the inscription
of having been the gift of Francis Wythers,
Knight, and was held, she told me, in exceeding
great value, being considered very antyke.
This last opinion was strengthened by the
shabby gentleman in the red nose and oil-cloth
hat, and whom I strongly suspect to be a lineal
descendant from the valiant Bardolph. He
suddenly aroused from his meditation on the
pot of porter, and casting a knowing look at
the goblet, exclaimed, aye, aye, the head don't
ache now, that made that there article.
The great importance attached to this me
mento of ancient revelry by modern church
wardens, at first puzzled me; but there is
nothing
sharpens the apprehension so much as
antiquarian research; for I immediately
perceived
that this could be no other than the
identical
parcel-gilt goblet on which Falstaff
made his loving, but faithless, vow to Dame
Quickly; and which would, of course, be
treasured
up with care among the regalia of her
domains, as a testimony of that solemn
contract
.
*
*
Thou didst swear to me upon a
parcel-gilt goblet
, sitting in my
Dolphin chamber, at the round table, by a sea-coal fire, on Wednesday
in Whitsun-week, when the prince broke thy head for likening his
father
to a singing man of Windsor; thou didst swear to me then, as I
was washing thy wound, to marry me, and make me my lady, thy
wife. Canst thou deny it?
Henry
IV.
part
2.
Mine hostess, indeed, gave me a long history
how the goblet had been handed down from
generation to generation. She also
entertained
me with many particulars concerning the
worthy vestrymen who have seated themselves
thus quietly on the stools of the ancient roysters
of Eastcheap, and, like so many commentators,
utter clouds of smoke in honour of Shakspeare.
These I forbear to relate, lest my readers should
not be as curious in these matters as myself.
Suffice it to say, the neighbours, one and
all, about Eastcheap, believe that Falstaff and
his merry crew actually lived and revelled
there. Nay, there are several legendary
anecdotes
concerning him still extant among the
oldest frequenters of the Masons' Arms, which
they give, as transmitted down from their
forefathers
;
and Mr. M`Kash, an Irish hair dresser,
whose shop stands ont he site of the old Boar's
Head, has several dry jokes of Fat Jack's, not
laid down in the books, with which he makes
his customers ready to die of laughter.
I now turned to my friend the sexton to
make some farther inquiries, but I found him
sunk in pensive meditation. His head had
declined
a little on one side; a deep sigh heaved
from the very bottom of his stomach, and,
though I could not see a tear trembling in his
eye, yet a moisture was evidently stealing from
a corner of his mouth. I followed the
direction
of his eye through the door which stood
open, and found it fixed wistfully on the savoury
breast of lamb, roasting in dripping richness
before the fire.
I now called to mind, that in the eagerness
of my recondite investigation, I was keeping
the poor man from his dinner. My bowels
yearned with sympathy, and putting in his
hand a small token of my gratitude and good
will, I departed with a hearty benediction on
him, Dame Honeyball, and the parish club of
Crooked Lane;not forgetting my shabby,
but sententious friend, in the oil-cloth hat and
copper nose.
Thus have I given a tedious brief account
of this interesting research, for which, if it
prove too short and unsatisfactory, I can only
plead my inexperience in this branch of
literature
,
so deservedly popular at the present day.
I am aware that a more skilful illustrator of the
immortal bard would have swelled the
materials
I have touched upon, to a good
merchantable
bulk, comprising the biographies of
William
Walworth, Jack Straw, and Robert
Preston
;
some notice of the eminent fishmongers
of St. Michael's; the history of Eastcheap,
great and little; private anecdotes of Dame
Honeyball and her pretty daughter, whom I
have not even mentioned; to say nothing of a
damsel tending the breast of lamb, (and whom,
by the way, I remarked to be a comely lass,
with a neat foot and ancle;)the whole
enlivened
by the riots of Wat Tyler, and
illuminated
by the great fire of London.
All this I leave as a rich mine, to be worked
by future commentators; nor do I despair of
seeing the tobacco box, and the parcel-gilt
goblet, which I have thus brought to light,
the subjects of future engravings, and almost
as fruitful of voluminous dissertations and
disputes
as the shield of Achilles, or the far-famed
Portland vase.THE
MUTABILITY OF LITERATURE.
A COLLOQUY IN WESTMINSTER ABBEY.
I know that all beneath the moon decays,
And what by mortals in this world is brought,
In time's great periods shall return to nought.
I know that all the muses' heavenly layes,
With toil of sprite which are so dearly bought,
As idle sounds of few or none are sought,
That there is nothing lighter than mere praise.
Drummond of Hawthornden
.
There
are certain half-dreaming moods of
mind, in which we naturally steal away from
noise and glare, and seek some quiet haunt,
where we may indulge our reveries and build
our air castles undisturbed. In such a mood I
was loitering about the old gray cloisters of
Westminster Abbey, enjoying that luxury of
wandering thought which one is apt to
dignify
with the name of reflection, when
suddenly
an irruption of madcap boys from
Westminster
school, playing at foot-ball, broke in
upon the monastic stillness of the place,
making
the vaulted passages and mouldering
tombs echo with their merriment. I sought to
take refuge from their noise by penetrating still
deeper into the solitudes of the pile, and
applied
to one of the vergers for admission to the
library. He conducted me through a portal
rich with the crumbling sculpture of former
ages, which opened upon a gloomy passage
leading to the chapter house and the chamber
where doomsday book is deposited. Just
within the passage is a small door on the left.
To this the verger applied a key; it was double
locked, and opened with some difficulty, as if
seldom used. We now ascended a dark
narrow
staircase, and passing through a second
door, entered the library.
I found myself in a lofty antique hall, the
roof supported by massive joists of old English
oak. It was soberly lighted by a row of Gothic
windows at a considerable height from the
floor, and which apparently opened upon the
roofs of the cloisters. An ancient picture of
some reverend dignitary of the church in his
robes hung over the fire place. Around the
hall and in a small gallery were the books,
arranged
in carved oaken cases. They consisted
principally of old polemical writers, and were
much more worn by time than use. In the
centre of the library was a solitary table with
two or three books on it; an inkstand without
ink, and a few pens parched by long disuse.
The place seemed fitted for quiet study and
profound meditation. It was buried deep
among the massive walls of the abbey, and
shut up from the tumult of the world. I
could only hear now and then the shouts of the
schoolboys faintly swelling from the cloister,
and the sound of a bell tolling for prayers, that
soberly echoed along the roofs of the abbey.
By degrees the shouts of merriment grew fainter
and fainter, and at length died away. The
bell ceased to toll, and the most profound silence
reigned through the dusky hall.
I had taken down a little thick quarto,
curiously
bound in parchment, with brass clasps,
and seated myself at the table in a venerable
elbow chair. Instead of reading, however, I
was beguiled by the solemn monastic air, and
noiseless quiet of the place, into a train of
musing
.
As I looked around upon the old volumes
in their mouldering covers, thus ranged on the
shelves, and apparently never disturbed in their
repose, I could not but consider the library a
kind of literary catacomb, where authors, like
mummies, are piously entombed, and left to
blacken and moulder in dusty oblivion.
How much, thought I, has each of these
volumes, now thrust aside with such
indifference
,
cost some aching head; how many weary
dayshow many sleepless nights. How have
their authors buried themselves in the solitude
of cells and cloisters; shut themselves up from
the face of man, and the still more blessed face
of nature, and devoted themselves to painful
34
research and intense reflection. And all for
what! to occupy an inch of dusty shelfto
have the title of their works read now and then
in a future age, by some drowsy churchman,
or casual straggler like myself; and in another
age to be lost, even to remembrance. Such is
the amount of this boasted immortality.A
mere temporary rumour, a local sound, like the
tone of that bell which has just tolled among
these towers, filling the ear for a moment
lingering transiently in echoand then passing
away, like a thing that was not!
While I sat half murmuring, half meditating
these unprofitable speculations, with my head
resting on my hand, I was thrumming with the
other hand upon the quarto, until I accidentally
loosened the clasps, when, to my utter
astonishment
,
the little book gave two or three yawns,
like one awaking from a deep sleep; then a
husky hem, and at length began to talk. At
first its voice was very hoarse and broken,
being much troubled by a cobweb that some
studious spider had woven across it; and
having
probably contracted a cold from long
exposure
to the chills and damps of the abbey.
In a short time, however, it became more
distinct
,
and I soon found it an exceedingly fluent
conversable little tome. Its language, to be
sure, was rather quaint and obsolete, and its
pronunciation, what, in the present day, would
be deemed barbarous; but I shall endeavour, as
far as I am able, to render it in modern
parlance
.
It began with railings about the neglect of
the worldmerit being suffered to languish in
obscurity, and other such common place topics
of literary repining, and complained bitterly
that it had not been opened for more than two
centuries. That the Dean only looked now
and then into the library, sometimes took down
a volume or two, trifled with them for a few
moments, and then returned them to their
shelves. What a plague do they mean, said
the little quarto, which I began to perceive was
somewhat choleric, what a plague do they
mean by keeping several thousand volumes of
us shut up here, and watched by a set of old
vergers
like so many beauties in a harem, merely
to be looked at now and then by the Dean.
Books were written to give pleasure and to be
enjoyed; and I would have a rule passed that
the Dean should pay each of us a visit at least
once a year; or if he is not equal to the task,
let them once in a while turn loose the whole
school of Westminster among us, that at any
rate we may now and then have an airing.
Softly, my worthy friend, replied I, you
are not aware how much better you are off
than most books of your generation. By
being
stored away in this ancient library, you are
like the treasured remains of those saints and
monarchs which lie enshrined in the adjoining
chapels, while the remains of their
contemporary
mortals, left to the ordinary course of
nature
,
have long since returned to dust.
Sir, said the little tome, ruffling his
leaves and looking big, I was written for all
the world, not for the bookworms of an abbey.
I was intended to circulate from hand to hand,
like other great contemporary works; but here
have I been clasped up for more than two
centuries
,
and might have silently fallen a prey to
these worms that are playing the very
vengeance
with my intestines, if you had not by
chance given me an opportunity of uttering a
few last words before I go to pieces.
My good friend, rejoined I, had you
been left to the circulation of which you speak,
you would long ere this have been no more.
To judge from your physiognomy, you are now
well stricken in years: very few of your
contemporaries
can be at present in existence; and
those few owe it to being immured like
yourself
in old libraries; which, suffer me to add,
instead
of likening to harams, you might more
properly and gratefully have compared to those
infirmaries attached to religious establishments,
for the benefit of the old and decrepid, and
where, by quiet fostering and no employment,
they often endure to an amazingly good for
nothing
old age. You talk of your
contemporaries
as if in circulationwhere do we meet with
their works? what do we hear of Robert
Grosteste
of Lincoln? No one could have toiled
harder than he for immortality. He is said to
have written nearly two hundred volumes. He
built, as it were, a pyramid of books to
perpetuate
his name: but, alas! the pyramid has long
since fallen, and only a few fragments are
scattered
in various libraries, where they are
scarcely disturbed even by the antiquarian.
What do we hear of Gyraldus Cambrensis, the
historian, antiquary, philosopher, theologian,
and poet? He declined two bishopries that he
might shut himself up and write for posterity;
but posterity never inquires after his labours.
What of Henry of Huntingdon, who, beside a
learned history of England, wrote a treatise on
the contempt of the world, which the world
has revenged by forgetting him. What is
quoted
of Joseph of Exeter, styled the miracle of
his age in classical composition? Of his three
great heroic poems one is lost forever, excepting
a mere fragment; the others are known only
to a few of the curious in literature, and as to
his love verses and epigrams, they have entirely
disappeared. What is in current use of John
Wallis, the franciscan, who acquired the name
of the tree of life? Of William of
Malmsbury
;of
Simeon of Durham; of Benedict of
Petersborough; of John Hanvill of St. Albans;
of
Prithee, friend, cried the quarto in a testy
tone, how old do you think me? You are
talking
of authors that lived long before my time,
and wrote either in Latin or French, so that
they in a manner expatriated themselves, and
deserved to be forgotten;
*
*
In Latin and French hath many soueraine wittes had great
delyte
to endite, and have many noble thinges fulfilde, but certes there
ben some that speaken their poisye in French, of which speche the
French men have as good a fantasye as we have in heryng of
Frenchemen's
Englishe.
Chaucer's Testament of Love.
but I, sir, was
ushered
into the world from the press of the
renowned
Wynkyn de Worde. I was written in
my own native tongue at a time when the
language
had become fixed, and indeed I was
considered
a model of pure and elegant English.
(I should observe that these remarks were
couched in such intolerably antiquated terms,
that I had infinite difficulty to render them into
modern phraseology.)
I cry you mercy, said I, for mistaking
your age; but it matters little; almost all the
writers of your time have likewise passed into
forgetfulness; and De Worde's publications
are mere literary rarities among
book-collectors
.
The purity and stability of language, too,
on which you found your claims to perpetuity,
have been the fallacious dependence of authors
of every age, even back to the times of the
worthy Robert of Gloucester, who wrote his
history in rhymes of mongrel Saxon.
*
*
Holinshed, in his Chronicle, observes, afterward, also, by diligent
travell of Geffray Chaucer and John Gowre, in the time of Richard
the second, and after them of John Scogan and John Lydgate, monke
of Berrie, our said toong was brought to an excellent passe,
notwithstanding
that it never came unto the type of perfection until the time
of Queen Elizabeth, wherein John Jewell, Bishop of Sarum, John
Fox, and sundrie learned and excellent writers, have fully
accomplished
the ornature of the same, to their great praise and immortal
commendation
.
Even,
now, many talk of Spenser's well of pure
English undefiled, as if the language ever
sprang from a well or fountain head, and was
not rather a mere confluence of various tongues,
perpetually subject to changes and
intermixtures
.
It is this which has made English
literature so extremely mutable, and the
reputation
built upon it so fleeting. Unless
thought can be committed to something more
permanent and unchangeable than such a
medium
,
even thought must share the fate of
every thing else, and fall into decay. This
should serve as a check upon the vanity and
exultation of the most popular writer. He
finds the language in which he has embarked
his fame gradually altering, and subject to the
dilapidations of time and the caprice of fashion.
He looks back and beholds the early authors
of his country, once the favourites of their
day, supplanted by modern writers. A few
short ages have covered them with obscurity,
and their merits can only be relished by the
quaint taste of the bookworm. And such he
anticipates, will be the fate of his work.
35
which, however it may be admired in its day,
and held up as a model of purity, will in the
course of years grow antiquated and obsolete,
until it becomes almost as unintelligible in its
native land as an Egyptian obelisk, or one of
those Runic inscriptions said to exist in the
deserts of Tartary. I declare, added I with
some emotion, when I contemplate a modern
library, filled with new works in all the bravery
of rich gilding and binding, I feel disposed to
sit down and weep, like the good Xerxes when
he surveyed his army, pranked out in all the
splendour of military array, and reflected that
in one hundred years not one of them would
be in existence!
Ah, said the little quarto, with a heavy
sigh, I see how it is; these modern scribblers
have superseded all the good old authors. I
suppose nothing is read now-a-days but Sir
Philip Sidney's Arcadia, Sackville's stately
plays, and Mirror for Magistrates, or the
finespun
euphuisms of the unparraleld John
Lyly.
There you are again mistaken, said I,
the writers whom you suppose in vogue,
because
they happened to be so when you were
last in circulation, have long since had their
day. Sir Philip Sydney's Arcadia, the
immortality
of which was so fondly predicted by his
admirers,
*
*
Live ever sweete booke; the silver image of his gentle witt, and
the golden pillar of his noble courage; and ever notify unto the
world that thy writer was the secretary of eloquence, the breath of
the muses, the honey bee of the dayntiest flowers of witt and arte, the
pith of morale and intellectual virtues, the arme of Bellona in the
field, the tongue of Suada in the chamber, the spirite of Practise in
esse, and the paragon of excellency in print.
Harvey's Pierce's Supererogation.
and which, in truth, is full of noble
thoughts, delicate images, and graceful turns of
language, is now scarcely ever mentioned.
Sackville has strutted into obscurity; and even
Lyly, though his writings were once the
delight
of a court, and apparently perpetuated by
a proverb, is now scarcely known even by name.
A whole crowd of authors who wrote and
wrangled
at the time, have likewise gone down with
all their writings and their controversies. Wave
after wave of succeeding literature has rolled
over them, until they are buried so deep, that
it is only now and then some industrious diver
after the fragments of antiquity brings up a
specimen
for the gratification of the curious.
For my part, I continued, I consider this
mutability of language a wise precaution of
Providence
for the benefit of the world at large,
and authors in particular. To reason from
analogy
,
we daily behold the varied and beautiful
tribes of vegetables springing up, flourishing,
adorning the fields for a short time, and then
fading into dust, to make way for their
successors
.
Were not this the case, the fecundity of
nature would be a grievance instead of a
blessing
.
The earth would groan with rank and
excessive vegetation, and its surface become a
tangled wilderness. In like manner, the works
of genius and learning decline and make way
for subsequent productions. Language
gradually
varies, and with it fade away the writings
of authors who have flourished their allotted
time; otherwise the creative powers of genius
would overwhelm the world with productions
and the mind would be completely
bewildered
in the endless mazes of literature.
Formerly
there were some restraints on this
excessive
multiplication. Works had to be
transcribed
by hand, which was a slow and
laborious
operation; they were written either on
parchment, which was expensive, so that one
work was often erased to make way for another;
or on papyrus, which was fragile and extremely
perishable. Authorship was a limited and
unprofitable
craft, and pursued chiefly by monks
in the leisure and solitude of their cloisters.
The accumulation of manuscripts was slow and
costly, and confined almost entirely to
monasteries
.
To these circumstances it may in some
measure be owing that we have not been
inundated
by the intellect of antiquity; that the
fountains of thought have not been broken up,
and modern genius drowned in the deluge. But
the inventions of paper and the press have put
an end to all these restraints. They have made
every one a writer, and enabled every mind to
pour itself into print, and diffuse itself over the
whole intellectual world. The consequences
are alarming. The stream of literature has
swoln into a torrentgrown into a river
expanded
into a sea. A few centuries since, five
or six hundred manuscripts constituted a great
library; but what would you say to libraries,
such as actually exist, containing three and four
hundred thousand volumes; legions of authors
at the same time busy, and a press going on with
fearfully increasing activity, to double and
quadruple the number. Unless some unforseen
mortality should break out among the progeny
of the muse, now that she has become so
prolific
,
I tremble for posterity. I fear the mere
fluctuation
of language will not be sufficient.
Criticism
may do much; it increases with the
increase
of literature, and resembles one of those
salutary checks on population spoken of by
economists
.
All possible encouragement, therefore,
should be given to the growth of critics, good
or bad. But I fear all will be in vain; let
criticism
do what it may, writers will write,
printers
will print, and the world will inevitably be
overstocked with good books. It will soon be
the employment of a life time merely to learn
their names. Many a man of passable
information
at the present day reads scarce any thing
but reviews, and before long a man of erudition
will be little better than a mere walking
catalogue
.
My very good sir, said the little quarto,
yawning most drearily in my face, excuse my
interrupting you, but I perceive you are rather
given to prose. I would ask the fate of an
author
who was making some noise just as I left
the world. His reputation, however, was
considered
quite temporary. The learned shook
their heads at him, for he was a poor half
educated
varlet, that knew little of Latin, and
nothing
of Greek, and had been obliged to run the
country for deer stealing. I think his name was
Shakspeare. I presume he soon sunk into
oblivion
.
On the contrary, said I, it is owing to
that very man that the literature of his period
has experienced a duration beyond the ordinary
term of English literature. There arise
authors
now and then, who seem proof against
the mutability of language, because they have
rooted themselves in the unchanging principles
of human nature. They are like gigantic trees
that we sometimes see on the banks of a stream;
which, by their vast and deep roots, penetrating
through the mere surface, and laying hold on
the very foundations of the earth, preserve the
soil around them from being swept away by the
everflowing current, and hold up many a
neighbouring
plant, and, perhaps, worthless weed, to
perpetuity. Such is the case with Shakspeare,
whom we behold, defying the encroachments of
time, retaining in modern use the language and
literature of his day, and giving duration to many
an indifferent author, merely from having
flourished
in his vicinity. But even he, I grieve to
say, is gradually assuming the tint of age, and
his whole form is overrun by a profusion of
commentators, who, like clambering vines and
creepers, almost bury the noble plant that
upholds
them.
Here the little quarto began to heave his sides
and chuckle, until at length he broke out into
a short plethoric fit of laughter that had well
nigh choked him, by reason of his excessive
corpulency. Mighty well! cried he, as
soon as he could recover breath, mighty well!
and so you would persuade me that the
literature
of an age is to be perpetuated by a
vagabond
deer stealer! by a man without learning!
by a poet, forsootha poet! And here he
wheezed forth another fit of laughter.
I confess I felt somewhat nettled at this
rudeness
,
which I ascribed to his having flourished
in a less polished age. I determined,
nevertheless
,
not to give up my point.
Yes, resumed I positively, a poet; for
of all writers he has the best chance for
immortality
.
Others may write from the head, but
he writes from the heart, and the heart will
always
understand him. He is the faithful
portrayer
of nature, whose features are always the
same, and always interesting. Prose writers
are voluminous and unwieldy; their pages
36
crowded with common places, and their thoughts
expanded into tediousness. But with the true
poet every thing is terse, touching, or brilliant.
He gives the choicest thoughts in the choicest
language. He illustrates them by every thing
that he sees most striking in nature and art.
He enriches them by pictures of human life,
such as it is passing before him. His writings,
therefore, contain the spirit, the aroma, if I may
use the phrase, of the age in which he lives.
They are caskets which inclose within a small
compass the wealth of the languageits family
jewels, which are thus transmitted in a
portable
form to posterity. The setting may
occasionally
be antiquated, and require now and then to
be renewed, as in the case of Chaucer; but the
brilliancy and intrinsic value of the gems
continue
unaltered. Cast a look back over the long
reach of literary history. What vast valleys of
dulness, filled with monkish legends and
academical
controversies. What bogs of
theological
speculations; what dreary wastes of
metaphysics
.
Here and there only we behold the
heaven-illumined bards, elevated like beacons
on their widely-separated heights, to transmit
the pure light of poetical intelligence from age
to age.
*
*
Thorow earth, and waters deepe,
The pen by skill doth passe:
And featly nyps the worldes abuse,
And shoes us in a glasse,
The vertu and the vice
Of every wight alyve;
The honey combe that bee doth make,
Is not so sweete in hyve,
As are the golden leves
That drops from poets head:
Which doth surmount our common talke
As farre as dros doth lead.
Churchyard
.
I was just about to launch forth into
eulogiums
upon the poets of the day, when the
sudden
opening of the door caused me to turn my
head. It was the verger, who came to inform
me that it was time to close the library. I
sought to have a parting word with the quarto,
but the worthy little tome was silent; the
clasps were closed, and it looked perfectly
unconscious
of all that had passed. I have been
to the library two or three times since, and
endeavoured
to draw it into farther conversation,
but in vain. And whether all this rambling
colloquy actually took place, or whether it was
another of those odd day dreams to which I am
subject, I have never, to this moment, been able
to discover.
RURAL FUNERALS.
Here's a few flowers; but about midnight more:
The herbs that have on them cold dew o' the night
Are strewings fitt'st for graves.
You were as flowers now wither'd: even so
These herb'lets shall, which we upon you strow.
Cymbeline
.
Among
the beautiful and simple-hearted
customs
of rural life which still linger in some parts
of England, are those of strewing flowers
before
the funerals, and planting them at the
graves, of departed friends. These, it is said,
are the remains of some of the rites of the
primitive church; but they are of still higher
antiquity, being mentioned in the classic
writers
,
and no doubt were the spontaneous
tributes
of unlettered affection, originating long
before art had tasked itself to modulate sorrow
into song, or story it on the monument. They
are now only to be met with in the most
distant
and retired places of the kingdom, where
fashion and innovation have not been able to
throng in, and trample out all the curious and
interesting traces of the olden time.
In Glamorganshire, we are told, the bed
whereon the corpse lies, is covered with
flowers
,
a custom alluded to in one of the wild and
plaintive ditties of Ophelia:
White his shroud as the mountain snow
Larded all with sweet flowers;
Which be-wept to the grave did go,
With true-love showers.
There is also a most delicate and beautiful
rite observed in some of the remote villages of
the south, at the funeral of a female who has
died young and unmarried. A chaplet of white
flowers is borne before the corpse by a young
girl nearest in age, size, and resemblance, and
is afterwards hung up in the church over the
37
accustomed seat of the deceased. These
chaplets
are sometimes made of white paper, in
imitation of flowers, and inside of them is
generally
a pair of white gloves. They are
intended
as emblems of the purity of the
deceased
,
and the crown of glory which she has
received in heaven.
In some parts of the country, also, the dead
are carried to the grave with the singing of
psalms and hymns: a kind of triumph, to
show, says Bourne, that they have finished
their course with joy, and are become
conquerors
.
This, I am informed, is observed in some of
the northern counties, particularly in
Northumberland
,
and it has a pleasing, though
melancholy
effect, to hear, of a still evening, in some
lonely country scene, the mournful melody of
a funeral dirge swelling from a distance, and
to see the train slowly moving along the
landscape
.
There is also a solemn respect paid by
the traveller to the passing funeral in these
sequestered
places, for such spectacles, occurring
among the quiet abodes of nature, sink deep
into the soul. As the mourning train
approaches
,
he pauses, uncovered, to let it go
by; he then follows silently in the rear;
sometimes
quite to the grave, at other times for a
few hundred yards, and having paid this tribute
of respect to the deceased, turns and resumes
his journey.
The rich vein of melancholy which runs
through the English character, and gives it
some of its most touching and ennobling graces,
is finely evidenced in these pathetic customs,
and in the solicitude shown by the common
people for an honoured and a peaceful grave.
The humblest peasant, whatever may be his
lowly lot while living, is anxious that some
little respect may be paid to his remains. Sir
Thomas Overbury, describing the faire and
happy milkmaid, observes, thus lives she,
and all her care is, that she may die in the
spring time, to have store of flowers stucke
upon her winding sheet. The poets, too, who
always breathe the feeling of a nation,
continually
advert to this fond solicitude about the
grave. In The Maid's Tragedy, by
Beaumont
and Fletcher, there is a beautiful instance
of the kind, describing the capricious
melancholy
of a broken-hearted girl:
When she sees a bank
Stuck full of flowers, she, with a sigh, will tell
Her servants, what a pretty place it were
To bury lovers in; and make her maids
Pluck 'em, and strew her over like a corse.
The custom of decorating graves was once
universally prevalent: osiers were carefully
bent over them to keep the turf uninjured,
and evergreens and flowers were planted about
them. This has now become extremely rare,
but it may occasionally be met with in the
church yards of the little retired villages
among the Welsh mountains; and I recollect
an instance of it in the small town of Ruthen,
that lies at the head of the beautiful vale of
Clewyd.
There was a melancholy fancy in the
arrangement
of these rustic offerings that had
something in it exquisitely poetical. The
nature
and colour of the flowers, and of the
ribbands
with which they were tied, were
emblematical
of the qualities or story of the
deceased
,
or the feelings of the mourner. In an
old poem, entitled Corydon's Doleful Knell,
a lover specifies the decorations he intends to
use:
A garland shall be framed
By art and nature's skill,
Of sundry-coloured flowers,
In token of good will.
And sundry-coloured ribbands
On it I will bestow;
But chiefly blacke and yellowe
With her to grave shall go.
I'll deck her tomb with flowers
The rarest ever seen;
And with my tears as showers
I'll keepe them fresh and green.
The white rose, we are told, was planted at
the grave of a virgin; her chaplet was tied
with white ribbands, in token of her spotless
innocence, though sometimes black ribbands
were intermingled, to bespeak the grief of the
survivors. The red rose was occasionally used
in remembrance of such as had been
remarkable
for benevolence; but roses in general were
appropriated to the graves of lovers. Those
who had been unhappy in their loves had
emblems
of a more gloomy character, such as the
yew, the cypress, and flowers of melancholy
colour. Thus, in poems by Thomas Stanley,
Esq. (published in 1651) is the following
stanza:
Yet strew
Upon my dismall grave
Such offerings as you have,
Forsaken cypresse and sad ewe;
For kinder flowers can take no birth
Or growth from such unhappy earth.
In The Maid's Tragedy, also, is
introduced
a pathetic little air, illustrative of the mode
of decorating the funerals of females who had
been disappointed in love:
Lay a garland on my hearse
Of the dismall yew,
Maidens willow branches wear,
Say I died true.
My love was false, but I was firm
From my hour of birth,
Upon my buried body lie
Lightly, gentle earth.
The natural effect of sorrow over the dead
is to refine and elevate the mind, and we have
a proof of it in the purity of sentiment that
pervades the whole of these funereal
observances
,
though confined to the inferior classes of
society. Thus, it was an especial precaution,
that none but sweet-scented evergreens and
flowers should be used on these occasions.
The object seems to have been to soften the
horrors of the tomb, to beguile the mind from
brooding over the disgraces of perishing
mortality
,
and to associate the memory of the
deceased
with what is most delicate and beautiful
in nature. There is a dismal process going on
in the grave, ere dust can return to its kindred
dust, which the imagination shrinks from
contemplating
;
and we seek still to think of the
form we have loved, with the associations of
refinement which it awakened when blooming
before us in youth and beauty. Lay her
i'the earth, says Laertes of his virgin sister,
And from her fair and unpolluted flesh
May violets spring!
I might crowd my pages with extracts from
the older British poets, who wrote when these
rites were more prevalent, and delighted
frequently
to allude to them; but I have already
quoted more than is necessary; and yet I
cannot
refrain from giving a passage from
Shakspeare
,
even though it should appear trite, which
illustrates the emblematical meaning often
conveyed
in these floral tributes, and which
possesses
that magic of language and appositeness
of imagery for which he stands pre-eminent:
With fairest flowers,
Whilst summer lasts, and I live here, Fidele,
I'll sweeten thy sad grave; thou shalt not lack
The flower that's like thy face, pale primrose; nor
The azur'd harebell like thy veins; no, nor
The leaf of eglantine; whom not to slander,
Outsweetened not thy breath.
There is certainly something more affecting
in these prompt and spontaneous offerings of
nature, than in the most costly monuments of
art; the hand strews the flower while the heart
is warm, and the tear falls on the grave as
affection
is binding the osier around the sod; but
pathos expires under the slow labour of the
chisel, and is chilled among the cold conceits
of sculptured marble.
It is greatly to be regretted, that a custom
so truly elegant and touching should have
disappeared
from general use, and exist only in
the most remote and insignificant villages. But
it seems as if poetical custom always shuns the
walks of cultivated society. In proportion as
people grow polite they cease to be poetical.
They talk of poetry, but they have learnt to
check its free impulses, to distrust its sallying
emotions, and to supply its most affecting and
picturesque usages, by studied form and
pompous
ceremonial. Few pageants can be more
stately and frigid than an English funeral in
town. It is made up of show and gloomy
parade
:
mourning carriages, mourning horses,
mourning plumes, and hireling mourners, who
make a mockery of grief. There is a grave
digged, says Jeremy Taylor, and a solemn
mourning, and a great talk in the
neighbourhood
,
and when the daies are finished, they
38
shall be, and they shall be remembered no
more. The associate in the gay and crowded
city is soon forgotten; the hurrying succession
of new intimates and new pleasures efface him
from our minds, and the very scenes and
circles
in which he moved are incessantly
fluctuating
.
But funerals in the country are always
more impressive. The stroke of death makes
a wider space in the village circle, and is an
awful event in the tranquil uniformity of rural
life. The death bell tolls its knell in every ear;
it steals with its pervading melancholy over
every hill and vale, and saddens all the
landscape
.
The fixed and unchanging features of the
country also, perpetuate the memory of the
friend with whom we once enjoyed them, who
was the companion of our most retired walks,
and gave animation to every lonely scene. His
idea is associated with every charm of nature;
we hear his voice in the echo which he once
delighted to awaken; his spirit haunts every
grove which he once frequented; we think of
him in the wild upland solitude, or amidst the
pensive beauty of the valley. In the freshness
of joyous morning, we remember his beaming
smiles and bounding gayety; and when sober
evening returns with its gathering shadows and
subduing quiet, we call to mind many a
twilight
hour of gentle talk and sweet-souled
melancholy
.
Each lonely place shall him restore,
For him the tear be duly shed,
Belov'd till life can charm no more,
And mourn'd, till pity's self be dead.
Another cause that perpetuates the memory
of the deceased in the country, is, that the
grave is more immediately in sight of the
survivors
.
They pass it on their way to prayer;
it meets their eyes when their hearts are softened
by the exercises of devotion; they linger about
it on the sabbath, when the mind is disengaged
from worldly cares, and most disposed to turn
aside from present pleasures and present loves,
and to sit down among the solemn mementos
of the past. In North Wales the peasantry
kneel and pray over the graves of their deceased
friends for several Sundays after the interment;
and where the tender rite of strewing and
planting
flowers is still practised, it is always
renewed
on Easter, Whitsuntide, and other festivals,
when the season brings the companion of former
festivity more vividly to mind. It is also
invariably
performed by the nearest relatives and
friends; no menials nor hirelings are employed,
and if a neighbour yields assistance, it would be
deemed an insult to offer compensation.
I have dwelt upon this beautiful rural
custom
,
because, as it is one of the last, so it is one
of the holiest offices of love. The grave is the
ordeal of truly human affection. It is there
that the divine passion of the soul shows its
superiority
to the instinctive attachment of the
brute; for the love of the animal must be
continually
refreshed by the presence of its object,
but the love of the human soul can live on long
remembrance!
The sorrow for the dead is the only sorrow
from which we refuse to be divorced. Every
other wound we seek to healevery other
affliction
to forget; but this wound we consider it
a duty to keep openthis affliction we cherish
and brood over in solitude. Where is the
mother
that would willingly forget the infant that
perished like a blossom from her arms, though
every recollection is a pang? Where is the
child that would willingly forget the most
tender
of parents, though to remember be but to
lament? Who, even in the hour of agony,
would forget the friend over whom he mourns?
Who, even when the tomb is closing upon the
remains of her he most loved, and he feels his
heart, as it were, crushed in the closing of its
portal, would accept consolation that was to be
bought by forgetfulness?No, the love which
survives the tomb is one of the noblest
attributes
of the soul. If it has its woes, it has
likewise
its delights; and when the overwhelming
burst of grief is calmed into the gentle tear of
recollection; when the sudden anguish and the
convulsive agony over the present ruins of all
that we most loved, is softened away into
pensive
meditation on all that it was in the days of
its lovelinesswho would root out such a
sorrow
from the heart? Though it may
sometimes
throw a passing cloud even over the bright
hour of gayety; or spread a deeper sadness
over the hour of gloom; yet who would
exchange
it even for the song of pleasure, or the
burst of revelry? No, there is a voice from the
tomb sweeter than song. There is a
recollection
of the dead to which we turn even from
the charms of the living. Oh the grave!the
grave!It buries every errorcovers every
defect
extinguishes
every resentment. From its
peaceful bosom spring none but fond regrets
and tender recollections. Who can look down
upon the grave even of an enemy, and not feel
a compunctious throb, that ever he should have
warred with the poor handful of earth that lies
mouldering before him!
But the grave of those we lovedwhat a
place for meditation! Then it is that we call
up in long review the whole history of virtue
and gentleness, and the thousand endearments
lavished upon us almost unheeded in the daily
intercourse of intimacy;then it is that we
dwell upon the tenderness, the solemn, awful
tenderness of the parting scenethe bed of
death, with all its stifled griefs, its noiseless
attendance, its mute, watchful assiduitiesthe
last testimonies of expiring lovethe feeble,
fluttering, thrilling, oh! how thrilling! pressure
of the handthe last fond look of the glazing
eye, turning upon us even from the threshold
of existencethe faint, faltering accents
struggling
in death to give one more assurance of
affection!
Aye, go to the grave of buried love, and
meditate! There settle the account with thy
conscience for every past benefit unrequited
every past endearment unregarded, of that
departed
being, who can nevernevernever
return to be soothed by thy contrition!
If thou art a child, and hast ever added a
sorrow to the soul, or a furrow to the silvered
brow of an affectionate parentif thou art a
husband, and hast ever caused the fond bosom
that ventured its whole happiness in thy arms,
to doubt one moment of thy kindness or thy
truthif thou art a friend, and hast ever
wronged, in thought, or word, or deed, the
spirit that generously confided in theeif thou
art a lover, and hast ever given one unmerited
pang to that true heart that now lies cold and
still beneath thy feet;then be sure that every
unkind look, every ungracious word, every
ungentle
action, will come thronging back upon
thy memory, and knocking dolefully at thy
soulthen be sure that thou wilt lie down
sorrowing and repentant on the grave, and
utter the unheard groan, and pour the
unavailing
tear, more deep, more bitter, because
unheard
and unavailing.
Then weave thy chaplet of flowers, and
strew the beauties of nature about the grave;
console thy broken spirit, if thou canst, with
these tender, yet futile tributes of regret;but
take warning by the bitterness of this thy
contrite
affliction over the dead, and be more
faithful
and affectionate in the discharge of thy
duties
to the living.
39
In
writing the preceding article, there was
no intention of giving a full detail of the
funeral
customs of the English peasantry, but
merely to furnish a few hints and quotations
illustrative of particular rites; to be appended,
by way of note, to another paper, which has
been withheld. The article insensibly swelled
into its present form, and this is mentioned as
an apology for so brief and casual a notice of
these customs, after they have been amply and
learnedly investigated in other works.
I must observe, also, that I am well aware
of the prevalence of the custom of adorning
graves with flowers, in other countries besides
England. Indeed, in some it is much more
general, and is observed by the rich and
fashionable
,
but then it is apt to lose its simplicity,
and degenerate into affectation. Bright, in his
travels in Lower Hungary, tells of monuments
of marble, with recesses formed for retirement,
with seats placed among bowers of green-house
plants; and that the graves generally are
covered with the gayest flowers of the season.
He gives a casual picture of filial piety, which
I cannot but transcribe; for I trust it is as
useful
as it is delightful to illustrate the amiable
virtues of the sex. When I was at Berlin,
says he, I followed the celebrated Iffland to
the grave. Mingled with some pomp, you
might trace much real feeling. In the midst of
the ceremony, my attention was attracted by a
young woman who stood on a mound of earth,
newly covered with turf, which she anxiously
protected from the feet of the passing crowd.
It was the tomb of her parent; and the figure
of this affectionate daughter presented a
monument
more striking than the most costly work
of art.
I will barely add an instance of sepulchral
decoration which I once met with among the
mountains of Switzerland. It was at the
village
of Gersau, which stands on the borders of
the lake of Lucerne, at the foot of Mount Rigi.
It was once the capital of a miniature republic,
shut up between the Alps and the lake, and
accessible
on the land side only by foot paths.
The whole force of the republic did not exceed
six hundred fighting men; and a few miles of
circumference, scooped out as it were from the
bosom of the mountains, comprised its territory.
The village of Gersau seemed separated from
the rest of the world, and retained the golden
simplicity of a purer age. It had a small church,
with a burying ground adjoining. At the heads
of the graves were placed crosses of wood or
iron. On some were affixed miniatures, rudely
executed, but evidently attempts at likenesses
of the deceased. On the crosses were hung
chaplets of flowers, some withering, others
fresh, as if occasionally renewed. I paused
with interest at this scene; I felt that I was at
the source of poetical description, for these were
the beautiful but unaffected offerings of the
heart which poets are fain to record. In a gayer
and more populous place, I should have
suspected
them to have been suggested by factitious
sentiment, derived from books; but the good
people of Gersau knew little of books; there
was not a novel nor a love poem in the village;
and I question whether any peasant of the place
dreamt, while he was twining a fresh chaplet
for the grave of his mistress, that he was
fulfilling
one of the most fanciful rites of poetical
devotion, and that he was practically a poet.
THE
INN KITCHEN.
Shall I not take mine ease in mine inn?
Falstaff
.
During
a journey that I once made through
the Netherlands, I had arrived one evening at
the
Pomme d'Or
, the principal inn of a small
Flemish village. It was after the hour of
the
table d'hote
, so that I was obliged to
make a solitary supper from the reliques of
its ampler board. The weather was chilly;
I was seated alone in one end of a great
gloomy dining room, and my repast being over;
I had the prospect before me of a long dull
evening, without any visible means of
enlivening
it. I summoned mine host, and requested
something to read; he brought me the whole
literary stock of his household, a Dutch family
bible, an almanack in the same language, and a
number of old Paris newspapers. As I sat
dozing over one of the latter, reading old news
and stale criticisms, my ear was now and then
struck with bursts of laughter that seemed to
proceed from the kitchen. Every one that has
travelled on the continent, must know how
favourite
a resort the kitchen of a country inn is
to the middle and inferior order of travellers,
particularly in that equivocal kind of weather,
when a fire becomes agreeable toward
evening
.
I threw aside the newspaper, and
explored
my way to the kitchen, to take a peep at
the group that appeared to be so merry. It was
composed partly of travellers who had arrived
some hours before in a diligence, and partly of
the usual attendants and hangers-on of inns.
They were seated around a great burnished
stove, that might have been mistaken for an
altar, at which they were worshipping. It was
40
covered with various kitchen vessels of
resplendent
brightness; among which steamed and
hissed a huge copper tea-kettle. A large lamp
threw a strong mass of light upon the group,
bringing out many odd features in strong relief.
Its yellow rays partially illumined the spacious
kitchen, dying duskily away into remote
corners
,
except where they settled in mellow
radiance
on the broad side of a flitch of bacon, or
were reflected back from well-scoured utensils,
that gleamed from the midst of obscurity. A
strapping Flemish lass, with long gold pendants
in her ears, and a necklace with a golden heart
suspended to it, was the presiding priestess of
the temple.
Many of the company were furnished with
pipes, and most of them with some kind of
evening
potation. I found their mirth was
occasioned
by a long history which a little swarthy
Frenchman, with a dry weazen face and large
whiskers, was giving of his love adventures; at
the end of each of which there was one of those
bursts of honest unceremonious laughter, in
which a man indulges in that temple of true
liberty, an Inn.
As I had no better mode of getting through
a tedious blustering evening, I took my seat
near the stove, and listened to a variety of
travellers'
tales, some very extravagant, and most
very dull. All of them, however, have faded
from my treacherous memory except one, which
I will endeavour to relate. I fear, however, it
derived its chief zest from the manner in which
it was told, and the peculiar air and appearance
of the narrator. He was a corpulent old Swiss,
who had the look of a veteran traveller. He
was dressed in a tarnished green travelling
jacket, with a broad belt round his waist, and
a pair of overalls, with buttons from the hips to
the ankles. He was of a full, rubicund
countenance
,
with a double chin, aquiline nose, and a
pleasant twinkling eye. His hair was light,
and curled from under an old green velvet
travelling
cap stuck on one side of his head. He
was interrupted more than once by the arrival
of guests, or the remarks of his auditors; and
paused now and then to replenish his pipe; at
which times he had generally a roguish leer, and
a sly joke for the buxom kitchen maid.
I wish my reader could imagine the old
fellow
lolling in a huge arm chair, one arm
a-kimbo, the other holding a curiously twisted
tobacco pipe, formed of genuine
cume de mer
,
decorated with silver chain and silken tassel
his head cocked on one side, and a whimsical
cut of the eye occasionally, as he related the
following story.
THE
SPECTRE BRIDEGROOM.
THE
SPECTRE BRIDEGROOM.
A TRAVELLER'S TALE.
*
*
The erudite reader, well versed in good for nothing lore, will
perceive
that the above tale must have been suggested to the old Swiss
by a little French anecdote, of a circumstance said to have taken place
at Paris.
He that supper for is dight,
He lyes full cold, I trow, this night!
Yestreen to chamber I him led,
This night Gray-steel has made his bed!
Sir Eger, Sir Grahame, and Sir Gray-steel
.
On
the summit of one of the heights of the
Odenwald, a wild and romantic tract of upper
Germany, that lies not far from the
confluence
of the Maine and the Rhine, there stood,
many, many years since, the Castle of the
Baron
Von Landshort. It is now quite fallen to
decay, and almost buried among beech trees
and dark firs, above which, however, its old
watch-tower may still be seen struggling, like
the former possessor I have mentioned, to carry
a high head, and look down upon the
neighbouring
country.
The Baron was a dry branch of the great
family
of Katzenellenbogen,
*
*
i. e.
Catselbow
. The name of a family of these parts very
powerful
in former times.
and inherited the
reliques of the property, and all the pride of
his ancestors. Though the warlike disposition
of his predecessors had much impaired the
family
possessions, yet the Baron still
endeavoured
to keep up some show of former state. The
times were peaceable, and the German nobles,
in general, had abandoned their inconvenient
old castles, perched like eagle's nests among the
mountains, and had built more convenient
residences
in the valleys: still the Baron remained
proudly drawn up in his little fortress,
cherishing
with hereditary inveteracy, all the old
family
feuds; so that he was on ill terms with some
41
of his nearest neighbours, on account of
disputes
that had happened between their great
great grandfathers.
The Baron had but one child, a daughter;
but nature, when she grants but one child,
always
compensates by making it a prodigy; and
so it was with the daughter of the Baron. All
the nurses, gossips, and country cousins, assured
her father that she had not her equal for beauty
in all Germany; and who should know better
than they. She had, moreover, been brought up
with great care under the superintendance of
two maiden aunts, who had spent some years
of their early life at one of the little German
courts, and were skilled in all the branches of
knowledge necessary to the education of a fine
lady. Under their instructions, she became a
miracle of accomplishments. By the time she
was eighteen she could embroider to admiration,
and had worked whole histories of the saints
in tapestry, with such strength of expression in
their countenances, that they looked like so
many souls in purgatory. She could read
without
great difficulty, and had spelled her way
through several church legends, and almost all
the chivalric wonders of the Heldenbuch. She
had even made considerable proficiiency in
writing, could sign her own name without
missing
a letter, and so legibly, that her aunts could
read it without spectacles. She excelled in
making little elegant good-for-nothing lady
like nick-nacks of all kinds; was versed in the
most abstruse dancing of the day; played a
number of airs on the harp and guitar; and
knew all the tender ballads of the Minne-lieders
by heart.
Her aunts, too, having been great flirts and
coquettes
in their younger days, were admirably
calculated to be vigilant guardians and strict
censors of the conduct of their niece; for there is
no duenna so rigidly prudent, and inexorably
decorous, as a superannuated coquette. She was
rarely suffered out of their sight; never went
beyond
the domains of the castle, unless well
attended
,
or rather, well watched; had continual
lectures read to her about strict decorum and
implicit
obedience; and, as to the menpah!
she was taught to hold them at such distance
and distrust, that, unless properly authorized,
she would not have cast a glance upon the
handsomest
cavalier in the worldno, not if he
were even dying at her feet!
The good effects of this system were
wonderfully
apparent. The young lady was a pattern
of docility and correctness. While others were
wasting their sweetness in the glare of the
world, and liable to be plucked and thrown
aside by every hand, she was coyly blooming
into fresh and lovely womanhood under the
protection of those immaculate spinsters, like a
rose-bud blushing forth among guardian thorns.
Her aunts looked upon her with pride and
exultation
,
and vaunted that all the other young
ladies in the world might go astray, yet thanked
heaven, nothing of the kind could happen to
the heiress of Katzenellenbogen.
But, however scantily the Baron Von
Landshort
might be provided with children, his
household was by no means a small one, for
providence had enriched him with abundance
of poor relations. They, one and all, possessed
the affectionate disposition common to humble
relatives: were wonderfully attached to the
Bacon
,
and took every possible occasion to come
in swarms and enliven the castle. All family
festivals were commemorated by these good
people at the Baron's expense; and when they
were filled with good cheer, they would declare
that there was nothing on earth so delightful as
these family meetings, these jubilees of the
heart.
The Baron, though a small man, had a large
soul, and it swelled with satisfaction at the
consciousness
of being the greatest man in the little
world about him. He loved to tell long stories
about the stark old warriors whose portraits
looked grimly down from the walls around, and
he found no listeners equal to those who fed at
his expense. He was much given to the
marvellous
,
and a firm believer in all those
supernatural
tales with which every mountain and
valley in Germany abounds. The faith of his
guests even exceeded his own: they listened to
every tale of wonder with open eyes and mouth,
and never failed to be astonished, even though
repeated for the hundredth time. Thus lived
the Baron Von Landshort, the oracle of his
table
,
the absolute monarch of his little territory,
and happy above all things, in the persuasion
that he was the wisest man of the age.
At the time of which my story treats, there
was a great family gathering at the Castle, on
an affair of the utmost importance. It was to
receive the destined bridegroom of the Baron's
daughter. A negotiation had been carried on
between the father, and an old nobleman of
Bavaria
,
to unite the dignity of their houses by
the marriage of their children. The
preliminaries
had been conducted with proper punctilio.
The young people were betrothed without
seeing
each other, and the time appointed for the
marriage ceremony. The young Count Von
Altenburg had been recalled from the army for
the purpose, and was actually on his way to the
Baron's to receive his bride. Missives had
been received from him, from Wurtzburg, where
he was accidentally detained, mentioning the
day and hour he might be expected to arrive.
The castle was in a tumult of preparation to
give him a suitable welcome. The fair bride
had been decked out with uncommon care.
The two aunts had superintended her toilet,
and quarrelled the whole morning about every
article of her dress. The young lady had taken
advantage of their contest to follow the bent of
her own taste; and fortunately it was a good
one. She looked as lovely as youthful
bridegroom
could desire; and the flutter of
expectation
heightened the lustre of her charms.
The suffusions that mantled her face and
neck, the gentle heaving of the bosom, the eye
now and then lost in reverie, all betrayed the
soft tumult that was going on in her little heart.
The aunts were continually hovering around
her; for maiden aunts are apt to take great
interest
in affairs of this nature. They were
giving
her a world of staid counsel how to deport
herself, what to say, and in what manner to
receive
the expected lover.
The Baron was no less busied in preparations.
He had, in truth, nothing exactly to do; but he
was naturally a fuming, bustling little man, and
could not remain passive when all the world
was in a hurry. He worried from top to
bottom
of the castle, with an air of infinite
anxiety
;
he continually called the servants from
their work to exhort them to be diligent, and
buzzed about every hall and chamber, as idly
restless and importunate as a blue bottle fly of
a warm summer's day.
In the mean time, the fatted calf had been
killed; the forests had rung with the clamour of
the huntsmen; the kitchen was crowded with
good cheer; the cellars had yielded up whole
oceans of
Rhein-wein
and
Ferne-wein
, and even
the great Heidelberg tun had been laid under
contribution. Every thing was ready to receive
the distinguished guest with
Saus und Braus
in the true spirit of German hospitalitybut the
guest delayed to make his appearance. Hour
rolled after hour. The sun that had poured his
downward rays upon the rich forests of the
Odenwald, now just gleamed along the summits
of the mountains. The Baron mounted the
highest tower, and strained his eyes in hopes of
catching a distant sight of the Count and his
attendants
.
Once he thought he beheld them; the
sound of horns came floating from the valley,
prolonged by the mountain echoes. A number
of horsemen were seen far below, slowly
advancing
along the road; but when they had nearly
reached the foot of the mountain, they suddenly
struck off in a different direction. The last ray
of sunshine departedthe bats began to flit by in
the twilightthe road grew dimmer and
dimmer
to the view; and nothing appeared stirring
in it, but now and then a peasant lagging
homeward
from his labour.
While the old castle of Landshort was in
this state of perplexity, a very interesting scene
was transacting in a different part of the
Odenwald.
The young Count Von Altenburg was
tranquilly
pursuing his route in that sober jog-trot
way in which a man travels towards matrimony,
42
when his friends have taken all the trouble and
uncertainty of courtship off his hands, and a
bride is waiting for him, ascertainly as a
dinner
,
at the end of his journey. He had
encountered
,
at Wurtzburg, a youthful companion in
arms, with whom he had seen some service on
the frontiers; Hermon Von Starkenfaust, one
of the stoutest hands, and worthiest hearts, of
German chivalry, who was now returning from
the army. His father's castle was not far
distant
from the old fortress of Landshort, although
a hereditary feud rendered the families hostile,
and strangers to each other.
In the warm-hearted moment of recognition,
the young friends related all their past adventures
and fortunes, and the count gave the whole
history
of his intended nuptials with a young lady
whom he had never seen, but of whose charms
he had received the most enrapturing
descriptions
.
As the route of the friends lay in the same
direction, they agreed to perform the rest of
their journey together; and that they might do
it the more leisurely, sat off from Wurtzburg at
an early hour, the count having given directions
for his retinue to follow and overtake him.
They beguiled their wayfaring with
recollections
of their military scenes and adventures;
but the count was apt to be a little tedious, now
and then, about the reputed charms of his bride,
and the felicity that awaited him.
In this way they had entered among the
mountains of the Odenwald, and were
traversing
one of its most lonely and thickly wooded
passes. It is well known that the forests of
Germany have always been as much infested
by robbers as its castles by spectres; and, at this
time, the former were particularly numerous
from the hordes of disbanded soldiers
wandering
about the country. It will not appear
extraordinary
,
therefore, that the cavaliers were
attacked by a gang of these stragglers, in the
depth of the forest. They defended themselves
with bravery, but were nearly overpowered,
when the count's retinue arrived to their
assistance
.
At sight of them the robbers fled, but
not until the count had received a mortal wound.
He was slowly and carefully conveyed back to
the city of Wurtzburg, and a friar summoned from
a neighbouring convent, who was famous for
his skill in administering to both soul and body.
But half of his skill was superfluous; the
moments
of the unfortunate count were numbered.
With his dying breath he entreated his friend
to repair instantly to the castle of Landshort,
and explain the fatal cause of his not keeping
his appointment with his bride. Though not
the most ardent of lovers, he was one of the
most punctilious of men; and appeared
earnestly
solicitous that this mission should be
speedily
and courteously executed. Unless this is
done, said he, I shall not sleep quietly in my
grave! He repeated these last words with
peculiar
solemnity. A request, at a moment so
solemn, admitted no hesitation. Starkenfaust
endeavoured to soothe him to calmness,
promised
faithfully to execute his wish, and gave him
his hand in solemn pledge. The dying man
pressed it in acknowledgment, but soon lapsed
into deliriumraved about his bridehis
engagement
his
plighted word; ordered his
horse, that he might ride to the castle of
Landshort
,
and expired in the fancied act of vaulting
into the saddle.
Starkenfaust bestowed a sigh, and a soldier's
tear, on the untimely fate of his comrade; and
then pondered on the awkward mission he had
undertaken. His heart was heavy, and his
head perplexed; for he was to present himself
an unbidden guest among hostile people, and to
damp their festivity with tidings fatal to their
hopes. Still there were certain whisperings of
curiosity in his bosom to see this far-famed
beauty of Katzenellenbogen, so cautiously shut
up from the world; for he was a passionate
admirer
of the sex, and there was a dash of
eccentricity
and enterprize in his character that made
him fond of all singular adventure.
Previous to his departure, he made all due
arrangements
with the holy fraternity of the
convent
for the funeral solemnities of his friend,
who was to be buried in the cathedral of
Wurtzburg
,
near some of his illustrious relatives;
and the mourning retinue of the count took
charge of his remains.
It is now high time that we should return
to the ancient family of Katzenellenbogen, who
were impatient for their guest, and still more
for their dinner; and to the worthy little Baron,
whom we left airing himself on the
watchtower
.
Night closed in, but still no guest arrived.
The Baron descended from the tower in despair.
The banquet, which had been delayed from hour
to hour could no longer be postponed. The meats
were already overdone; the cook in an agony;
and the whole household had the look of a
garrison
that had been reduced by famine. The
Baron was obliged reluctantly to give orders for
the feast without the presence of the guest.
All were seated at table, and just on the point
of commencing, when the sound of a horn from
without the gate gave notice of the approach of
a stranger. Another long blast filled the old
courts of the castle with its echoes, and was
answered
by the warder from the walls. The
Baron hastened to receive his future son-in-law.
The drawbridge had been let down, and the
stranger was before the gate. He was a tall
gallant cavalier, mounted on a black steed. His
countenance was pale, but he had a beaming,
romantic eye, and an air of stately melancholy.
The Baron was a little mortified that he should
have come in this simple, solitary style. His
dignity for a moment was ruffled, and he felt
disposed to consider it a want of proper respect
for the important occasion, and the important
family with which he was to be connected. He,
however, pacified himself with the conclusion
that it must have been youthful impatience
which had induced him thus to spur on sooner
than his attendants.
I am sorry, said the stranger, to break in
upon you thus unseasonably
Here the Baron interrupted him with a
world of compliments and greetings; for, to
tell the truth, he prided himself upon his
courtesy
and his eloquence. The stranger
attempted
,
once or twice, to stem the torrent of words,
but in vain, so he bowed his head and suffered
it to flow on. By the time the Baron had come
to a pause, they had reached the inner court of
the castle; and the stranger was again about to
speak, when he was once more interrupted by
the appearance of the female part of the family,
leading forth the shrinking and blushing bride.
He gazed on her for a moment as one entranced;
it seemed as if his whole soul beamed forth in
the gaze, and rested upon that lovely form.
One of the maiden aunts whispered something
in her ear; she made an effort to speak; her
moist blue eye was timidly raised, gave a shy
glance of inquiry on the stranger, and was cast
again to the ground. The words died away;
but there was a sweet smile playing about her
lips, and a soft dimpling of the cheek, that
showed
her glance had not been unsatisfactory. It
was impossible for a girl of the fond age of
eighteen, highly predisposed for love and
matrimony
,
not to be pleased with so gallant a
cavalier
.
The late hour at which the guest had
arrived
,
left no time for parley. The baron was
peremptory
,
and deferred all particular
conversation
until the morning, and led the way to the
untasted banquet.
It was served up in the great hall of the castle.
Around the walls hung the hard-favoured
portraits
of the heroes of the house of
Katzenellenbogen
,
and the trophies which they had gained in
the field and in the chase. Hacked corslets;
splintered jousting spears, and tattered banners,
were mingled with the spoils of sylvan warfare:
the jaws of the wolf, and the tusks of the boar,
grinned horribly among cross-bows and
battleaxes
,
and a huge pair of antlers branched
accidentally over the head of the youthful
bridegroom.
The cavalier took but little notice of the
company
,
or the entertainment. He scarce tasted
the banquet, but seemed absorbed in
admiration
of his bride. He conversed in a low tone
that could not be overheardfor the language of
love is never loud; but where is the female ear
43
so dull that it cannot catch the softest whisper
of the lover? There was a mingled tenderness
and earnestness in his manner, that appeared to
have a powerful effect upon the young lady.
Her colour came and went as she listened with
deep attention. Now and then she made some
blushing reply, and when his eye was turned
away, she would steal a side-long glance at his
romantic countenance, and heave a gentle sigh
of tender happiness. It was evident the young
couple were completely enamoured. The aunts,
who were deeply versed in the mysteries of the
heart, declared that they had fallen in love with
each other at first sight.
The feast went on merrily, or at least
noisily
,
for the guests were all blessed with those
keen appetites that attend upon light purses and
mountain air. The Baron told his best and
longest stories, and never had he told them so
well, or with such great effect. If there was
any thing marvellous, his auditors were lost in
astonishment; and if any thing facetious, they
were sure to laugh exactly in the right place.
The Baron, it is true, like most great men, was
too dignified to utter any joke except a dull one,
but then it was always enforced by a bumper
of excellent Hoch-heimer; and even a dull joke
at one's own table, served up with jolly old
wine, is irresistible. Many good things were
said by poorer and keener wits, that would not
bear repeating, except on similar occasions;
many sly speeches whispered in ladies' ears,
that almost convulsed them with suppressed
laughter; and a song or two roared out by a
poor, but merry and broad-faced cousin of the
Baron, that absolutely made the maiden aunts
hold up their fans.
Amidst all this revelry, the stranger guest
maintained a most singular and unseasonable
gravity. His countenance assumed a deeper
cast of dejection as the evening advanced, and,
strange as it may seem, even the Baron's jokes
only seemed to render him the more
melancholy
.
At times he was lost in thought, and at
times there was a perturbed and restless
wandering
of the eye that bespoke a mind but ill at
ease. His conversations with the bride became
more and more earnest and mysterious.
Lowering
clouds began to steal over the fair
serenity
of her brow, and tremors to run through her
tender frame.
All this could not escape the notice of the
company. Their gayety was chilled by the
unaccountable gloom of the bridegroom; their
spirits were infected; whispers and glances
were interchanged, accompanied by shrugs and
dubious shakes of the head. The song and the
laugh grew less and less frequent; there were
dreary pauses in the conversation, which were
at length succeeded by wild tales, and
supernatural
legends. One dismal story produced
another
still more dismal, and the Baron nearly
frightened some of the ladies into hysterics with
the history of the goblin horseman that carried
away the fair Leonora; a dreadful, but true
story, that has since been put into excellent
verse, and is read and believed by all the
world.
The bridegroom listened to this tale with
profound attention. He kept his eyes steadily
fixed on the Baron, and as the story drew to a
close, began gradually to rise from his seat,
growing taller and taller, until, in the Baron's
entranced eye, he seemed almost to tower into
a giant. The moment the tale was finished, he
heaved a deep sigh, and took a solemn farewell
of the company. They were all amazement.
The Baron was perfectly thunderstruck.
What! going to leave the castle at
midnight
?
why, every thing was prepared for his
reception: a chamber was ready for him if he
wished to retire.
The stranger shook his head mournfully, and
mysteriously; I must lay my head in a
different
chamber to night!
There was something in this reply, and the
tone in which it was uttered, that made the
Baron's
heart misgive him; but he rallied his forces
and repeated his hospitable entreaties. The
stranger shook his head silently, but positively,
at every offer, and waving his farewell to the
company, stalked slowly out of the hall. The
maiden aunts were absolutely petrifiedthe
bride hung her head, and a tear stole to her
eye.
The Baron followed the stranger to the great
court of the castle, where the black charger
stood pawing the earth, and snorting with
impatience
.
When they had reached the portal,
whose deep archway was dimly lighted by a
cresset, the stranger paused, and addressed the
baron in a deep voice, which the vaulted roof
rendered still more sepulchral. Now that we
are alone, said he, I will impart to you the
reason of my going. I have a solemn, an
indispensable
engagement
Why, said the Baron, cannot you send
some one in your place?
It admits of no substituteI must attend it
in personI must away to Wurtzburg
cathedral
Aye, said the Baron, plucking up spirit,
but not until to-morrowto-morrow you shall
take your bride there.
No! no! replied the stranger, with tenfold
solemnity, my engagement is with no bride
the worms! the worms expect me! I am a dead
manI have been slain by robbersmy body
lies at Wurtzburgat midnight I am to be
buriedthe grave is waiting for meI must
keep my appointment!
He sprang on his black charger, dashed over
the draw-bridge, and the clattering of his
horse's hoofs were lost in the whistling of the
night blast.
The Baron returned to the hall in the utmost
consternation, and related what had passed.
Two ladies fainted outright, others sickened at
the idea of having banquetted with a spectre.
It was the opinion of some, that this might be
the wild huntsman famous in German legend.
Some talked of mountain sprites,
wood-demons
,
and other supernatural beings, with
which the good people of Germany have been
so grievously harassed since time immemorial.
One of the poor relations ventured to suggest
that it might be some sportive evasion of the
young cavalier's, and that the very gloominess
of the caprice seemed to accord with so
melancholy
a personage. This, however, drew on
him the indignation of the whole company, and
especially of the Baron, who looked upon him
as little better than an infidel; so that he was
fain to abjure his heresy as speedily as
possible
,
and come into the faith of the true
believers
.
But, whatever doubts might have been
entertained
,
they were completely put to an end by
the arrival, next day, of regular missives,
confirming
the intelligence of the young Count's
murder, and his interment in Wurtzburg
cathedral
.
The dismay at the castle may well be
imagined
.
The Baron shut himself up in his
chamber
.
The guests who had come to rejoice with
him, could not think of abandoning him in his
distress. They wandered about the courts, or
collected in groupes in the hall, shaking their
heads and shrugging their shoulders, at the
troubles of so good a man; and sat longer than
ever at table, and ate and drank more stoutly
than ever, by way of keeping up their spirits.
But the situation of the widowed bride was
the most pitiable. To have lost a husband
before she had even embraced himand such
a husband! if the very spectre could be so
gracious
and noble, what must have been the
living man! She filled the house with
lamentations
.
On the night of the second day of her
widowhood
she had retired to her chamber,
accompanied
by one of her aunts, who insisted on
sleeping
with her. The aunt, who was one of the
best tellers of ghost stories in all Germany, had
just been recounting one of her longest, and had
fallen asleep in the very midst of it. The
chamber
was remote, and overlooked a small garden.
The niece lay pensively gazing at the beams
of the rising moon, as they trembled on the
leaves of an aspen tree before the lattice. The
castle clock had just tolled midnight, when a
soft strain of music stole up from the garden.
She rose hastily from her bed, and
stepped-lightly
44
to the window. A tall figure stood
among the shadows of the trees. As it raised
its head, a beam of moonlight fell upon the
countenance. Heaven and earth! she beheld
the Spectre Bridegroom! A loud shriek at that
moment burst upon her ear, and her aunt, who
had been awakened by the music, and followed
her silently to the window, fell into her arms.
When she looked again, the spectre had
disappeared
.
Of the two females, the aunt now required
the most soothing, for she was perfectly beside
herself with terror. As to the young lady, there
was something, even in the spectre of her lover,
that seemed endearing. There was still the
semblance of manly beauty; and though the
shadow of a man is but little calculated to
satisfy
the affections of a love-sick girl, yet, where
the substance is not to be had, even that is
consoling
.
The aunt declared she would never sleep
in that chamber again; the niece, for once, was
refractory, and declared as strongly that she
would sleep in no other in the castle: the
consequence
was, that she had to sleep in it alone;
but she drew a promise from her aunt not to
relate
the story of the spectre, lest she should be
denied the only melancholy pleasure left her on
earththat of inhabiting the chamber over
which the guardian shade of her lover kept its
nightly vigils.
How long the good old lady would have
observed
this promise is uncertain, for she dearly
loved to talk of the marvellous, and there is a
triumph in being the first to tell a frightful story;
it is, however, still quoted in the neighbourhood,
as a memorable instance of female secrecy, that
she kept it to herself for a whole week, when she
was suddenly absolved from all further restraint,
by intelligence brought to the breakfast table
one morning, that the young lady was not to be
found. Her room was emptythe bed had
not been slept inthe window was open, and
the bird flown!
The astonishment and concern with which
the intelligence was received, can only be
imagined
by those who have witnessed the
agitation
which the mishaps of a great man causes
among his friends. Even the poor relations
paused for a moment from the indefatigable
labours
of the trencher; when the aunt, who had
at first been struck speechless, wrung her hands,
and shrieked out, the goblin! the goblin! she's
carried away by the goblin!
In a few words, she related the fearful scene
of the garden, and concluded that the spectre
must have carried off his bride. Two of the
domestics corroborated the opinion, for they had
heard the clattering of a horse's hoofs down the
mountain about midnight, and had no doubt that
it was the spectre on his black charger, bearing
her away to the tomb. All present were struck
with the direful probability; for events of the
kind are extremely common in Germany, as
many histories bear witness.
What a lamentable situation was that of the
poor Baron! What a heart-rending dilemma
for a fond father, and a member of the great
family of Katzenellenbogen! His only daughter
had either been rapt away to the tomb, or he
was to have some wood-demon for a son-in-law,
and, perchance, a troop of goblin
grand-children
.
As usual, he was completely bewildered,
and all the castle in an uproar. The men were
ordered to take horse, and to scour every road,
and path, and glen of the Odenwald. The
Baron
himself had just drawn on his jack-boots,
girded on his sword, and was about to mount
his steed to sally forth on the doubtful quest,
when he was brought to a pause by a new
apparition
.
A lady was seen approaching the
castle, mounted on a palfrey, attended by a
cavalier
on horseback. She galloped up to the
gate, sprang from her horse, and falling at his
feet, embraced his knees. It was his lost
daughter
,
and her companionthe Spectre
Bridegroom
!
The Baron was astounded. He
looked
at his daughter, then at the Spectre, and
almost doubted the evidence of his senses. The
latter, too, was wonderfully improved in his
appearance
,
since his visit to the world of spirits.
His dress was splendid, and set off a noble figure
of manly symmetry. He was no longer pale
and melancholy. His fine countenance was
flushed with the glow of youth, and joy rioted
in his large dark eye.
The mystery was soon cleared up. The
cavalier
(for in truth, as you must have known all
the while, he was no goblin) announced himself
as Sir Herman Von Starkenfaust. He related
his adventure with the young Count. How
that he had hastened to the castle to deliver the
unwelcome tidings, but that the eloquence of
the Baron had interrupted him in every attempt
to tell his tale. How the sight of the bride had
completely captivated him, and that to pass a
few hours near her, he had tacitly suffered the
mistake to continue. How he had been sorely
perplexed in what way to make a decent
retreat
,
until the Baron's goblin stories had
suggested
his eccentric exit. How, fearing the
feudal hostility of the family, he had repeated
his visits by stealthhad haunted the garden
beneath the young lady's windowhad wooed
had wonhad borne away in triumphand,
in a word, had wedded the fair.
Under any other circumstances, the Baron
would have been inflexible, for he was
tenacious
of paternal authority, and devoutly
obstinate
in all family feuds; but he loved his
daughter
;
he had lamented her as lost; he rejoiced to
find her still alive; and, though her husband
was of a hostile house, yet, thank heaven, he
was not a goblin. There was something, it
must be acknowledged, that did not exactly
accord
with his notions of strict veracity, in the
joke the knight had passed upon him of his
being
a dead man; but several old friends present,
who had served in the wars, assured him that
every stratagem was excusable in love, and that
the cavalier was entitled to especial privilege,
having lately served as a trooper.
Matters, therefore, were happily arranged.
The Baron pardoned the young couple on the
spot. The revels at the castle were resumed.
The poor relations overwhelmed this new
member
of the family with loving kindness; he was
so gallant, so generous, and so rich. The aunts,
it is true, were somewhat scandalized that their
system of strict seclusion, and passive obedience,
should be so badly exemplified, but attributed
it all to their negligence in not having the
windows
grated. One of them was particularly
mortified to have her marvellous story marred,
and that the only spectre she had ever seen
should turn out a counterfeit; but the niece
seemed perfectly happy at having found him
substantial flesh and bloodand so the story
ends.